1000
900,ell in the midst of a people of unclean lips: for mine eyes have seen the King, the LORD of hosts. 
Then flew one of the seraphims unto me, having a live coal in his hand, which he had taken with the tongs from off the altar: 
And he laid it upon my mouth, and said, Lo, this hath touched thy lips; and thine iniquity is taken away, and thy sin purged. 
Also I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us? Then said I, Here am I; send me. 
And he said, Go, and tell this people, Hear ye indeed, but understand not; and see ye indeed, but perceive not. 
Make the heart of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and shut their eyes; lest they see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and convert, and be healed. 
Then said I, Lord, how long? And he answered, Until the cities be wasted without inhabitant, and the houses wi
941,oy the good of all his labour that he taketh under the sun all the days of his life, which God giveth him: for it is his portion. 
Every man also to whom God hath given riches and wealth, and hath given him power to eat thereof, and to take his portion, and to rejoice in his labour; this is the gift of God. 
For he shall not much remember the days of his life; because God answereth him in the joy of his heart. 
There is an evil which I have seen under the sun, and it is common among men: 
A man to whom God hath given riches, wealth, and honour, so that he wanteth nothing for his soul of all that he desireth, yet God giveth him not power to eat thereof, but a stranger eateth it: this is vanity, and it is an evil disease. 
If a man beget an hundred children, and live many years, so that the days of his years be many, and his soul be not filled with good, and also that he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better tha
680,me as the uncleanness of a removed woman. 
Wherefore I poured my fury upon them for the blood that they had shed upon the land, and for their idols wherewith they had polluted it: 
And I scattered them among the heathen, and they were dispersed through the countries: according to their way and according to their doings I judged them. 
And when they entered unto the heathen, whither they went, they profaned my holy name, when they said to them, These are the people of the LORD, and are gone forth out of his land. 
But I had pity for mine holy name, which the house of Israel had profaned among the heathen, whither they went. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, thus sai
773,and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant. 
And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time. 
And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast devices against him. 
Yea, they that feed of the port
842,im that there was no judgment. 
And he saw that there was no man, and wondered that there was no intercessor: therefore his arm brought salvation unto him; and his righteousness, it sustained him. 
For he put on righteousness as a breastplate, and an helmet of salvation upon his head; and he put on the garments of vengeance for clothing, and was clad with zeal as a cloak. 
According to their deeds, accordingly he will repay, fury to his adversaries, recompence to his enemies; to the islands he will repay recompence. 
So shall they fear the name of the LORD from the west, and his glory from the rising of the sun. When the enemy shall come in like a flood, the Spirit of the LORD shall lift up a standard against him. 
And the Redeemer shall come to Zion, and unto them that turn from transgression in Jacob, saith the LORD. 
As for me,
793,bowed down, and the haughtiness of men shall be made low: and the LORD alone shall be exalted in that day. 
And the idols he shall utterly abolish. 
And they shall go into the holes of the rocks, and into the caves of the earth, for fear of the LORD, and for the glory of his majesty, when he ariseth to shake terribly the earth. 
In that day a man shall cast his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which they made each one for himself to worship, to the moles and to the bats; 
To go into the clefts of the rocks, and into the tops of the ragged rocks, for fear of the LORD, and for the glory of his majesty, when he ariseth to shake terribly the earth. 
Cease ye from man, whose breath is in his nostrils: for wherein is he to be accounted of ? 
For, behold, the Lord, the LORD of hosts
747,e expounded and testified the kingdom of God, persuading them concerning Jesus, both out of the law of Moses, and out of the prophets, from morning till evening. 
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not. 
And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers, 
Saying, Go unto this people, and say, Hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and not perceive: 
For the heart of this people is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they closed; lest they should see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and shou
947,do. 
And Moses wrote all the words of the LORD, and rose up early in the morning, and builded an altar under the hill, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the LORD. 
And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basons; and half of the blood he sprinkled on the altar. 
And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of the people: and they said, All that the LORD hath said will we do, and be obedient. 
And Moses took the blood, and sprinkled it on the people, and said, Behold the blood of the covenant, which the LORD hath made with you concerning all these words. 
Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel: 
And they saw the God of Israel: and there was under his feet as it were a paved work of a sapphire stone, and as it were 
880,Gibeon with her suburbs, Geba with her suburbs, 
Anathoth with her suburbs, and Almon with her suburbs; four cities. 
All the cities of the children of Aaron, the priests, were thirteen cities with their suburbs. 
And the families of the children of Kohath, the Levites which remained of the children of Kohath, even they had the cities of their lot out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
For they gave them Shechem with her suburbs in mount Ephraim, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Kibzaim with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Dan, Eltekeh with her suburbs, Gibbethon with her suburbs, 
Aijalon with her suburbs, Gathrimmon with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the half tribe of Manasseh, Tanach with her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs; two cities. 
All the cities were ten with th
678,t. 
(Now the man Moses was very meek, above all the men which were upon the face of the earth.) 
And the LORD spake suddenly unto Moses, and unto Aaron, and unto Miriam, Come out ye three unto the tabernacle of the congregation. And they three came out. 
And the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in the door of the tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now my words: If there be a prophet among you, I the LORD will make myself known unto him in a vision, and will speak unto him in a dream. 
My servant Moses is not so, who is faithful in all mine house. 
With him will I speak mouth to mouth, even apparently
783,l go in; and when they go forth, shall go forth. 
And in the feasts and in the solemnities the meat offering shall be an ephah to a bullock, and an ephah to a ram, and to the lambs as he is able to give, and an hin of oil to an ephah. 
Now when the prince shall prepare a voluntary burnt offering or peace offerings voluntarily unto the LORD, one shall then open him the gate that looketh toward the east, and he shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, as he did on the sabbath day: then he shall go forth; and after his going forth one shall shut the gate. 
Thou shalt daily prepare a burnt offering unto the LORD of a lamb of the first year without blemish: thou shalt prepare it every morning. 
And thou shalt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the si
931,is face, and worshipped Daniel, and commanded that they should offer an oblation and sweet odours unto him. 
The king answered unto Daniel, and said, Of a truth it is, that your God is a God of gods, and a Lord of kings, and a revealer of secrets, seeing thou couldest reveal this secret. 
Then the king made Daniel a great man, and gave him many great gifts, and made him ruler over the whole province of Babylon, and chief of the governors over all the wise men of Babylon. 
Then Daniel requested of the king, and he set Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, over the affairs of the province of Babylon: but Daniel sat in the gate of the king. 
Nebuchadnezzar the king made an image of gold, whose height was threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof six cubits: he set it up in the plain of Dura, in the province of Babylon. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar the king sent to gather together the princes, the governors, and the captains, the jud
780, of the great men. 
Also of the Levites: Shemaiah the son of Hashub, the son of Azrikam, the son of Hashabiah, the son of Bunni; 
And Shabbethai and Jozabad, of the chief of the Levites, had the oversight of the outward business of the house of God. 
And Mattaniah the son of Micha, the son of Zabdi, the son of Asaph, was the principal to begin the thanksgiving in prayer: and Bakbukiah the second among his brethren, and Abda the son of Shammua, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun. 
All the Levites in the holy city were two hundred fourscore and four. 
Moreover the porters, Akkub, Talmon, and their brethren that kept the gates, were an hundred seventy and two. 
And the residue of Israel, of the priests, and the Levites, were in all the cities of Judah, every one in his 
721,srael, as it is written in the book of the law of Moses, an altar of whole stones, over which no man hath lift up any iron: and they offered thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace offerings. 
And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses, which he wrote in the presence of the children of Israel. 
And all Israel, and their elders, and officers, and their judges, stood on this side the ark and on that side before the priests the Levites, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, as well the stranger, as he that was born among them; half of them over against mount Gerizim, and half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the servant of the LORD had commanded before, that
707,or this is the whole duty of man. 
For God shall bring every work into judgment, with every secret thing, whether it be good, or whether it be evil. 
The song of songs, which is Solomon's. 
Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth: for thy love is better than wine. 
Because of the savour of thy good ointments thy name is as ointment poured forth, therefore do the virgins love thee. 
Draw me, we will run after thee: the king hath brought me into his chambers: we will be glad and rejoice in thee, we will remember thy love more than wine: the upright love thee. 
I am black, but comely, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, as the tents of Kedar, as the curtains of Solomon. 
Look not upon me, because I am b
904,ey shall be unto you without blemish: 
And their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil: three tenth deals shall ye offer for a bullock, and two tenth deals for a ram; 
A several tenth deal shalt thou offer for every lamb, throughout the seven lambs: 
And one goat for a sin offering, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer these beside the burnt offering in the morning, which is for a continual burnt offering. 
After this manner ye shall offer daily, throughout the seven days, the meat of the sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD: it shall be offered beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the seventh day ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work. 
Also in the day of the firstfruits, when ye bring a new meat offering unto the LORD, after your weeks be out, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no ser
825, among the people, crying out, 
And saying, Sirs, why do ye these things? We also are men of like passions with you, and preach unto you that ye should turn from these vanities unto the living God, which made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and all things that are therein: 
Who in times past suffered all nations to walk in their own ways. 
Nevertheless he left not himself without witness, in that he did good, and gave us rain from heaven, and fruitful seasons, filling our hearts with food and gladness. 
And with these sayings scarce restrained they the people, that they had not done sacrifice unto them. 
And there came thither certain Jews from Antioch and Iconium, who persuaded the people, and having stoned Paul, drew him out of the city, supposing he had been dead. 
Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about hi
715,ighty men were on his right hand and on his left. 
And thus said Shimei when he cursed, Come out, come out, thou bloody man, and thou man of Belial: 
The LORD hath returned upon thee all the blood of the house of Saul, in whose stead thou hast reigned; and the LORD hath delivered the kingdom into the hand of Absalom thy son: and, behold, thou art taken in thy mischief, because thou art a bloody man. 
Then said Abishai the son of Zeruiah unto the king, Why should this dead dog curse my lord the king? let me go over, I pray thee, and take off his head. 
And the king said, What have I to do with you, ye sons of Zeruiah? so let him curse, because the LORD hath said unto him, Curse David. Who shall then say, Wh
698,, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The thirteenth to Shubael, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fourteenth to Mattithiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fifteenth to Jeremoth, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The sixteenth to Hananiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The seventeenth to Joshbekashah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The eighteenth to Hanani, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The nineteenth to Mallothi, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twentieth to Eliathah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The one and twentieth to Hothir, he, his sons, and his brethr
720,hey shall heap dust, and take it. 
Then shall his mind change, and he shall pass over, and offend, imputing this his power unto his god. 
Art thou not from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Holy One? we shall not die. O LORD, thou hast ordained them for judgment; and, O mighty God, thou hast established them for correction. 
Thou art of purer eyes than to behold evil, and canst not look on iniquity: wherefore lookest thou upon them that deal treacherously, and holdest thy tongue when the wicked devoureth the man that is more righteous than he? 
And makest men as the fishes of the sea, as the creeping things, that have no ruler over them? 
They take up all of them with the angle, they catch them in their net, and
753,have transgressed the commandment of the LORD, and thy words: because I feared the people, and obeyed their voice. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, pardon my sin, and turn again with me, that I may worship the LORD. 
And Samuel said unto Saul, I will not return with thee: for thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, and the LORD hath rejected thee from being king over Israel. 
And as Samuel turned about to go away, he laid hold upon the skirt of his mantle, and it rent. 
And Samuel said unto him, The LORD hath rent the kingdom of Israel from thee this day, and hath given it to a neighbour of thine, that is better than thou. 
And also the Strength of Israel will not lie nor repent: for he is not a man, that he should repent. 
Then he said, I have s
801,
And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, they likewise fled before Abishai his brother, and entered into the city. Then Joab came to Jerusalem. 
And when the Syrians saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they sent messengers, and drew forth the Syrians that were beyond the river: and Shophach the captain of the host of Hadarezer went before them. 
And it was told David; and he gathered all Israel, and passed over Jordan, and came upon them, and set the battle in array against them. So when David had put the battle in array against the Syrians, they fought with him. 
But the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew of the Syrians seven thousand men which fought in chariots, and forty thousand footmen, and killed Shophach the captain of the host. 
And whe
809, judgment ye judge, ye shall be judged: and with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you again. 
And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but considerest not the beam that is in thine own eye? 
Or how wilt thou say to thy brother, Let me pull out the mote out of thine eye; and, behold, a beam is in thine own eye? 
Thou hypocrite, first cast out the beam out of thine own eye; and then shalt thou see clearly to cast out the mote out of thy brother's eye. 
Give not that which is holy unto the dogs, neither cast ye your pearls before swine, lest they trample them under their feet, and turn again and rend you. 
Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you: 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; 
802,ll I give it: 
And I will send an angel before thee; and I will drive out the Canaanite, the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite: 
Unto a land flowing with milk and honey: for I will not go up in the midst of thee; for thou art a stiffnecked people: lest I consume thee in the way. 
And when the people heard these evil tidings, they mourned: and no man did put on him his ornaments. 
For the LORD had said unto Moses, Say unto the children of Israel, Ye are a stiffnecked people: I will come up into the midst of thee in a moment, and consume thee: therefore now put off thy ornaments from thee, that I may know what to do unto thee. 
And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments by the mount Horeb. 
And Moses took the tabernacle, and pitche
732,nth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eli, Eli, lama sabachthani? that is to say, My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me? 
Some of them that stood there, when they heard that, said, This man calleth for Elias. 
And straightway one of them ran, and took a spunge, and filled it with vinegar, and put it on a reed, and gave him to drink. 
The rest said, Let be, let us see whether Elias will come to save him. 
Jesus, when he had cried again with a loud voice, yielded up the ghost. 
And, behold, the veil of the temple was rent in twain from the top to the bottom; and the earth did quake, and the rocks rent; 
And the graves were opened; and many bodies of the saints which slept arose, 
And came out of the graves afte
765,: he shall grow as the lily, and cast forth his roots as Lebanon. 
His branches shall spread, and his beauty shall be as the olive tree, and his smell as Lebanon. 
They that dwell under his shadow shall return; they shall revive as the corn, and grow as the vine: the scent thereof shall be as the wine of Lebanon. 
Ephraim shall say, What have I to do any more with idols? I have heard him, and observed him: I am like a green fir tree. From me is thy fruit found. 
Who is wise, and he shall understand these things? prudent, and he shall know them? for the ways of the LORD are right, and the just shall walk in them: but the transgressors shall fall therein. 
The word of the LORD that came to Joel the son of Pethuel. 
Hear this, ye old men, and give ear, all y
733, were spoken of Paul. 
And when she was baptized, and her household, she besought us, saying, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, and abide there. And she constrained us. 
And it came to pass, as we went to prayer, a certain damsel possessed with a spirit of divination met us, which brought her masters much gain by soothsaying: 
The same followed Paul and us, and cried, saying, These men are the servants of the most high God, which shew unto us the way of salvation. 
And this did she many days. But Paul, being grieved, turned and said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her. And he came out the same hour. 
And when her masters saw that the hope of their g
910,ven, lifted up his voice, and said unto them, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you, and hearken to my words: 
For these are not drunken, as ye suppose, seeing it is but the third hour of the day. 
But this is that which was spoken by the prophet Joel; 
And it shall come to pass in the last days, saith God, I will pour out of my Spirit upon all flesh: and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, and your young men shall see visions, and your old men shall dream dreams: 
And on my servants and on my handmaidens I will pour out in those days of my Spirit; and they shall prophesy: 
And I will shew wonders in heaven above, and signs in the earth beneath; blood, and fire, and vapour of smoke: 
The sun shall be turned into darkness, and the moon into blood, before the great and notable day of the Lord come: 
And it shall come to pass, that whosoever shall call 
948,alt even drink it and suck it out, and thou shalt break the sherds thereof, and pluck off thine own breasts: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast forgotten me, and cast me behind thy back, therefore bear thou also thy lewdness and thy whoredoms. 
The LORD said moreover unto me; Son of man, wilt thou judge Aholah and Aholibah? yea, declare unto them their abominations; 
That they have committed adultery, and blood is in their hands, and with their idols have they committed adultery, and have also caused their sons, whom they bare unto me, to pass for them through the fire, to devour them. 
Moreover this they have done unto me: they have defiled my sanctuary in the same day, and have profaned my sabbaths. 
For when they had slain their children to their idols, then they came the same day into my sanctuary to profane it; and, lo, thus have they done in the midst of mine house. 
A
853,hold, the LORD hath proclaimed unto the end of the world, Say ye to the daughter of Zion, Behold, thy salvation cometh; behold, his reward is with him, and his work before him. 
And they shall call them, The holy people, The redeemed of the LORD: and thou shalt be called, Sought out, A city not forsaken. 
Who is this that cometh from Edom, with dyed garments from Bozrah? this that is glorious in his apparel, travelling in the greatness of his strength? I that speak in righteousness, mighty to save. 
Wherefore art thou red in thine apparel, and thy garments like him that treadeth in the winefat? 
I have trodden the winepress alone; and of the people there was none with me: for I will tread them in mine anger, and trample them in my fury; and their blood shall be sprinkled upon my garments, and I will stain all my raiment. 
For the day of veng
847,t thy father and thy mother, and the land of thy nativity, and art come unto a people which thou knewest not heretofore. 
The LORD recompense thy work, and a full reward be given thee of the LORD God of Israel, under whose wings thou art come to trust. 
Then she said, Let me find favour in thy sight, my lord; for that thou hast comforted me, and for that thou hast spoken friendly unto thine handmaid, though I be not like unto one of thine handmaidens. 
And Boaz said unto her, At mealtime come thou hither, and eat of the bread, and dip thy morsel in the vinegar. And she sat beside the reapers: and he reached her parched corn, and she did eat, and was sufficed, and left. 
And when she was risen up to glean, Boaz commanded his young men, saying, Let her glean even among the sheaves, and reproach her not: 
And let fall also some of the han
885,ple Israel, according to all that he promised: there hath not failed one word of all his good promise, which he promised by the hand of Moses his servant. 
The LORD our God be with us, as he was with our fathers: let him not leave us, nor forsake us: 
That he may incline our hearts unto him, to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and his statutes, and his judgments, which he commanded our fathers. 
And let these my words, wherewith I have made supplication before the LORD, be nigh unto the LORD our God day and night, that he maintain the cause of his servant, and the cause of his people Israel at all times, as the matter shall require: 
That all the people of the earth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else. 
Let your heart therefore be perfect with the LORD our God, to walk in his statutes, and to keep his commandments, as at this day. 
904, his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet. 
His breasts are full of milk, and his bones are moistened with marrow. 
And another dieth in the bitterness of his soul, and never eateth with pleasure. 
They shall lie down alike in the dust, and the worms shall cover them. 
Behold, I know your thoughts, and the devices which ye wrongfully imagine against me. 
For ye say, Where is the house of the prince? and where are the dwelling places of 
869,made it a law over the land of Egypt unto this day, that Pharaoh should have the fifth part, except the land of the priests only, which became not Pharaoh's. 
And Israel dwelt in the land of Egypt, in the country of Goshen; and they had possessions therein, and grew, and multiplied exceedingly. 
And Jacob lived in the land of Egypt seventeen years: so the whole age of Jacob was an hundred forty and seven years. 
And the time drew nigh that Israel must die: and he called his son Joseph, and said unto him, If now I have found grace in thy sight, put, I pray thee, thy hand under my thigh, and deal kindly and truly with me; bury me not, I pray thee, in Egypt: 
But I will lie with my fathers, and thou shalt carry me out of Egypt, and bury me in their buryingplace. And he said, I will do as thou hast said. 
And he said, Swear unto me. And he sware unto him. And I
779, mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; therefore she is removed: all that honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and turneth backward. 
Her filthiness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end; therefore she came down wonderfully: she had no comforter. O LORD, behold my affliction: for the enemy hath magnified himself. 
The adversary hath spread out his hand upon all her pleasant things: for she hath seen that the heathen entered into her sanctuary, whom thou didst command that they should not enter into thy congregation. 
All her people sigh, they seek bread; they have given their pleasant things for meat to relieve the soul: see, O LORD, and consider; for I am become vile. 
Is it nothing to you, a
766,ake, for a testimony against them and the Gentiles. 
But when they deliver you up, take no thought how or what ye shall speak: for it shall be given you in that same hour what ye shall speak. 
For it is not ye that speak, but the Spirit of your Father which speaketh in you. 
And the brother shall deliver up the brother to death, and the father the child: and the children shall rise up against their parents, and cause them to be put to death. 
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that endureth to the end shall be saved. 
But when they persecute you in this city, flee ye into another: for verily I say unto you, Ye shall not have gone over the cities of Israel, till the Son of man be come. 
The disciple is not above his master, nor the 
794,eir set office they sanctified themselves in holiness: 
Also of the sons of Aaron the priests, which were in the fields of the suburbs of their cities, in every several city, the men that were expressed by name, to give portions to all the males among the priests, and to all that were reckoned by genealogies among the Levites. 
And thus did Hezekiah throughout all Judah, and wrought that which was good and right and truth before the LORD his God. 
And in every work that he began in the service of the house of God, and in the law, and in the commandments, to seek his God, he did it with all his heart, and prospered. 
After these things, and the establishment thereof, Sennacherib king of Assyria came, and entered into Judah, and encamped against the fenced cities, and thought to win th
655,corruption, and I retained no strength. 
Yet heard I the voice of his words: and when I heard the voice of his words, then was I in a deep sleep on my face, and my face toward the ground. 
And, behold, an hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and upon the palms of my hands. 
And he said unto me, O Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were 
938,aul, being grieved, turned and said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her. And he came out the same hour. 
And when her masters saw that the hope of their gains was gone, they caught Paul and Silas, and drew them into the marketplace unto the rulers, 
And brought them to the magistrates, saying, These men, being Jews, do exceedingly trouble our city, 
And teach customs, which are not lawful for us to receive, neither to observe, being Romans. 
And the multitude rose up together against them: and the magistrates rent off their clothes, and commanded to beat them. 
And when they had laid many stripes upon them, they cast them into prison, charging the jailor to keep them safely: 
Who, having received such a charge, thrust them into the inner prison, and made their feet fast in the stocks. 
And at midnight Paul and Silas prayed, and sang praises unto God: and the prisoners heard them. 
And
664,hel weeping for her children, and would not be comforted, because they are not. 
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, 
Saying, Arise, and take the young child and his mother, and go into the land of Israel: for they are dead which sought the young child's life. 
And he arose, and took the young child and his mother, and came into the land of Israel. 
But when he heard that Archelaus did reign in Judaea in the room of his father Herod, he was afraid to go thither: notwithstanding, being warned of God in a dream, he turned aside into the parts of Galilee: 
And he came and dwelt in a city called Nazare
696,he daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; therefore she is removed: all that honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and turneth backward. 
Her filthiness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end; therefore she came down wonderfully: sh
877,weth the thoughts of man, that they are vanity. 
Blessed is the man whom thou chastenest, O LORD, and teachest him out of thy law; 
That thou mayest give him rest from the days of adversity, until the pit be digged for the wicked. 
For the LORD will not cast off his people, neither will he forsake his inheritance. 
But judgment shall return unto righteousness: and all the upright in heart shall follow it. 
Who will rise up for me against the evildoers? or who will stand up for me against the workers of iniquity? 
Unless the LORD had been my help, my soul had almost dwelt in silence. 
When I said, My foot slippeth; thy mercy, O LORD, held me up. 
In the multitude of my thoughts within me thy comforts delight my soul. 
Shall the throne of iniquity have fellowship with thee, which frameth mischief by a law? 
They gather themselves together against the soul of the righ
817,rone be established: and he shall sit upon it in truth in the tabernacle of David, judging, and seeking judgment, and hasting righteousness. 
We have heard of the pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his haughtiness, and his pride, and his wrath: but his lies shall not be so. 
Therefore shall Moab howl for Moab, every one shall howl: for the foundations of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken. 
For the fields of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah: the lords of the heathen have broken down the principal plants thereof, they are come even unto Jazer, they wandered through the wilderness: her branches are stretched out, they are gone over the sea. 
Therefore I will bewail with the weeping of Jazer the vine of Sibmah: I will water thee with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for the sh
887,cation. 
I poured out my complaint before him; I shewed before him my trouble. 
When my spirit was overwhelmed within me, then thou knewest my path. In the way wherein I walked have they privily laid a snare for me. 
I looked on my right hand, and beheld, but there was no man that would know me: refuge failed me; no man cared for my soul. 
I cried unto thee, O LORD: I said, Thou art my refuge and my portion in the land of the living. 
Attend unto my cry; for I am brought very low: deliver me from my persecutors; for they are stronger than I. 
Bring my soul out of prison, that I may praise thy name: the righteous shall compass me about; for thou shalt deal bountifully with me. 
Hear my prayer, O LORD, give ear to my supplications: in thy faithfulness answer me, and in thy righteousness. 
And enter not into judgment with thy servant: for in thy sight shall no man living be jus
720,lso I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed them, and their soul also abhorred me. 
Then said I, I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die; and that that is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let the rest eat every one the flesh of another. 
And I took my staff, even Beauty, and cut it asunder, that I might break my covenant which I had made with all the people. 
And it was broken in that day: and so the poor of the flock that waited upon me knew that it was the word of the LORD. 
And I said unto them, If ye think good, give me my price; and if not, forbear. So they weighed for my price thirty pieces of silver. 
And the LORD said unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly price that I was prised at
790, be the portion of their cup. 
For the righteous LORD loveth righteousness; his countenance doth behold the upright. 
Help, LORD; for the godly man ceaseth; for the faithful fail from among the children of men. 
They speak vanity every one with his neighbour: with flattering lips and with a double heart do they speak. 
The LORD shall cut off all flattering lips, and the tongue that speaketh proud things: 
Who have said, With our tongue will we prevail; our lips are our own: who is lord over us? 
For the oppression of the poor, for the sighing of the needy, now will I arise, saith the LORD; I will set him in safety from him that puffeth at him. 
The words of the LORD are pure words: as silver tried in a furnace of earth, purified seven times. 
Thou shalt keep them, O LORD, thou sh
731,? 
Behold my hands and my feet, that it is I myself: handle me, and see; for a spirit hath not flesh and bones, as ye see me have. 
And when he had thus spoken, he shewed them his hands and his feet. 
And while they yet believed not for joy, and wondered, he said unto them, Have ye here any meat? 
And they gave him a piece of a broiled fish, and of an honeycomb. 
And he took it, and did eat before them. 
And he said unto them, These are the words which I spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me. 
Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures, 
And said unto them,
678,ce? and who shall repay him what he hath done? 
Yet shall he be brought to the grave, and shall remain in the tomb. 
The clods of the valley shall be sweet unto him, and every man shall draw after him, as there are innumerable before him. 
How then comfort ye me in vain, seeing in your answers there remaineth falsehood? 
Then Eliphaz the Temanite answered and said, 
Can a man be profitable unto God, as he that is wise may be profitable unto himself? 
Is it any pleasure to the Almighty, that thou art righteous? or is it gain to him, that thou makest thy ways perfect? 
Will he reprove thee for fear of thee? will he enter with thee into judgment? 
Is not thy wickedness gre
646,e troop of robbers spoileth without. 
And they consider not in their hearts that I remember all their wickedness: now their own doings have beset them about; they are before my face. 
They make the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes with their lies. 
They are all adulterers, as an oven heated by the baker, who ceaseth from raising after he hath kneaded the dough, until it be leavened. 
In the day of our king the princes have made him sick with bottles of wine; he stretched out his hand with scorners. 
For they have made ready their heart like an oven, whiles they lie in wait: their baker sleepeth all the night; in the mornin
862, silver rings and pillars of marble: the beds were of gold and silver, upon a pavement of red, and blue, and white, and black, marble. 
And they gave them drink in vessels of gold, (the vessels being diverse one from another,) and royal wine in abundance, according to the state of the king. 
And the drinking was according to the law; none did compel: for so the king had appointed to all the officers of his house, that they should do according to every man's pleasure. 
Also Vashti the queen made a feast for the women in the royal house which belonged to king Ahasuerus. 
On the seventh day, when the heart of the king was merry with wine, he commanded Mehuman, Biztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha, Zethar, and Carcas, the seven chamberlains that served in the presence of Ahasuerus the king, 
To bring Vashti the queen before the king with the crown royal,
827, come: 
And let them make haste, and take up a wailing for us, that our eyes may run down with tears, and our eyelids gush out with waters. 
For a voice of wailing is heard out of Zion, How are we spoiled! we are greatly confounded, because we have forsaken the land, because our dwellings have cast us out. 
Yet hear the word of the LORD, O ye women, and let your ear receive the word of his mouth, and teach your daughters wailing, and every one her neighbour lamentation. 
For death is come up into our windows, and is entered into our palaces, to cut off the children from without, and the young men from the streets. 
Speak, Thus saith the LORD, Even the carcases of men shall fall as dung upon the open field, and as the handful after the harvestman, and none shall gather them. 
Thus saith the LORD, Let not the wise man
649, asleep in Christ are perished. 
If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of them that slept. 
For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead. 
For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ shall all be made alive. 
But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ's at his coming. 
Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power. 
For he must reign, till he hath put all en
887,ording to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself, ye do well: 
But if ye have respect to persons, ye commit sin, and are convinced of the law as transgressors. 
For whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all. 
For he that said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou commit no adultery, yet if thou kill, thou art become a transgressor of the law. 
So speak ye, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law of liberty. 
For he shall have judgment without mercy, that hath shewed no mercy; and mercy rejoiceth against judgment. 
What doth it profit, my brethren, though a man say he hath faith, and have not works? can faith save him? 
If a brother or sister be naked, and destitute of daily food, 
And one of you say unto them, Depart in peace, be ye warmed and filled; notwithstanding ye give them no
849, meat was yet in their mouths, 
The wrath of God came upon them, and slew the fattest of them, and smote down the chosen men of Israel. 
For all this they sinned still, and believed not for his wondrous works. 
Therefore their days did he consume in vanity, and their years in trouble. 
When he slew them, then they sought him: and they returned and enquired early after God. 
And they remembered that God was their rock, and the high God their redeemer. 
Nevertheless they did flatter him with their mouth, and they lied unto him with their tongues. 
For their heart was not right with him, neither were they stedfast in his covenant. 
But he, being full of compassion, forgave their iniquity, and destroyed them not: yea, many a time turned he his anger away, and did not stir up all his wrath. 
For he remembered that they were but flesh; a wind 
842,ll be unclean. 
Every bed whereon she lieth all the days of her issue shall be unto her as the bed of her separation: and whatsoever she sitteth upon shall be unclean, as the uncleanness of her separation. 
And whosoever toucheth those things shall be unclean, and shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
But if she be cleansed of her issue, then she shall number to herself seven days, and after that she shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day she shall take unto her two turtles, or two young pigeons, and bring them unto the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for her before the LORD for the issue of her uncleanness. 
Thus shall ye separat
866,re was a darkness over all the earth until the ninth hour. 
And the sun was darkened, and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst. 
And when Jesus had cried with a loud voice, he said, Father, into thy hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up the ghost. 
Now when the centurion saw what was done, he glorified God, saying, Certainly this was a righteous man. 
And all the people that came together to that sight, beholding the things which were done, smote their breasts, and returned. 
And all his acquaintance, and the women that followed him from Galilee, stood afar off, beholding these things. 
And, behold, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he was a good man, and a just: 
(The same had not consented to the counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews: who also himself waited for the kingdom of Go
954,nding in the visions of God: and as long as he sought the LORD, God made him to prosper. 
And he went forth and warred against the Philistines, and brake down the wall of Gath, and the wall of Jabneh, and the wall of Ashdod, and built cities about Ashdod, and among the Philistines. 
And God helped him against the Philistines, and against the Arabians that dwelt in Gurbaal, and the Mehunims. 
And the Ammonites gave gifts to Uzziah: and his name spread abroad even to the entering in of Egypt; for he strengthened himself exceedingly. 
Moreover Uzziah built towers in Jerusalem at the corner gate, and at the valley gate, and at the turning of the wall, and fortified them. 
Also he built towers in the desert, and digged many wells: for he had much cattle, both in the low country, and in the plains: husbandmen also, and vine dressers in the mountains, and in Carmel: for he loved husbandry. 
Moreover Uzziah had an host of fighting men, that went ou
844,ly, and the charity of every one of you all toward each other aboundeth; 
So that we ourselves glory in you in the churches of God for your patience and faith in all your persecutions and tribulations that ye endure: 
Which is a manifest token of the righteous judgment of God, that ye may be counted worthy of the kingdom of God, for which ye also suffer: 
Seeing it is a righteous thing with God to recompense tribulation to them that trouble you; 
And to you who are troubled rest with us, when the Lord Jesus shall be revealed from heaven with his mighty angels, 
In flaming fire taking vengeance on them that know not God, and that obey not the gospel of our Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who shall be punished with everlasting destruction from the presence of the Lord, and from the glory of his power; 
When he shall come to be glorified in his sa
832,o stranger with us in the house, save we two in the house. 
And this woman's child died in the night; because she overlaid it. 
And she arose at midnight, and took my son from beside me, while thine handmaid slept, and laid it in her bosom, and laid her dead child in my bosom. 
And when I rose in the morning to give my child suck, behold, it was dead: but when I had considered it in the morning, behold, it was not my son, which I did bear. 
And the other woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the dead is thy son. And this said, No; but the dead is thy son, and the living is my son. Thus they spake before the king. 
Then said the king, The one saith, This is my son that liveth, and thy son is the dead: and the other saith, Nay; but thy son is the dead, and my son is the living. 
And the king said, Bring me a sword
906,rom them, I will see what their end shall be: for they are a very froward generation, children in whom is no faith. 
They have moved me to jealousy with that which is not God; they have provoked me to anger with their vanities: and I will move them to jealousy with those which are not a people; I will provoke them to anger with a foolish nation. 
For a fire is kindled in mine anger, and shall burn unto the lowest hell, and shall consume the earth with her increase, and set on fire the foundations of the mountains. 
I will heap mischiefs upon them; I will spend mine arrows upon them. 
They shall be burnt with hunger, and devoured with burning heat, and with bitter destruction: I will also send the teeth of beasts upon them, with the poison of serpents of the dust. 
The sword without, and terror within, shall destroy both the young man and the virgin, the suckling also with the man of gray hairs
774, the sepulchre was nigh at hand. 
The first day of the week cometh Mary Magdalene early, when it was yet dark, unto the sepulchre, and seeth the stone taken away from the sepulchre. 
Then she runneth, and cometh to Simon Peter, and to the other disciple, whom Jesus loved, and saith unto them, They have taken away the LORD out of the sepulchre, and we know not where they have laid him. 
Peter therefore went forth, and that other disciple, and came to the sepulchre. 
So they ran both together: and the other disciple did outrun Peter, and came first to the sepulchre. 
And he stooping down, and looking in, saw the linen clothes lying; yet went he not in. 
Then cometh Simon Peter following him, and went into the sepulchre, and seeth the linen clothes lie, 
And the napk
811,or their brethren the Levites prepared for them. 
So all the service of the LORD was prepared the same day, to keep the passover, and to offer burnt offerings upon the altar of the LORD, according to the commandment of king Josiah. 
And the children of Israel that were present kept the passover at that time, and the feast of unleavened bread seven days. 
And there was no passover like to that kept in Israel from the days of Samuel the prophet; neither did all the kings of Israel keep such a passover as Josiah kept, and the priests, and the Levites, and all Judah and Israel that were present, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
In the eighteenth year of the reign of Josiah was this passover kept. 
After all this, when Josiah had prepared the temple, Necho king of Egypt came up to fight against Charchem
742, bringeth forth, and upon men, and upon cattle, and upon all the labour of the hands. 
Then Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, with all the remnant of the people, obeyed the voice of the LORD their God, and the words of Haggai the prophet, as the LORD their God had sent him, and the people did fear before the LORD. 
Then spake Haggai the LORD's messenger in the LORD's message unto the people, saying, I am with you, saith the LORD. 
And the LORD stirred up the spirit of Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and the spirit of Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, and the spirit of all the remnant of the people; and they came and did work in the house of the LORD of ho
833,ad out his hand upon all her pleasant things: for she hath seen that the heathen entered into her sanctuary, whom thou didst command that they should not enter into thy congregation. 
All her people sigh, they seek bread; they have given their pleasant things for meat to relieve the soul: see, O LORD, and consider; for I am become vile. 
Is it nothing to you, all ye that pass by? behold, and see if there be any sorrow like unto my sorrow, which is done unto me, wherewith the LORD hath afflicted me in the day of his fierce anger. 
From above hath he sent fire into my bones, and it prevaileth against them: he hath spread a net for my feet, he hath turned me back: he hath made me desolate and faint all the day. 
The yoke of my transgressions is bound by his hand: they are wreathed, and come up upon my neck: he hath made my s
727,from them. 
And the shapes of the locusts were like unto horses prepared unto battle; and on their heads were as it were crowns like gold, and their faces were as the faces of men. 
And they had hair as the hair of women, and their teeth were as the teeth of lions. 
And they had breastplates, as it were breastplates of iron; and the sound of their wings was as the sound of chariots of many horses running to battle. 
And they had tails like unto scorpions, and there were stings in their tails: and their power was to hurt men five months. 
And they had a king over them, which is the angel of the bottomless pit, whose name in the Hebrew tongue is Abaddon, but in the Greek tongue hath his name Apollyon. 
One woe is past; 
825,to, ye and your households, wherein the LORD thy God hath blessed thee. 
Ye shall not do after all the things that we do here this day, every man whatsoever is right in his own eyes. 
For ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which the LORD your God giveth you. 
But when ye go over Jordan, and dwell in the land which the LORD your God giveth you to inherit, and when he giveth you rest from all your enemies round about, so that ye dwell in safety; 
Then there shall be a place which the LORD your God shall choose to cause his name to dwell there; thither shall ye bring all that I command you; your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, your tithes, and the heave offering of your hand, and all your choice vows which ye vow unto the LORD: 
And ye shall rejoice before the LORD your God, ye, and your
761, down in Adria, about midnight the shipmen deemed that they drew near to some country; 
And sounded, and found it twenty fathoms: and when they had gone a little further, they sounded again, and found it fifteen fathoms. 
Then fearing lest we should have fallen upon rocks, they cast four anchors out of the stern, and wished for the day. 
And as the shipmen were about to flee out of the ship, when they had let down the boat into the sea, under colour as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship, 
Paul said to the centurion and to the soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved. 
Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off. 
And while the day was coming on, Paul besought them all to take meat, say
799, art thou that judgest another man's servant? to his own master he standeth or falleth. Yea, he shall be holden up: for God is able to make him stand. 
One man esteemeth one day above another: another esteemeth every day alike. Let every man be fully persuaded in his own mind. 
He that regardeth the day, regardeth it unto the Lord; and he that regardeth not the day, to the Lord he doth not regard it. He that eateth, eateth to the Lord, for he giveth God thanks; and he that eateth not, to the Lord he eateth not, and giveth God thanks. 
For none of us liveth to himself, and no man dieth to himself. 
For whether we live, we live unto the Lord; and whether we die, we die unto the Lord: whether we live therefore, or die, we are the Lord's. 
For to this end Christ both died, and rose, and reviv
791,thout blemish before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his offering, and kill it at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons the priests shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt sacrifice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering for a sacrifice of peace offering 
776,the LORD, behold, as soon as thou art departed from me, a lion shall slay thee. And as soon as he was departed from him, a lion found him, and slew him. 
Then he found another man, and said, Smite me, I pray thee. And the man smote him, so that in smiting he wounded him. 
So the prophet departed, and waited for the king by the way, and disguised himself with ashes upon his face. 
And as the king passed by, he cried unto the king: and he said, Thy servant went out into the midst of the battle; and, behold, a man turned aside, and brought a man unto me, and said, Keep this man: if by any means he be missing, then shall thy life be for his life, or else thou shalt pay a talent of silver. 
And as thy servant was busy here and there, he was gone. And the king of Israel s
852,ere be no dew, neither let there be rain, upon you, nor fields of offerings: for there the shield of the mighty is vilely cast away, the shield of Saul, as though he had not been anointed with oil. 
From the blood of the slain, from the fat of the mighty, the bow of Jonathan turned not back, and the sword of Saul returned not empty. 
Saul and Jonathan were lovely and pleasant in their lives, and in their death they were not divided: they were swifter than eagles, they were stronger than lions. 
Ye daughters of Israel, weep over Saul, who clothed you in scarlet, with other delights, who put on ornaments of gold upon your apparel. 
How are the mighty fallen in the midst of the battle! O Jonathan, thou wast slain in thine high places. 
I am distressed for thee, my brother Jonathan: very pleasant hast thou been unto me: thy love to me was wonde
794,f the pit whence ye are digged. 
Look unto Abraham your father, and unto Sarah that bare you: for I called him alone, and blessed him, and increased him. 
For the LORD shall comfort Zion: he will comfort all her waste places; and he will make her wilderness like Eden, and her desert like the garden of the LORD; joy and gladness shall be found therein, thanksgiving, and the voice of melody. 
Hearken unto me, my people; and give ear unto me, O my nation: for a law shall proceed from me, and I will make my judgment to rest for a light of the people. 
My righteousness is near; my salvation is gone forth, and mine arms shall judge the people; the isles shall wait upon me, and on mine arm shall they trust. 
Lift up your eyes to the heavens, and look upon the earth beneath: for the heavens 
755,charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Pagiel the son of Ocran. 
On the twelfth day Ahira the son of Enan, prince of the children of Naphtali, offered: 
His offering was one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after 
948,rcumcision in the flesh made by hands; 
That at that time ye were without Christ, being aliens from the commonwealth of Israel, and strangers from the covenants of promise, having no hope, and without God in the world: 
But now in Christ Jesus ye who sometimes were far off are made nigh by the blood of Christ. 
For he is our peace, who hath made both one, and hath broken down the middle wall of partition between us; 
Having abolished in his flesh the enmity, even the law of commandments contained in ordinances; for to make in himself of twain one new man, so making peace; 
And that he might reconcile both unto God in one body by the cross, having slain the enmity thereby: 
And came and preached peace to you which were afar off, and to them that were nigh. 
For through him we both have access by one Spirit unto the Father. 
Now therefore ye are no more strangers and foreigners, but fellowcitizens with the saints, and of the household o
673, that the way of man is not in himself: it is not in man that walketh to direct his steps. 
O LORD, correct me, but with judgment; not in thine anger, lest thou bring me to nothing. 
Pour out thy fury upon the heathen that know thee not, and upon the families that call not on thy name: for they have eaten up Jacob, and devoured him, and consumed him, and have made his habitation desolate. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD saying, 
Hear ye the words of this covenant, and speak unto the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem; 
And say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Cursed be the man that obeyeth not the words of this covenan
762,of the wicked shall destroy them; because they refuse to do judgment. 
The way of man is froward and strange: but as for the pure, his work is right. 
It is better to dwell in a corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman in a wide house. 
The soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no favour in his eyes. 
When the scorner is punished, the simple is made wise: and when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he also shall cry himself, but shall not be heard. 
A gift in secret pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom strong wrath. 
It is joy to the just to d
921,d of the hand of Manasseh and Ephraim, and of all the remnant of Israel, and of all Judah and Benjamin; and they returned to Jerusalem. 
And they put it in the hand of the workmen that had the oversight of the house of the LORD, and they gave it to the workmen that wrought in the house of the LORD, to repair and amend the house: 
Even to the artificers and builders gave they it, to buy hewn stone, and timber for couplings, and to floor the houses which the kings of Judah had destroyed. 
And the men did the work faithfully: and the overseers of them were Jahath and Obadiah, the Levites, of the sons of Merari; and Zechariah and Meshullam, of the sons of the Kohathites, to set it forward; and other of the Levites, all that could skill of instruments of musick. 
Also they were over the bearers of burdens, and were overseers of all that wrought the work in any manner of service: and of the Levites there were scri
644,the tenth in Israel for an inheritance, for their service which they serve, even the service of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Neither must the children of Israel henceforth come nigh the tabernacle of the congregation, lest they bear sin, and die. 
But the Levites shall do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation, and they shall bear their iniquity: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations, that among the children of Israel they have no inheritance. 
But the tithes of the children of Israel, which they offer as an heave offering unto the LORD, I have given to the Levites to inherit: therefore I have sai
821,cribe before them. 
And at the fountain gate, which was over against them, they went up by the stairs of the city of David, at the going up of the wall, above the house of David, even unto the water gate eastward. 
And the other company of them that gave thanks went over against them, and I after them, and the half of the people upon the wall, from beyond the tower of the furnaces even unto the broad wall; 
And from above the gate of Ephraim, and above the old gate, and above the fish gate, and the tower of Hananeel, and the tower of Meah, even unto the sheep gate: and they stood still in the prison gate. 
So stood the two companies of them that gave thanks in the house of God, and I, and the half of the rulers with me: 
And the priests; Eliakim, Maaseiah, Miniamin, Michaiah, Elioenai, Zechariah, and Hananiah,
742,Timotheus our brother, 
To the saints and faithful brethren in Christ which are at Colosse: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We give thanks to God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying always for you, 
Since we heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints, 
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who 
931,d: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Who can utter the mighty acts of the LORD? who can shew forth all his praise? 
Blessed are they that keep judgment, and he that doeth righteousness at all times. 
Remember me, O LORD, with the favour that thou bearest unto thy people: O visit me with thy salvation; 
That I may see the good of thy chosen, that I may rejoice in the gladness of thy nation, that I may glory with thine inheritance. 
We have sinned with our fathers, we have committed iniquity, we have done wickedly. 
Our fathers understood not thy wonders in Egypt; they remembered not the multitude of thy mercies; but provoked him at the sea, even at the Red sea. 
Nevertheless he saved them for his name's sake, that he might make his mighty power to be known. 
He rebuked the Red sea also, and it was dried up: so he led them through the depths, as through the wilderness. 
And he saved them from the hand of him that hated 
726,nd they shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and to this house? 
And they shall answer, Because they forsook the LORD their God, who brought forth their fathers out of the land of Egypt, and have taken hold upon other gods, and have worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath the LORD brought upon them all this evil. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, when Solomon had built the two houses, the house of the LORD, and the king's house, 
(Now Hiram the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar trees and fir trees, and with gold, according to all his desire,) that then king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee. 
And Hiram came out from Tyre to see the cities whi
733,he keepers of the walls took away my veil from me. 
I charge you, O daughters of Jerusalem, if ye find my beloved, that ye tell him, that I am sick of love. 
What is thy beloved more than another beloved, O thou fairest among women? what is thy beloved more than another beloved, that thou dost so charge us? 
My beloved is white and ruddy, the chiefest among ten thousand. 
His head is as the most fine gold, his locks are bushy, and black as a raven. 
His eyes are as the eyes of doves by the rivers of waters, washed with milk, and fitly set. 
His cheeks are as a bed of spices, as sweet flowers: his lips like lilies, dropping sweet smelling myrrh. 
His hands are as gold rings set with the beryl: his belly is as bright ivory ov
643,g pitch. 
It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever: from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever. 
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her princes shall be nothing. 
And thorns shall come up in her palaces, nettles and brambles in the fortresses thereof: and it shall be an habitation of dragons, and a court for owls. 
The
797,the Philistines' garrison, there was a sharp rock on the one side, and a sharp rock on the other side: and the name of the one was Bozez, and the name of the other Seneh. 
The forefront of the one was situate northward over against Michmash, and the other southward over against Gibeah. 
And Jonathan said to the young man that bare his armour, Come, and let us go over unto the garrison of these uncircumcised: it may be that the LORD will work for us: for there is no restraint to the LORD to save by many or by few. 
And his armourbearer said unto him, Do all that is in thine heart: turn thee; behold, I am with thee according to thy heart. 
Then said Jonathan, Behold, we will pass over unto these men, and we will discover ourselves unto them. 
If they say thus unto us, Tarry until we come 
848,hem alive in famine. 
Our soul waiteth for the LORD: he is our help and our shield. 
For our heart shall rejoice in him, because we have trusted in his holy name. 
Let thy mercy, O LORD, be upon us, according as we hope in thee. 
I will bless the LORD at all times: his praise shall continually be in my mouth. 
My soul shall make her boast in the LORD: the humble shall hear thereof, and be glad. 
O magnify the LORD with me, and let us exalt his name together. 
I sought the LORD, and he heard me, and delivered me from all my fears. 
They looked unto him, and were lightened: and their faces were not ashamed. 
This poor man cried, and the LORD heard him, and saved him out of all his troubles. 
The angel of the LORD encampeth round about them that fear him, and delivereth them. 
O taste and see that the LORD is good: blessed is the man that 
752,red Hananiah the son of one of the apothecaries, and they fortified Jerusalem unto the broad wall. 
And next unto them repaired Rephaiah the son of Hur, the ruler of the half part of Jerusalem. 
And next unto them repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, even over against his house. And next unto him repaired Hattush the son of Hashabniah. 
Malchijah the son of Harim, and Hashub the son of Pahathmoab, repaired the other piece, and the tower of the furnaces. 
And next unto him repaired Shallum the son of Halohesh, the ruler of the half part of Jerusalem, he and his daughters. 
The valley gate repaired Hanun, and the inhabitants of Zanoah; they built it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof, and a thousand cubits o
826,e. 
When the wicked are multiplied, transgression increaseth: but the righteous shall see their fall. 
Correct thy son, and he shall give thee rest; yea, he shall give delight unto thy soul. 
Where there is no vision, the people perish: but he that keepeth the law, happy is he. 
A servant will not be corrected by words: for though he understand he will not answer. 
Seest thou a man that is hasty in his words? there is more hope of a fool than of him. 
He that delicately bringeth up his servant from a child shall have him become his son at the length. 
An angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in transgression. 
A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the humble in spirit. 
Whoso is partner with a thief hateth his own soul: he heareth cursing, and bewrayeth it not. 
The fear of 
905,r refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city, they shall take him into the city unto them, and give him a place, that he may dwell among them. 
And if the avenger of blood pursue after him, then they shall not deliver the slayer up into his hand; because he smote his neighbour unwittingly, and hated him not beforetime. 
And he shall dwell in that city, until he stand before the congregation for judgment, and until the death of the high priest that shall be in those days: then shall the slayer return, and come unto his own city, and unto his own house, unto the city from whence he fled. 
And they appointed Kedesh in Galilee in mount Naphtali, and Shechem in mount Ephraim, and Kirjatharba, which is Hebron, in the mountain of Judah. 

649,nd the living is my son. Thus they spake before the king. 
Then said the king, The one saith, This is my son that liveth, and thy son is the dead: and the other saith, Nay; but thy son is the dead, and my son is the living. 
And the king said, Bring me a sword. And they brought a sword before the king. 
And the king said, Divide the living child in two, and give half to the one, and half to the other. 
Then spake the woman whose the living child was unto the king, for her bowels yearned upon her son, and she said, O my lord, give her the living child, and in no wise slay it. But the other said, Let it be neither mine nor thine, but divide it
679,e came up out of Jordan on the tenth day of the first month, and encamped in Gilgal, in the east border of Jericho. 
And those twelve stones, which they took out of Jordan, did Joshua pitch in Gilgal. 
And he spake unto the children of Israel, saying, When your children shall ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean these stones? 
Then ye shall let your children know, saying, Israel came over this Jordan on dry land. 
For the LORD your God dried up the waters of Jordan from before you, until ye were passed over, as the LORD your God did to the Red sea, which he dried up from before us, until we were gone over: 
That all the people of the earth might know the 
716, brethren be enquired of, they are the messengers of the churches, and the glory of Christ. 
Wherefore shew ye to them, and before the churches, the proof of your love, and of our boasting on your behalf. 
For as touching the ministering to the saints, it is superfluous for me to write to you: 
For I know the forwardness of your mind, for which I boast of you to them of Macedonia, that Achaia was ready a year ago; and your zeal hath provoked very many. 
Yet have I sent the brethren, lest our boasting of you should be in vain in this behalf; that, as I said, ye may be ready: 
Lest haply if they of Macedonia come with me, and find you unprepared, we (that we say not, ye) should be ashamed in this same confide
744,ired Meshullam the son of Berechiah, the son of Meshezabeel. And next unto them repaired Zadok the son of Baana. 
And next unto them the Tekoites repaired; but their nobles put not their necks to the work of their LORD. 
Moreover the old gate repaired Jehoiada the son of Paseah, and Meshullam the son of Besodeiah; they laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, and the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
And next unto them repaired Melatiah the Gibeonite, and Jadon the Meronothite, the men of Gibeon, and of Mizpah, unto the throne of the governor on this side the river. 
Next unto him repaired Uzziel the son of Harhaiah, of the goldsmiths. Next unto him also repaired Hananiah the son of one of the apothecaries, and they f
955,hward, without the vail. 
And he set the bread in order upon it before the LORD; as the LORD had commanded Moses. 
And he put the candlestick in the tent of the congregation, over against the table, on the side of the tabernacle southward. 
And he lighted the lamps before the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he put the golden altar in the tent of the congregation before the vail: 
And he burnt sweet incense thereon; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he set up the hanging at the door of the tabernacle. 
And he put the altar of burnt offering by the door of the tabernacle of the tent of the congregation, and offered upon it the burnt offering and the meat offering; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he set the laver between the tent of the congregation and the altar, and put water there, to wash withal. 
And Moses and Aaron and his sons washed their hands and their feet thereat: 
When they went into the tent of the congregation, and when
850,th the trumpets. 
And Joshua had commanded the people, saying, Ye shall not shout, nor make any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the day I bid you shout; then shall ye shout. 
So the ark of the LORD compassed the city, going about it once: and they came into the camp, and lodged in the camp. 
And Joshua rose early in the morning, and the priests took up the ark of the LORD. 
And seven priests bearing seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of the LORD went on continually, and blew with the trumpets: and the armed men went before them; but the rereward came after the ark of the LORD, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And the second day they compassed the city once, and returned into the camp: so they did six days. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they rose 
737,there not a lie in my right hand? 
Remember these, O Jacob and Israel; for thou art my servant: I have formed thee; thou art my servant: O Israel, thou shalt not be forgotten of me. 
I have blotted out, as a thick cloud, thy transgressions, and, as a cloud, thy sins: return unto me; for I have redeemed thee. 
Sing, O ye heavens; for the LORD hath done it: shout, ye lower parts of the earth: break forth into singing, ye mountains, O forest, and every tree therein: for the LORD hath redeemed Jacob, and glorified himself in Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy redeemer, and he that formed thee from the womb, I am the LORD that maketh all things; that stretcheth forth the heavens alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by myself; 
That
888, mercy is great unto the heavens, and thy truth unto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: let thy glory be above all the earth. 
Do ye indeed speak righteousness, O congregation? do ye judge uprightly, O ye sons of men? 
Yea, in heart ye work wickedness; ye weigh the violence of your hands in the earth. 
The wicked are estranged from the womb: they go astray as soon as they be born, speaking lies. 
Their poison is like the poison of a serpent: they are like the deaf adder that stoppeth her ear; 
Which will not hearken to the voice of charmers, charming never so wisely. 
Break their teeth, O God, in their mouth: break out the great teeth of the young lions, O LORD. 
Let them melt away as waters which run continually: when he bendeth his bow to shoot his arrows, let them be as cut in pieces. 
As a snail which melteth, let every one of them pass away: like the
777, wine was before him: and I took up the wine, and gave it unto the king. Now I had not been beforetime sad in his presence. 
Wherefore the king said unto me, Why is thy countenance sad, seeing thou art not sick? this is nothing else but sorrow of heart. Then I was very sore afraid, 
And said unto the king, Let the king live for ever: why should not my countenance be sad, when the city, the place of my fathers' sepulchres, lieth waste, and the gates thereof are consumed with fire? 
Then the king said unto me, For what dost thou make request? So I prayed to the God of heaven. 
And I said unto the king, If it please the king, and if thy servant have found favour in thy sight, that thou wouldest send me unto Judah, unto the city of my fathers' sepulchres, that I may buil
865,joiceth: my flesh also shall rest in hope. 
For thou wilt not leave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou wilt shew me the path of life: in thy presence is fulness of joy; at thy right hand there are pleasures for evermore. 
Hear the right, O LORD, attend unto my cry, give ear unto my prayer, that goeth not out of feigned lips. 
Let my sentence come forth from thy presence; let thine eyes behold the things that are equal. 
Thou hast proved mine heart; thou hast visited me in the night; thou hast tried me, and shalt find nothing; I am purposed that my mouth shall not transgress. 
Concerning the works of men, by the word of thy lips I have kept me from the paths of the destroyer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear
769,for the slain of the daughter of my people! 
Oh that I had in the wilderness a lodging place of wayfaring men; that I might leave my people, and go from them! for they be all adulterers, an assembly of treacherous men. 
And they bend their tongues like their bow for lies: but they are not valiant for the truth upon the earth; for they proceed from evil to evil, and they know not me, saith the LORD. 
Take ye heed every one of his neighbour, and trust ye not in any brother: for every brother will utterly supplant, and every neighbour will walk with slanders. 
And they will deceive every one his neighbour, and will not speak the truth: they have taught their tongue to speak lies, and weary themselves to commit iniquity. 
Thine habitation is in the midst of decei
784,e? 
The burden of the desert of the sea. As whirlwinds in the south pass through; so it cometh from the desert, from a terrible land. 
A grievous vision is declared unto me; the treacherous dealer dealeth treacherously, and the spoiler spoileth. Go up, O Elam: besiege, O Media; all the sighing thereof have I made to cease. 
Therefore are my loins filled with pain: pangs have taken hold upon me, as the pangs of a woman that travaileth: I was bowed down at the hearing of it; I was dismayed at the seeing of it. 
My heart panted, fearfulness affrighted me: the night of my pleasure hath he turned into fear unto me. 
Prepare the table, watch in the watchtower, eat, drink: arise, ye princes, and anoint the shield. 
For thus hath the LORD said unto me, Go, set a watchman, let him d
934,gers of blood to destroy any more, lest they destroy my son. And he said, As the LORD liveth, there shall not one hair of thy son fall to the earth. 
Then the woman said, Let thine handmaid, I pray thee, speak one word unto my lord the king. And he said, Say on. 
And the woman said, Wherefore then hast thou thought such a thing against the people of God? for the king doth speak this thing as one which is faulty, in that the king doth not fetch home again his banished. 
For we must needs die, and are as water spilt on the ground, which cannot be gathered up again; neither doth God respect any person: yet doth he devise means, that his banished be not expelled from him. 
Now therefore that I am come to speak of this thing unto my lord the king, it is because the people have made me afraid: and thy handmaid said, I will now speak unto the king; it may be that the king will perform the request of his handmaid. 
For the king 
816,o the prophet, saying, 
The LORD hath been sore displeased with your fathers. 
Therefore say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye unto me, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will turn unto you, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Be ye not as your fathers, unto whom the former prophets have cried, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye now from your evil ways, and from your evil doings: but they did not hear, nor hearken unto me, saith the LORD. 
Your fathers, where are they? and the prophets, do they live for ever? 
But my words and my statutes, which I commanded my servants the prophets, did they not take hold of your fathers? and they returned and said, Like as the LORD of hosts thought to do unto us, according to our ways, and according to our doings, so hath he dealt with us. 
Upon the four
667,. 
And as they were loosing the colt, the owners thereof said unto them, Why loose ye the colt? 
And they said, The Lord hath need of him. 
And they brought him to Jesus: and they cast their garments upon the colt, and they set Jesus thereon. 
And as he went, they spread their clothes in the way. 
And when he was come nigh, even now at the descent of the mount of Olives, the whole multitude of the disciples began to rejoice and praise God with a loud voice for all the mighty works that they had seen; 
Saying, Blessed be the King that cometh in the name of the Lord: peace in heaven, and glory in the highest. 
And some of the Pharisees from among the multitude 
906,Lord Jesus Christ, when ye are gathered together, and my spirit, with the power of our Lord Jesus Christ, 
To deliver such an one unto Satan for the destruction of the flesh, that the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus. 
Your glorying is not good. Know ye not that a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump? 
Purge out therefore the old leaven, that ye may be a new lump, as ye are unleavened. For even Christ our passover is sacrificed for us: 
Therefore let us keep the feast, not with old leaven, neither with the leaven of malice and wickedness; but with the unleavened bread of sincerity and truth. 
I wrote unto you in an epistle not to company with fornicators: 
Yet not altogether with the fornicators of this world, or with the covetous, or extortioners, or with idolaters; for then must ye needs go out of the world. 
But now I have written unto you not to keep company, if any man t
922,the children of Phaseah, 
The children of Besai, the children of Meunim, the children of Nephishesim, 
The children of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the children of Harhur, 
The children of Bazlith, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha, 
The children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Tamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Perida, 
The children of Jaala, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 
The children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth of Zebaim, the children of Amon. 
All the Nethinims, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two. 
And these were they which went up also from Telmelah, Telharesha, Cherub, Addon, and Immer: but they could not shew their father's house, nor their seed, wheth
740, bow that is in the cloud in the day of rain, so was the appearance of the brightness round about. This was the appearance of the likeness of the glory of the LORD. And when I saw it, I fell upon my face, and I heard a voice of one that spake. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, stand upon thy feet, and I will speak unto thee. 
And the spirit entered into me when he spake unto me, and set me upon my feet, that I heard him that spake unto me. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, I send thee to the children of Israel, to a rebellious nation that hath rebelled against me: they and their fathers have transgressed against me, even unto this very day. 
For they are impudent children and stiffhearted. I do send thee unto them; and thou shalt 
876,, which Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore have ye not fulfilled your task in making brick both yesterday and to day, as heretofore? 
Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried unto Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dealest thou thus with thy servants? 
There is no straw given unto thy servants, and they say to us, Make brick: and, behold, thy servants are beaten; but the fault is in thine own people. 
But he said, Ye are idle, ye are idle: therefore ye say, Let us go and do sacrifice to the LORD. 
Go therefore now, and work; for there shall no straw be given you, yet shall ye deliver the tale of bricks. 
And the officers of the children of Israel did see that they were in evil case, after it was said, Ye shall not minish ought from your bricks of your daily task. 
And they met Moses and Aaron, who stood in the w
943,oman with child, so that her fruit depart from her, and yet no mischief follow: he shall be surely punished, according as the woman's husband will lay upon him; and he shall pay as the judges determine. 
And if any mischief follow, then thou shalt give life for life, 
Eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot, 
Burning for burning, wound for wound, stripe for stripe. 
And if a man smite the eye of his servant, or the eye of his maid, that it perish; he shall let him go free for his eye's sake. 
And if he smite out his manservant's tooth, or his maidservant's tooth; he shall let him go free for his tooth's sake. 
If an ox gore a man or a woman, that they die: then the ox shall be surely stoned, and his flesh shall not be eaten; but the owner of the ox shall be quit. 
But if the ox were wont to push with his horn in time past, and it hath been testified to his owner, and he hath not kept him in, but that he hath ki
674,they would not have crucified the Lord of glory. 
But as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. 
But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God. 
For what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man which is in him? even so the things of God knoweth no man, but the Spirit of God. 
Now we have received, not the spirit of the world, but the spirit which is of God; that we might know the things that are freely given to us of God. 
Which things also we speak, not in the words whic
831,, or of strangers? 
Peter saith unto him, Of strangers. Jesus saith unto him, Then are the children free. 
Notwithstanding, lest we should offend them, go thou to the sea, and cast an hook, and take up the fish that first cometh up; and when thou hast opened his mouth, thou shalt find a piece of money: that take, and give unto them for me and thee. 
At the same time came the disciples unto Jesus, saying, Who is the greatest in the kingdom of heaven? 
And Jesus called a little child unto him, and set him in the midst of them, 
And said, Verily I say unto you, Except ye be converted, and become as little children, ye shall not enter into the kingdom of heaven. 
Whosoever therefore shall humble himself as this little child, the same is greatest in the kingdom of heaven. 
And whoso shall receive one such little child in my 
946,hing to her. 
But Amnon had a friend, whose name was Jonadab, the son of Shimeah David's brother: and Jonadab was a very subtil man. 
And he said unto him, Why art thou, being the king's son, lean from day to day? wilt thou not tell me? And Amnon said unto him, I love Tamar, my brother Absalom's sister. 
And Jonadab said unto him, Lay thee down on thy bed, and make thyself sick: and when thy father cometh to see thee, say unto him, I pray thee, let my sister Tamar come, and give me meat, and dress the meat in my sight, that I may see it, and eat it at her hand. 
So Amnon lay down, and made himself sick: and when the king was come to see him, Amnon said unto the king, I pray thee, let Tamar my sister come, and make me a couple of cakes in my sight, that I may eat at her hand. 
Then David sent home to Tamar, saying, Go now to thy brother Amnon's house, and dress him meat. 
So Tamar went to her brother Amnon's house; and he was laid do
751,ld the great tumults in the midst thereof, and the oppressed in the midst thereof. 
For they know not to do right, saith the LORD, who store up violence and robbery in their palaces. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; An adversary there shall be even round about the land; and he shall bring down thy strength from thee, and thy palaces shall be spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD; As the shepherd taketh out of the mouth of the lion two legs, or a piece of an ear; so shall the children of Israel be taken out that dwell in Samaria in the corner of a bed, and in Damascus in a couch. 
Hear ye, and testify in the house of Jacob, saith the Lord GOD, the God of hosts, 
That in the day that I shall visit the transgressions of Israel upon him I will also v
896,palities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 
Whose are the fathers, and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ came, who is over all, God blessed for ever. Amen. 
Not as though the word of God hath taken none effect. For they are not all Israel, which are of Israel: 
Neither, because they are the seed of Abraham, are t
766,with me, and refresh thyself, and I will give thee a reward. 
And the man of God said unto the king, If thou wilt give me half thine house, I will not go in with thee, neither will I eat bread nor drink water in this place: 
For so was it charged me by the word of the LORD, saying, Eat no bread, nor drink water, nor turn again by the same way that thou camest. 
So he went another way, and returned not by the way that he came to Bethel. 
Now there dwelt an old prophet in Bethel; and his sons came and told him all the works that the man of God had done that day in Bethel: the words which he had spoken unto the king, them they told also to their father. 
And their father said unto them, What way went he? For his sons had seen what way the man of God went, whi
648,t as we hoped, but first gave their own selves to the Lord, and unto us by the will of God. 
Insomuch that we desired Titus, that as he had begun, so he would also finish in you the same grace also. 
Therefore, as ye abound in every thing, in faith, and utterance, and knowledge, and in all diligence, and in your love to us, see that ye abound in this grace also. 
I speak not by commandment, but by occasion of the forwardness of others, and to prove the sincerity of your love. 
For ye know the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ, that, though he was rich, yet for your sakes he became poor, that ye through his poverty might be rich. 
And herein I 
907,mong their own stuff. 
Therefore the children of Israel could not stand before their enemies, but turned their backs before their enemies, because they were accursed: neither will I be with you any more, except ye destroy the accursed from among you. 
Up, sanctify the people, and say, Sanctify yourselves against to morrow: for thus saith the LORD God of Israel, There is an accursed thing in the midst of thee, O Israel: thou canst not stand before thine enemies, until ye take away the accursed thing from among you. 
In the morning therefore ye shall be brought according to your tribes: and it shall be, that the tribe which the LORD taketh shall come according to the families thereof; and the family which the LORD shall take shall come by households; and the household which the LORD shall take shall come man by man. 
And it shall be, that he that is taken with the accursed thing shall be burnt wi
778,is become the head stone of the corner. 
This is the LORD's doing; it is marvellous in our eyes. 
This is the day which the LORD hath made; we will rejoice and be glad in it. 
Save now, I beseech thee, O LORD: O LORD, I beseech thee, send now prosperity. 
Blessed be he that cometh in the name of the LORD: we have blessed you out of the house of the LORD. 
God is the LORD, which hath shewed us light: bind the sacrifice with cords, even unto the horns of the altar. 
Thou art my God, and I will praise thee: thou art my God, I will exalt thee. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Blessed are the undefiled in the way, who walk in the law of the LORD. 
Blessed are they that keep his testimonies, and that seek him with the whole hea
713,s the voice of the Almighty, the voice of speech, as the noise of an host: when they stood, they let down their wings. 
And there was a voice from the firmament that was over their heads, when they stood, and had let down their wings. 
And above the firmament that was over their heads was the likeness of a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone: and upon the likeness of the throne was the likeness as the appearance of a man above upon it. 
And I saw as the colour of amber, as the appearance of fire round about within it, from the appearance of his loins even upward, and from the appearance of his loins even downward, I saw as it were the appearance of fire, and it had brightness round about. 
As t
814,retain the spirit; neither hath he power in the day of death: and there is no discharge in that war; neither shall wickedness deliver those that are given to it. 
All this have I seen, and applied my heart unto every work that is done under the sun: there is a time wherein one man ruleth over another to his own hurt. 
And so I saw the wicked buried, who had come and gone from the place of the holy, and they were forgotten in the city where they had so done: this is also vanity. 
Because sentence against an evil work is not executed speedily, therefore the heart of the sons of men is fully set in them to do evil. 
Though a sinner do evil an hundred times, and his days be prolonged, yet surely I know that it shall be well with them that fear God, which fear before him: 
But it shall not be well with the w
773, Kadeshbarnea. 
And I said unto you, Ye are come unto the mountain of the Amorites, which the LORD our God doth give unto us. 
Behold, the LORD thy God hath set the land before thee: go up and possess it, as the LORD God of thy fathers hath said unto thee; fear not, neither be discouraged. 
And ye came near unto me every one of you, and said, We will send men before us, and they shall search us out the land, and bring us word again by what way we must go up, and into what cities we shall come. 
And the saying pleased me well: and I took twelve men of you, one of a tribe: 
And they turned and went up into the mountain, and came unto the valley of Eshcol, and searched it out. 
And they took of the fruit of the land in their hands, and brought it down unto us, and b
895, upon the top, with pomegranates: and so did he for the other chapiter. 
And the chapiters that were upon the top of the pillars were of lily work in the porch, four cubits. 
And the chapiters upon the two pillars had pomegranates also above, over against the belly which was by the network: and the pomegranates were two hundred in rows round about upon the other chapiter. 
And he set up the pillars in the porch of the temple: and he set up the right pillar, and called the name thereof Jachin: and he set up the left pillar, and called the name thereof Boaz. 
And upon the top of the pillars was lily work: so was the work of the pillars finished. 
And he made a molten sea, ten cubits from the one brim to the other: it was round all about, and his height was five cubits: and a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about. 
And under the brim of it round about there were knops compas
744, upon my right hand, yet would I pluck thee thence; 
And I will give thee into the hand of them that seek thy life, and into the hand of them whose face thou fearest, even into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of the Chaldeans. 
And I will cast thee out, and thy mother that bare thee, into another country, where ye were not born; and there shall ye die. 
But to the land whereunto they desire to return, thither shall they not return. 
Is this man Coniah a despised broken idol? is he a vessel wherein is no pleasure? wherefore are they cast out, he and his seed, and are cast into a land which they know not? 
O earth, earth, earth, hear the word of the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD, Write ye this man childless, a
690,teacheth all men every where against the people, and the law, and this place: and further brought Greeks also into the temple, and hath polluted this holy place. 
(For they had seen before with him in the city Trophimus an Ephesian, whom they supposed that Paul had brought into the temple.) 
And all the city was moved, and the people ran together: and they took Paul, and drew him out of the temple: and forthwith the doors were shut. 
And as they went about to kill him, tidings came unto the chief captain of the band, that all Jerusalem was in an uproar. 
Who immediately took soldiers and centurions, and ran down unto them: and when they saw the chief captain and the soldiers, they 
905,her shall ye make any offering thereof in your land. 
Neither from a stranger's hand shall ye offer the bread of your God of any of these; because their corruption is in them, and blemishes be in them: they shall not be accepted for you. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
When a bullock, or a sheep, or a goat, is brought forth, then it shall be seven days under the dam; and from the eighth day and thenceforth it shall be accepted for an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And whether it be cow, or ewe, ye shall not kill it and her young both in one day. 
And when ye will offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving unto the LORD, offer it at your own will. 
On the same day it shall be eaten up; ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed among the ch
852,against our master, and against all his household: for he is such a son of Belial, that a man cannot speak to him. 
Then Abigail made haste, and took two hundred loaves, and two bottles of wine, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of parched corn, and an hundred clusters of raisins, and two hundred cakes of figs, and laid them on asses. 
And she said unto her servants, Go on before me; behold, I come after you. But she told not her husband Nabal. 
And it was so, as she rode on the ass, that she came down by the covert on the hill, and, behold, David and his men came down against her; and she met them. 
Now David had said, Surely in vain have I kept all that this fellow hath in the wilderness, so that nothing was missed of all that pertained unto him: and he hath requited me evil for good. 
So and more also do God unto the enemie
787,h long patience for it, until he receive the early and latter rain. 
Be ye also patient; stablish your hearts: for the coming of the Lord draweth nigh. 
Grudge not one against another, brethren, lest ye be condemned: behold, the judge standeth before the door. 
Take, my brethren, the prophets, who have spoken in the name of the Lord, for an example of suffering affliction, and of patience. 
Behold, we count them happy which endure. Ye have heard of the patience of Job, and have seen the end of the Lord; that the Lord is very pitiful, and of tender mercy. 
But above all things, my brethren, swear not, neither by heaven, neither by the earth, neither by any other oath: but let your yea be yea; and your nay, nay; lest ye fall into condemnation. 
Is any among you afflicted? let hi
758, 
On the left hand, where he doth work, but I cannot behold him: he hideth himself on the right hand, that I cannot see him: 
But he knoweth the way that I take: when he hath tried me, I shall come forth as gold. 
My foot hath held his steps, his way have I kept, and not declined. 
Neither have I gone back from the commandment of his lips; I have esteemed the words of his mouth more than my necessary food. 
But he is in one mind, and who can turn him? and what his soul desireth, even that he doeth. 
For he performeth the thing that is appointed for me: and many such things are with him. 
Therefore am I troubled at his presence: when I consider, I am afraid of him. 
For God maketh my heart soft, and the Almighty troubleth me: 
Because I was not cut 
823, wine or strong drink: that ye might know that I am the LORD your God. 
And when ye came unto this place, Sihon the king of Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, came out against us unto battle, and we smote them: 
And we took their land, and gave it for an inheritance unto the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to the half tribe of Manasseh. 
Keep therefore the words of this covenant, and do them, that ye may prosper in all that ye do. 
Ye stand this day all of you before the LORD your God; your captains of your tribes, your elders, and your officers, with all the men of Israel, 
Your little ones, your wives, and thy stranger that is in thy camp, from the hewer of thy wood unto the drawer of thy water: 
That thou shouldest enter into covenant with the LORD thy God, and into his oath, which the LORD thy God maket
845,ade partakers of their spiritual things, their duty is also to minister unto them in carnal things. 
When therefore I have performed this, and have sealed to them this fruit, I will come by you into Spain. 
And I am sure that, when I come unto you, I shall come in the fulness of the blessing of the gospel of Christ. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, for the Lord Jesus Christ's sake, and for the love of the Spirit, that ye strive together with me in your prayers to God for me; 
That I may be delivered from them that do not believe in Judaea; and that my service which I have for Jerusalem may be accepted of the saints; 
That I may come unto you with joy by the will of God, and may with you be refreshed. 
Now the God of peace be with you all. Amen. 
I commend unto you Phebe our sister, which is a servant of the church which is at Cenchrea: 
690,r armies? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hear my cry, O God; attend unto my prayer. 
From the end of the earth will I cry unto thee, when my heart is overwhelmed: lead me to the rock that is higher than I. 
For thou hast been a shelter for me, and a strong tower from the enemy. 
I will abide in thy tabernacle for ever: I will trust in the covert of thy wings. Selah. 
For thou, O God, hast heard my vows: thou hast given me the heritage of those that fear thy name. 
Thou wilt prolong the king's life: and his years as many generations. 
He shall abide before God for ever: O p
899,es. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and stand before Pharaoh, and say unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may serve me. 
For I will at this time send all my plagues upon thine heart, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people; that thou mayest know that there is none like me in all the earth. 
For now I will stretch out my hand, that I may smite thee and thy people with pestilence; and thou shalt be cut off from the earth. 
And in very deed for this cause have I raised thee up, for to shew in thee my power; and that my name may be declared throughout all the earth. 
As yet exaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt not let them go? 
Behold, to morrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very grievous hail, such as hath not been in Egypt since the foundation thereof even until now. 
Send therefore no
699,he times that went over him, and over Israel, and over all the kingdoms of the countries. 
And Solomon the son of David was strengthened in his kingdom, and the LORD his God was with him, and magnified him exceedingly. 
Then Solomon spake unto all Israel, to the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and to the judges, and to every governor in all Israel, the chief of the fathers. 
So Solomon, and all the congregation with him, went to the high place that was at Gibeon; for there was the tabernacle of the congregation of God, which Moses the servant of the LORD had made in the wilderness. 
But the ark of God had David brought up from Kirjathjearim to the place which David had prepared for i
690,ng of kings, and Lord of lords; 
Who only hath immortality, dwelling in the light which no man can approach unto; whom no man hath seen, nor can see: to whom be honour and power everlasting. Amen. 
Charge them that are rich in this world, that they be not highminded, nor trust in uncertain riches, but in the living God, who giveth us richly all things to enjoy; 
That they do good, that they be rich in good works, ready to distribute, willing to communicate; 
Laying up in store for themselves a good foundation against the time to come, that they may lay hold on eternal life. 
O Timothy, keep that which is committed to thy trust, avoiding profane and vain babblings, and oppositions o
813, to pass we may do thee honour? 
And the angel of the LORD said unto him, Why askest thou thus after my name, seeing it is secret? 
So Manoah took a kid with a meat offering, and offered it upon a rock unto the LORD: and the angel did wonderously; and Manoah and his wife looked on. 
For it came to pass, when the flame went up toward heaven from off the altar, that the angel of the LORD ascended in the flame of the altar. And Manoah and his wife looked on it, and fell on their faces to the ground. 
But the angel of the LORD did no more appear to Manoah and to his wife. Then Manoah knew that he was an angel of the LORD. 
And Manoah said unto his wife, We shall surely die, because we have seen God. 
But his wife said unto him, If the LORD were pleased to kill us, he would not have received a burnt offerin
655,d, Gideon the son of Joash hath done this thing. 
Then the men of the city said unto Joash, Bring out thy son, that he may die: because he hath cast down the altar of Baal, and because he hath cut down the grove that was by it. 
And Joash said unto all that stood against him, Will ye plead for Baal? will ye save him? he that will plead for him, let him be put to death whilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal plead against him, because he hath thrown down his altar. 
Then all the Midianites and the Amalekites and the ch
931,hou wilt, let us make here three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias. 
While he yet spake, behold, a bright cloud overshadowed them: and behold a voice out of the cloud, which said, This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased; hear ye him. 
And when the disciples heard it, they fell on their face, and were sore afraid. 
And Jesus came and touched them, and said, Arise, and be not afraid. 
And when they had lifted up their eyes, they saw no man, save Jesus only. 
And as they came down from the mountain, Jesus charged them, saying, Tell the vision to no man, until the Son of man be risen again from the dead. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Elias truly shall first come, and restore all things. 
But I say unto you, That Elias is come already, and they knew him not, but have done unto him wha
859,all come to pass, that when the Lord hath performed his whole work upon mount Zion and on Jerusalem, I will punish the fruit of the stout heart of the king of Assyria, and the glory of his high looks. 
For he saith, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by my wisdom; for I am prudent: and I have removed the bounds of the people, and have robbed their treasures, and I have put down the inhabitants like a valiant man: 
And my hand hath found as a nest the riches of the people: and as one gathereth eggs that are left, have I gathered all the earth; and there was none that moved the wing, or opened the mouth, or peeped. 
Shall the axe boast itself against him that heweth therewith? or shall the saw magnify itself against him that shaketh it? as if the rod should shake itself against them that lift it up, or as if the staff should lift up itse
945,nd brought him unto the house of the LORD in Shiloh: and the child was young. 
And they slew a bullock, and brought the child to Eli. 
And she said, Oh my lord, as thy soul liveth, my lord, I am the woman that stood by thee here, praying unto the LORD. 
For this child I prayed; and the LORD hath given me my petition which I asked of him: 
Therefore also I have lent him to the LORD; as long as he liveth he shall be lent to the LORD. And he worshipped the LORD there. 
And Hannah prayed, and said, My heart rejoiceth in the LORD, mine horn is exalted in the LORD: my mouth is enlarged over mine enemies; because I rejoice in thy salvation. 
There is none holy as the LORD: for there is none beside thee: neither is there any rock like our God. 
Talk no more so exceeding proudly; let not arrogancy come out of your mouth: for the LORD is a God of knowledge, and by him actions are weighed. 
The bows of the mighty men are broken, and they that
734,aptains, and the king's counsellors, being gathered together, saw these men, upon whose bodies the fire had no power, nor was an hair of their head singed, neither were their coats changed, nor the smell of fire had passed on them. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar spake, and said, Blessed be the God of Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, who hath sent his angel, and delivered his servants that trusted in him, and have changed the king's word, and yielded their bodies, that they might not serve nor worship any god, except their own God. 
Therefore I make a decree, That every people, nation, and language, which speak any thing amiss against the God of Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, shall be cut in pieces, and their houses shall be made a d
925,ld them into the hands of the Philistines, and into the hands of the children of Ammon. 
And that year they vexed and oppressed the children of Israel: eighteen years, all the children of Israel that were on the other side Jordan in the land of the Amorites, which is in Gilead. 
Moreover the children of Ammon passed over Jordan to fight also against Judah, and against Benjamin, and against the house of Ephraim; so that Israel was sore distressed. 
And the children of Israel cried unto the LORD, saying, We have sinned against thee, both because we have forsaken our God, and also served Baalim. 
And the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Did not I deliver you from the Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines? 
The Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I delivered you out of their hand. 
Yet ye have forsaken m
957,d in Jerusalem, and before his ancients gloriously. 
O Lord, thou art my God; I will exalt thee, I will praise thy name; for thou hast done wonderful things; thy counsels of old are faithfulness and truth. 
For thou hast made of a city an heap; of a defenced city a ruin: a palace of strangers to be no city; it shall never be built. 
Therefore shall the strong people glorify thee, the city of the terrible nations shall fear thee. 
For thou hast been a strength to the poor, a strength to the needy in his distress, a refuge from the storm, a shadow from the heat, when the blast of the terrible ones is as a storm against the wall. 
Thou shalt bring down the noise of strangers, as the heat in a dry place; even the heat with the shadow of a cloud: the branch of the terrible ones shall be brought low. 
And in this mountain shall the LORD of hosts make unto all people a feast of fat things, a feast of wines on the lees, of fat things full of marrow, o
686,, if ye will go armed before the LORD to war, 
And will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless before the LORD, and before Israel; and this land shall be your possession before the LORD. 
But if ye will not do so, behold, ye have sinned against the LORD: and be sure your sin will find you out. 
Build you cities for your little ones, and folds for your sheep; and do that which hath proceeded out of your mouth. 
And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben spake unto Moses, saying, Thy servants will do as my lord commande
942,all that are with me, then blow ye the trumpets also on every side of all the camp, and say, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
So Gideon, and the hundred men that were with him, came unto the outside of the camp in the beginning of the middle watch; and they had but newly set the watch: and they blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers that were in their hands. 
And the three companies blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers, and held the lamps in their left hands, and the trumpets in their right hands to blow withal: and they cried, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
And they stood every man in his place round about the camp; and all the host ran, and cried, and fled. 
And the three hundred blew the trumpets, and the LORD set every man's sword against his fellow, even throughout all the host: and the host fled to Bethshittah in Zererath, and to the border of Abelmeholah, unto Tabbath. 
And the men of Israel gathered
740,is was manifested the love of God toward us, because that God sent his only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through him. 
Herein is love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for our sins. 
Beloved, if God so loved us, we ought also to love one another. 
No man hath seen God at any time. If we love one another, God dwelleth in us, and his love is perfected in us. 
Hereby know we that we dwell in him, and he in us, because he hath given us of his Spirit. 
And we have seen and do testify that the Father sent the Son to be the Saviour of the world. 
Whosoever shall confess that Jesus is the Son of God, God dwelleth in him, and he in God. 
And we have known and believed t
721,place where the feet of the priests which bare the ark of the covenant stood: and they are there unto this day. 
For the priests which bare the ark stood in the midst of Jordan, until everything was finished that the LORD commanded Joshua to speak unto the people, according to all that Moses commanded Joshua: and the people hasted and passed over. 
And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over, that the ark of the LORD passed over, and the priests, in the presence of the people. 
And the children of Reuben, and the children of Gad, and half the tribe of Manasseh, passed over armed before the children of Israel, as Moses spake unto them: 
About forty thousand prepared for war passed over before 
651,is servants, together with the woman, compelled him; and he hearkened unto their voice. So he arose from the earth, and sat upon the bed. 
And the woman had a fat calf in the house; and she hasted, and killed it, and took flour, and kneaded it, and did bake unleavened bread thereof: 
And she brought it before Saul, and before his servants; and they did eat. Then they rose up, and went away that night. 
Now the Philistines gathered together all their armies to Aphek: and the Israelites pitched by a fountain which is in Jezreel. 
And the lords of the Philistines passed on by hundreds, and by thousands: but David and his men passed on in the rere
651,st me, and let not the hand of the wicked remove me. 
There are the workers of iniquity fallen: they are cast down, and shall not be able to rise. 
Fret not thyself because of evildoers, neither be thou envious against the workers of iniquity. 
For they shall soon be cut down like the grass, and wither as the green herb. 
Trust in the LORD, and do good; so shalt thou dwell in the land, and verily thou shalt be fed. 
Delight thyself also in the LORD: and he shall give thee the desires of thine heart. 
Commit thy way unto the LORD; trust also in him; and he shall bring it to pass. 
And he shall bring forth thy righteousness as the light, and thy
667,eep the passover. 
And they kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month at even in the wilderness of Sinai: according to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so did the children of Israel. 
And there were certain men, who were defiled by the dead body of a man, that they could not keep the passover on that day: and they came before Moses and before Aaron on that day: 
And those men said unto him, We are defiled by the dead body of a man: wherefore are we kept back, that we may not offer an offering of the LORD in his appointed season among the children of Israel? 
And Moses said unto them, Stand still, and I will hear what the LORD will command c
707, a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people. 
And there came in two men, children of Belial, and sat before him: and the men of Belial witnessed against him, even against Naboth, in the presence of the people, saying, Naboth did blaspheme God and the king. Then they carried him forth out of the city, and stoned him with stones, that he died. 
Then they sent to Jezebel, saying, Naboth is stoned, and is dead. 
And it came to pass, when Jezebel heard that Naboth was stoned, and was dead, that Jezebel said to Ahab, Arise, take possession of the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give thee for money: for Naboth is not alive, but dead. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab heard that N
790, the hearers. 
And grieve not the holy Spirit of God, whereby ye are sealed unto the day of redemption. 
Let all bitterness, and wrath, and anger, and clamour, and evil speaking, be put away from you, with all malice: 
And be ye kind one to another, tenderhearted, forgiving one another, even as God for Christ's sake hath forgiven you. 
Be ye therefore followers of God, as dear children; 
And walk in love, as Christ also hath loved us, and hath given himself for us an offering and a sacrifice to God for a sweetsmelling savour. 
But fornication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not be once named among you, as becometh saints; 
Neither filthiness, nor foolish talking, nor jesting, which are not convenient: but rather giving of thanks. 
For this ye know, that no whoremong
758,n Jerusalem: and since that time even until now hath it been in building, and yet it is not finished. 
Now therefore, if it seem good to the king, let there be search made in the king's treasure house, which is there at Babylon, whether it be so, that a decree was made of Cyrus the king to build this house of God at Jerusalem, and let the king send his pleasure to us concerning this matter. 
Then Darius the king made a decree, and search was made in the house of the rolls, where the treasures were laid up in Babylon. 
And there was found at Achmetha, in the palace that is in the province of the Medes, a roll, and therein was a record thus written: 
In the first year of Cyrus the king the same Cyrus the king made a decree concerning the house of God
856,image and superscription? 
They say unto him, Caesar's. Then saith he unto them, Render therefore unto Caesar the things which are Caesar's; and unto God the things that are God's. 
When they had heard these words, they marvelled, and left him, and went their way. 
The same day came to him the Sadducees, which say that there is no resurrection, and asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses said, If a man die, having no children, his brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were with us seven brethren: and the first, when he had married a wife, deceased, and, having no issue, left his wife unto his brother: 
Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the seventh. 
And last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife shall she be of the seven? for they all had her. 
Jesus answered and said 
767,oor for silver, and the needy for a pair of shoes; yea, and sell the refuse of the wheat? 
The LORD hath sworn by the excellency of Jacob, Surely I will never forget any of their works. 
Shall not the land tremble for this, and every one mourn that dwelleth therein? and it shall rise up wholly as a flood; and it shall be cast out and drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the Lord GOD, that I will cause the sun to go down at noon, and I will darken the earth in the clear day: 
And I will turn your feasts into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day.
790,was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, then Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab. 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zechariah, and Mikloth. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeam. And they also dwelt with their brethren at Jerusalem, over against their brethren. 
And Ner begat Kish; and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchishua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal. 
And the son of Jonathan was Meribbaal: and Meribbaal begat Micah. 
And the sons of Micah were, Pithon, and Melech, and Tahrea, and Ahaz. 
And Ahaz begat Jarah; and Jarah begat Alemeth, and Azmaveth, and Zimri; and Zimri begat Moza; 
And Moza begat Binea; and Rephaiah his son, Eleasah his son, Azel his son. 
And Azel had six sons, whose names are these, Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan: t
770,nd the altar, and them that worship therein. 
But the court which is without the temple leave out, and measure it not; for it is given unto the Gentiles: and the holy city shall they tread under foot forty and two months. 
And I will give power unto my two witnesses, and they shall prophesy a thousand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth. 
These are the two olive trees, and the two candlesticks standing before the God of the earth. 
And if any man will hurt them, fire proceedeth out of their mouth, and devoureth their enemies: and if any man will hurt them, he must in this manner be killed. 
These have power to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of their prophecy: and have power over waters to turn them to blood, and to smite the earth 
710,e saw the thunderings, and the lightnings, and the noise of the trumpet, and the mountain smoking: and when the people saw it, they removed, and stood afar off. 
And they said unto Moses, Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but let not God speak with us, lest we die. 
And Moses said unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not. 
And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick darkness where God was. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the children of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from heaven. 
Ye shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make unto you gods of
798,. 
And if the bright spot stay in his place, and spread not in the skin, but it be somewhat dark; it is a rising of the burning, and the priest shall pronounce him clean: for it is an inflammation of the burning. 
If a man or woman have a plague upon the head or the beard; 
Then the priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and,
813, thee this day, to do them. 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, if ye hearken to these judgments, and keep, and do them, that the LORD thy God shall keep unto thee the covenant and the mercy which he sware unto thy fathers: 
And he will love thee, and bless thee, and multiply thee: he will also bless the fruit of thy womb, and the fruit of thy land, thy corn, and thy wine, and thine oil, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep, in the land which he sware unto thy fathers to give thee. 
Thou shalt be blessed above all people: there shall not be male or female barren among you, or among your cattle. 
And the LORD will take away from thee all sickness, and will put none of the evil diseases of Egypt, which thou knowest, upon thee; but will lay them upon all them that hate thee. 
And thou shalt
849,h, first apostles, secondarily prophets, thirdly teachers, after that miracles, then gifts of healings, helps, governments, diversities of tongues. 
Are all apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all workers of miracles? 
Have all the gifts of healing? do all speak with tongues? do all interpret? 
But covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way. 
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing.
646, made of these things unto the LORD: and when it is presented unto the priest, he shall bring it unto the altar. 
And the priest shall take from the meat offering a memorial thereof, and shall burn it upon the altar: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And that which is left of the meat offering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a thing most holy of the offerings of the LORD made by fire. 
No meat offering, which ye shall bring unto the LORD, shall be made with leaven: for ye shall burn no leaven, nor any honey, in any offering of the LORD made by fire. 
As for the oblation of the firstfruits, ye shall of
859, Colosse: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We give thanks to God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying always for you, 
Since we heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints, 
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit. 
For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will i
882, in his place. 
And Jacob said unto them, My brethren, whence be ye? And they said, Of Haran are we. 
And he said unto them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor? And they said, We know him. 
And he said unto them, Is he well? And they said, He is well: and, behold, Rachel his daughter cometh with the sheep. 
And he said, Lo, it is yet high day, neither is it time that the cattle should be gathered together: water ye the sheep, and go and feed them. 
And they said, We cannot, until all the flocks be gathered together, and till they roll the stone from the well's mouth; then we water the sheep. 
And while he yet spake with them, Rachel came with her father's sheep; for she kept them. 
And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mout
913,hall burn it in the appointed place of the house, without the sanctuary. 
And on the second day thou shalt offer a kid of the goats without blemish for a sin offering; and they shall cleanse the altar, as they did cleanse it with the bullock. 
When thou hast made an end of cleansing it, thou shalt offer a young bullock without blemish, and a ram out of the flock without blemish. 
And thou shalt offer them before the LORD, and the priests shall cast salt upon them, and they shall offer them up for a burnt offering unto the LORD. 
Seven days shalt thou prepare every day a goat for a sin offering: they shall also prepare a young bullock, and a ram out of the flock, without blemish. 
Seven days shall they purge the altar and purify it; and they shall consecrate themselves. 
And when these days are expired, it shall be, that upon the eighth day, and so forward, the priests shall make your burnt offerings 
796,tion of them that hate me, 
And shewing mercy unto thousands of them that love me and keep my commandments. 
Thou shalt not take the name of the LORD thy God in vain: for the LORD will not hold him guiltless that taketh his name in vain. 
Keep the sabbath day to sanctify it, as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee. 
Six days thou shalt labour, and do all thy work: 
But the seventh day is the sabbath of the LORD thy God: in it thou shalt not do any work, thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, nor thy manservant, nor thy maidservant, nor thine ox, nor thine ass, nor any of thy cattle, nor thy stranger that is within thy gates; that thy manservant and thy maidservant may rest as well as thou. 
And remember that thou wast a servant in the land of Egypt, and that the LORD thy God brought thee
653, exceeding glad: for he was desirous to see him of a long season, because he had heard many things of him; and he hoped to have seen some miracle done by him. 
Then he questioned with him in many words; but he answered him nothing. 
And the chief priests and scribes stood and vehemently accused him. 
And Herod with his men of war set him at nought, and mocked him, and arrayed him in a gorgeous robe, and sent him again to Pilate. 
And the same day Pilate and Herod were made friends together: for before they were at enmity between themselves. 
And Pilate, when he had called together the chief priests and the rulers and the people, 
Said unto them,
926,all have done to my lord according to all the good that he hath spoken concerning thee, and shall have appointed thee ruler over Israel; 
That this shall be no grief unto thee, nor offence of heart unto my lord, either that thou hast shed blood causeless, or that my lord hath avenged himself: but when the LORD shall have dealt well with my lord, then remember thine handmaid. 
And David said to Abigail, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which sent thee this day to meet me: 
And blessed be thy advice, and blessed be thou, which hast kept me this day from coming to shed blood, and from avenging myself with mine own hand. 
For in very deed, as the LORD God of Israel liveth, which hath kept me back from hurting thee, except thou hadst hasted and come to meet me, surely there had not been left unto Nabal by the morning light any that pisseth against the wall. 
So David received of her hand that which she had brought h
677, by his understanding he smiteth through the proud. 
By his spirit he hath garnished the heavens; his hand hath formed the crooked serpent. 
Lo, these are parts of his ways: but how little a portion is heard of him? but the thunder of his power who can understand? 
Moreover Job continued his parable, and said, 
As God liveth, who hath taken away my judgment; and the Almighty, who hath vexed my soul; 
All the while my breath is in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils; 
My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter deceit. 
God forbid that I should justify you: till I die I will not remove mine integrity from me. 
My righteousness I hold fast, and will n
720,od? 
Jesus answered and said unto them, This is the work of God, that ye believe on him whom he hath sent. 
They said therefore unto him, What sign shewest thou then, that we may see, and believe thee? what dost thou work? 
Our fathers did eat manna in the desert; as it is written, He gave them bread from heaven to eat. 
Then Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Moses gave you not that bread from heaven; but my Father giveth you the true bread from heaven. 
For the bread of God is he which cometh down from heaven, and giveth life unto the world. 
Then said they unto him, Lord, evermore give us this bread. 
And Jesus said unto them, I am the bread of life: he that cometh to me shall never hunger
701,be sanctified in you before their eyes. 
For I will take you from among the heathen, and gather you out of all countries, and will bring you into your own land. 
Then will I sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean: from all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I cleanse you. 
A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put within you: and I will take away the stony heart out of your flesh, and I will give you an heart of flesh. 
And I will put my spirit within you, and cause you to walk in my statutes, and ye shall keep my judgments, and do them. 
And ye shall dwell in the land that I gave to your fathers; and ye shall be my people, and I will be your God.
958,g, ye should walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antichrist. 
Look to yourselves, that we lose not those things which we have wrought, but that we receive a full reward. 
Whosoever transgresseth, and abideth not in the doctrine of Christ, hath not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. 
If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed: 
For he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds. 
Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with paper and ink: but I trust to come unto you, and speak face to face, that our joy may be full. 
The children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen. 
The elder unto the wellbeloved Gaius, whom I love in the truth. 
Beloved, I wish above all things that thou mayest prosper an
916,with thee in your land, ye shall not vex him. 
But the stranger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one born among you, and thou shalt love him as thyself; for ye were strangers in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in judgment, in meteyard, in weight, or in measure. 
Just balances, just weights, a just ephah, and a just hin, shall ye have: I am the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt. 
Therefore shall ye observe all my statutes, and all my judgments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Again, thou shalt say to the children of Israel, Whosoever he be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that giveth any of his seed unto Molech; he shall surely be put to death: the people of the land shall stone him with stones. 
And I will set my face against that man, and will cut him 
822,ereof are coals of fire, which hath a most vehement flame. 
Many waters cannot quench love, neither can the floods drown it: if a man would give all the substance of his house for love, it would utterly be contemned. 
We have a little sister, and she hath no breasts: what shall we do for our sister in the day when she shall be spoken for? 
If she be a wall, we will build upon her a palace of silver: and if she be a door, we will inclose her with boards of cedar. 
I am a wall, and my breasts like towers: then was I in his eyes as one that found favour. 
Solomon had a vineyard at Baalhamon; he let out the vineyard unto keepers; every one for the fruit thereof was to bring a thousand pieces of silver. 
My vineyard, which is mine, is before me: thou, O Solomon, must have a thousand, and those that keep the fruit th
688,r the mouth of the LORD hath spoken it. 
The voice said, Cry. And he said, What shall I cry? All flesh is grass, and all the goodliness thereof is as the flower of the field: 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: because the spirit of the LORD bloweth upon it: surely the people is grass. 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: but the word of our God shall stand for ever. 
O Zion, that bringest good tidings, get thee up into the high mountain; O Jerusalem, that bringest good tidings, lift up thy voice with strength; lift it up, be not afraid; say unto the cities of Judah, Behold your God! 
Behold, the Lord GOD will come with strong hand, and his arm shall rule for him: behold
826,ady, that if any man did confess that he was Christ, he should be put out of the synagogue. 
Therefore said his parents, He is of age; ask him. 
Then again called they the man that was blind, and said unto him, Give God the praise: we know that this man is a sinner. 
He answered and said, Whether he be a sinner or no, I know not: one thing I know, that, whereas I was blind, now I see. 
Then said they to him again, What did he to thee? how opened he thine eyes? 
He answered them, I have told you already, and ye did not hear: wherefore would ye hear it again? will ye also be his disciples? 
Then they reviled him, and said, Thou art his disciple; but we are Moses' disciples. 
We know that God spake unto Moses: as for this fellow, we know not from whence he is. 
The man answered and said unto them, Why herein is a marv
743,e LORD, O my soul. O LORD my God, thou art very great; thou art clothed with honour and majesty. 
Who coverest thyself with light as with a garment: who stretchest out the heavens like a curtain: 
Who layeth the beams of his chambers in the waters: who maketh the clouds his chariot: who walketh upon the wings of the wind: 
Who maketh his angels spirits; his ministers a flaming fire: 
Who laid the foundations of the earth, that it should not be removed for ever. 
Thou coveredst it with the deep as with a garment: the waters stood above the mountains. 
At thy rebuke they fled; at the voice of thy thunder they hasted away. 
They go up by the mountains; they go down by the valleys unto the place which thou hast founded for them. 
Thou ha
732,their eyes, and saw the ark, and rejoiced to see it. 
And the cart came into the field of Joshua, a Bethshemite, and stood there, where there was a great stone: and they clave the wood of the cart, and offered the kine a burnt offering unto the LORD. 
And the Levites took down the ark of the LORD, and the coffer that was with it, wherein the jewels of gold were, and put them on the great stone: and the men of Bethshemesh offered burnt offerings and sacrificed sacrifices the same day unto the LORD. 
And when the five lords of the Philistines had seen it, they returned to Ekron the same day. 
And these are the golden emerods which the Philistines returned for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, f
713,y Babylon shall be astonished, and hiss at all her plagues. 
Put yourselves in array against Babylon round about: all ye that bend the bow, shoot at her, spare no arrows: for she hath sinned against the LORD. 
Shout against her round about: she hath given her hand: her foundations are fallen, her walls are thrown down: for it is the vengeance of the LORD: take vengeance upon her; as she hath done, do unto her. 
Cut off the sower from Babylon, and him that handleth the sickle in the time of harvest: for fear of the oppressing sword they shall turn every one to his people, and they shall flee every one to his own land. 
Israel is a scattered sheep; the lions have driven him away: first the king of Assyria 
804,all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he hath said unto you. 
Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known. 
And it shall come to pass, when the LORD thy God hath brought thee in unto the land whither thou goest to possess it, that thou shalt put the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the curse upon mount Ebal. 
Are they not on the other side Jordan, by the way where the sun goeth down, in the land of the Canaanites, which dwell in the champaign over against Gilgal, beside the plains of Moreh? 
For ye shall pa
787,im begat Azor; 
And Azor begat Sadoc; and Sadoc begat Achim; and Achim begat Eliud; 
And Eliud begat Eleazar; and Eleazar begat Matthan; and Matthan begat Jacob; 
And Jacob begat Joseph the husband of Mary, of whom was born Jesus, who is called Christ. 
So all the generations from Abraham to David are fourteen generations; and from David until the carrying away into Babylon are fourteen generations; and from the carrying away into Babylon unto Christ are fourteen generations. 
Now the birth of Jesus Christ was on this wise: When as his mother Mary was espoused to Joseph, before they came together, she was found with child of the Holy Ghost. 
Then Joseph her husband, being a just man, and not willing to make her a publick example, was minded to put her away privily. 
But while 
869,th out of the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and hast gotten thee renown, as at this day; we have sinned, we have done wickedly. 
O LORD, according to all thy righteousness, I beseech thee, let thine anger and thy fury be turned away from thy city Jerusalem, thy holy mountain: because for our sins, and for the iniquities of our fathers, Jerusalem and thy people are become a reproach to all that are about us. 
Now therefore, O our God, hear the prayer of thy servant, and his supplications, and cause thy face to shine upon thy sanctuary that is desolate, for the Lord's sake. 
O my God, incline thine ear, and hear; open thine eyes, and behold our desolations, and the city which is called by thy name: for we do not present our supplications before thee for our righteousnesses, but for thy great mercies. 
O Lord, hear; O Lord, forgive; O Lord, hearken and do;
809, and said, Why could not we cast him out? 
And Jesus said unto them, Because of your unbelief: for verily I say unto you, If ye have faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible unto you. 
Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting. 
And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son of man shall be betrayed into the hands of men: 
And they shall kill him, and the third day he shall be raised again. And they were exceeding sorry. 
And when they were come to Capernaum, they that received tribute money came to Peter, and said, Doth not your master pay tribute? 
He saith, Yes. And when he was come into the house, Jesus prevented him, saying, What thinkest thou, Simon? of 
864,d down: the LORD loveth the righteous: 
The LORD preserveth the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless and widow: but the way of the wicked he turneth upside down. 
The LORD shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD: for it is good to sing praises unto our God; for it is pleasant; and praise is comely. 
The LORD doth build up Jerusalem: he gathereth together the outcasts of Israel. 
He healeth the broken in heart, and bindeth up their wounds. 
He telleth the number of the stars; he calleth them all by their names. 
Great is our Lord, and of great power: his understanding is infinite. 
The LORD lifteth up the meek: he casteth the wicked down to the ground. 
Sing unto the LORD with thanksgiving; sing praise upon the harp unto our God: 
Who covereth the heaven with clouds, who prepareth rain 
695,t. 
They shall roar together like lions: they shall yell as lions' whelps. 
In their heat I will make their feasts, and I will make them drunken, that they may rejoice, and sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, saith the LORD. 
I will bring them down like lambs to the slaughter, like rams with he goats. 
How is Sheshach taken! and how is the praise of the whole earth surprised! how is Babylon become an astonishment among the nations! 
The sea is come up upon Babylon: she is covered with the multitude of the waves thereof. 
Her cities are a desolation, a dry land, and a wilderness, a land wherein no man dwelleth, neither doth any son of man pass thereby. 
And I will punish Bel in Babylo
690, LORD. 
But the LORD sent out a great wind into the sea, and there was a mighty tempest in the sea, so that the ship was like to be broken. 
Then the mariners were afraid, and cried every man unto his god, and cast forth the wares that were in the ship into the sea, to lighten it of them. But Jonah was gone down into the sides of the ship; and he lay, and was fast asleep. 
So the shipmaster came to him, and said unto him, What meanest thou, O sleeper? arise, call upon thy God, if so be that God will think upon us, that we perish not. 
And they said every one to his fellow, Come, and let us cast lots, that we may know for whose cause this evil is upon us. So they cast lots, and the 
717,ered, Go thy way for this time; when I have a convenient season, I will call for thee. 
He hoped also that money should have been given him of Paul, that he might loose him: wherefore he sent for him the oftener, and communed with him. 
But after two years Porcius Festus came into Felix' room: and Felix, willing to shew the Jews a pleasure, left Paul bound. 
Now when Festus was come into the province, after three days he ascended from Caesarea to Jerusalem. 
Then the high priest and the chief of the Jews informed him against Paul, and besought him, 
And desired favour against him, that he would send for him to Jerusalem, laying wait in the way to kill him. 
But Festus answered, that Paul should be kept at Ca
744,d them, and begat Uzza, and Ahihud. 
And Shaharaim begat children in the country of Moab, after he had sent them away; Hushim and Baara were his wives. 
And he begat of Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and Malcham, 
And Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirma. These were his sons, heads of the fathers. 
And of Hushim he begat Abitub, and Elpaal. 
The sons of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 
And Zebadiah, and Arad, and Ader, 
And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah; 
And Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and
941,one on the right hand, and the other on the left; and called the name of that on the right hand Jachin, and the name of that on the left Boaz. 
Moreover he made an altar of brass, twenty cubits the length thereof, and twenty cubits the breadth thereof, and ten cubits the height thereof. 
Also he made a molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass, and five cubits the height thereof; and a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about. 
And under it was the similitude of oxen, which did compass it round about: ten in a cubit, compassing the sea round about. Two rows of oxen were cast, when it was cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 
And the thickness of it was an handbreadth, and the brim of it like t
651,ll slain before Israel: thou shalt hough their horses, and burn their chariots with fire. 
So Joshua came, and all the people of war with him, against them by the waters of Merom suddenly; and they fell upon them. 
And the LORD delivered them into the hand of Israel, who smote them, and chased them unto great Zidon, and unto Misrephothmaim, and unto the valley of Mizpeh eastward; and they smote them, until they left them none remaining. 
And Joshua did unto them as the LORD bade him: he houghed their horses, and burnt their chariots with fire. 
And Joshua at that time turned back, and took Hazor, and smote the king thereof with the sword: for 
824,e, and his concubine, and his servant, his father in law, the damsel's father, said unto him, Behold, now the day draweth toward evening, I pray you tarry all night: behold, the day groweth to an end, lodge here, that thine heart may be merry; and to morrow get you early on your way, that thou mayest go home. 
But the man would not tarry that night, but he rose up and departed, and came over against Jebus, which is Jerusalem; and there were with him two asses saddled, his concubine also was with him. 
And when they were by Jebus, the day was far spent; and the servant said unto his master, Come, I pray thee, and let us turn in into this city of the Jebusites, and lodge in it. 
And his master said unto him, We will not turn aside hither into the city of a stranger, that is not of the children of Israel; we will pa
790,eir inclosings. 
And the stones were according to the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet, every one with his name, according to the twelve tribes. 
And they made upon the breastplate chains at the ends, of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And they made two ouches of gold, and two gold rings; and put the two rings in the two ends of the breastplate. 
And they put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the two ends of the two wreathen chains they fastened in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the ephod, before it. 
And they made two rings of gold, and put them on the two ends of the breastplate, upon the border of it, which was on the side of the ephod inwar
640,r God be with us, as he was with our fathers: let him not leave us, nor forsake us: 
That he may incline our hearts unto him, to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and his statutes, and his judgments, which he commanded our fathers. 
And let these my words, wherewith I have made supplication before the LORD, be nigh unto the LORD our God day and night, that he maintain the cause of his servant, and the cause of his people Israel at all times, as the matter shall require: 
That all the people of the earth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else. 
Let your heart therefore be perfect with the LORD ou
860,eed shall be mighty upon earth: the generation of the upright shall be blessed. 
Wealth and riches shall be in his house: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
Unto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is gracious, and full of compassion, and righteous. 
A good man sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his affairs with discretion. 
Surely he shall not be moved for ever: the righteous shall be in everlasting remembrance. 
He shall not be afraid of evil tidings: his heart is fixed, trusting in the LORD. 
His heart is established, he shall not be afraid, until he see his desire upon his enemies. 
He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire of the wicked 
760,so, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: 
As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, 
That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory. 
For this cause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when ye received the word of God which ye heard of us, ye received it not as the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of God, which effectually worketh also in you that believe. 
For ye, brethren, became followers of the churches of God which in Judaea are in Christ Jesus: for ye also have suffered like things of your own countrymen, even as they have of the Jews: 
Who both killed the Lord Jesus, and their own proph
924,rnication with the Egyptians thy neighbours, great of flesh; and hast increased thy whoredoms, to provoke me to anger. 
Behold, therefore I have stretched out my hand over thee, and have diminished thine ordinary food, and delivered thee unto the will of them that hate thee, the daughters of the Philistines, which are ashamed of thy lewd way. 
Thou hast played the whore also with the Assyrians, because thou wast unsatiable; yea, thou hast played the harlot with them, and yet couldest not be satisfied. 
Thou hast moreover multiplied thy fornication in the land of Canaan unto Chaldea; and yet thou wast not satisfied therewith. 
How weak is thine heart, saith the LORD GOD, seeing thou doest all these things, the work of an imperious whorish woman; 
In that thou buildest thine eminent place in the head of every way, and makest thine high place in every street; and hast not been as an harlot, in that thou scornest h
887, Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman. 
And the sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari. 
And the sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and Shelah, and Pharez, and Zarah: but Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan. And the sons of Pharez were Hezron and Hamul. 
And the sons of Issachar; Tola, and Phuvah, and Job, and Shimron. 
And the sons of Zebulun; Sered, and Elon, and Jahleel. 
These be the sons of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob in Padanaram, with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his daughters were thirty and three. 
And the sons of Gad; Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri, and Arodi, and Areli. 
And the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah, and Serah their sister: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel. 
These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter, and
679, children, and of the poor of the land, of them that were not carried away captive to Babylon; 
Then they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan and Jonathan the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of a Maachathite, they and their men. 
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, and it shall be well with you. 
As for me, behold, I will dwell at Mizpah, to serve the Chaldeans, which will come unto us: but ye, gather ye wine, and summ
959,
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters: as a man falleth before wicked men, so fellest thou. And all the people wept again over him. 
And when all the people came to cause David to eat meat while it was yet day, David sware, saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 
And the king said unto his servants, Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel? 
And I am this day weak, though anointed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah be too hard for me: the LORD shall reward the doer of evil according to his wickedness. 
And when Saul's son heard that Abner was dead in Hebron, his hands were feeble, and all the Israelites were tro
942,e toward this place: hear thou from thy dwelling place, even from heaven; and when thou hearest, forgive. 
If a man sin against his neighbour, and an oath be laid upon him to make him swear, and the oath come before thine altar in this house; 
Then hear thou from heaven, and do, and judge thy servants, by requiting the wicked, by recompensing his way upon his own head; and by justifying the righteous, by giving him according to his righteousness. 
And if thy people Israel be put to the worse before the enemy, because they have sinned against thee; and shall return and confess thy name, and pray and make supplication before thee in this house; 
Then hear thou from the heavens, and forgive the sin of thy people Israel, and bring them again unto the land which thou gavest to them and to their fathers. 
When the heaven is shut up, and there is no rain, because they have sinned against thee; yet if they pray toward this place, and co
751,hich said unto thee, Take up thy bed, and walk? 
And he that was healed wist not who it was: for Jesus had conveyed himself away, a multitude being in that place. 
Afterward Jesus findeth him in the temple, and said unto him, Behold, thou art made whole: sin no more, lest a worse thing come unto thee. 
The man departed, and told the Jews that it was Jesus, which had made him whole. 
And therefore did the Jews persecute Jesus, and sought to slay him, because he had done these things on the sabbath day. 
But Jesus answered them, My Father worketh hitherto, and I work. 
Therefore the Jews sought the more to kill him, because he not only had broken the sabbath, but said also that God was his Father, making himself equal with God. 
Then answered 
673,joy of heart, but ye shall cry for sorrow of heart, and shall howl for vexation of spirit. 
And ye shall leave your name for a curse unto my chosen: for the Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 
That he who blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and because they are hid from mine eyes. 
For, behold, I create new heavens and a new earth: and the former shall not be remembered, nor come into mind. 
But be ye glad and rejoice for ever in that which I create: for, behold, I create Jerusalem a rejoicing
904,e; I also will shew mine opinion. 
Behold, I waited for your words; I gave ear to your reasons, whilst ye searched out what to say. 
Yea, I attended unto you, and, behold, there was none of you that convinced Job, or that answered his words: 
Lest ye should say, We have found out wisdom: God thrusteth him down, not man. 
Now he hath not directed his words against me: neither will I answer him with your speeches. 
They were amazed, they answered no more: they left off speaking. 
When I had waited, (for they spake not, but stood still, and answered no more;) 
I said, I will answer also my part, I also will shew mine opinion. 
For I am full of matter, the spirit within me constraineth me. 
Behold, my belly is as wine which hath no vent; it is ready to burst like new bottles. 
I will speak, that I may be refreshed: I will open my lips and answer. 
Let me not, I pray you, accept any man's person,
658,osts. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will save my people from the east country, and from the west country; 
And I will bring them, and they shall dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God, in truth and in righteousness. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Let your hands be strong, ye that hear in these days these words by the mouth of the prophets, which were in the day that the foundation of the house of the LORD of hosts was laid, that the temple might be built. 
For before these days there was no hire for man, nor any hire for beast; neither was there any peace to him that went out or came in becaus
674,y of our God, in the mountain of his holiness. 
Beautiful for situation, the joy of the whole earth, is mount Zion, on the sides of the north, the city of the great King. 
God is known in her palaces for a refuge. 
For, lo, the kings were assembled, they passed by together. 
They saw it, and so they marvelled; they were troubled, and hasted away. 
Fear took hold upon them there, and pain, as of a woman in travail. 
Thou breakest the ships of Tarshish with an east wind. 
As we have heard, so have we seen in the city of the LORD of hosts, in the city of our God: God will establish it for ever. Selah. 
We have thought of thy lovingkindness, O God, in the midst of thy t
845,ry. 
And the priest shall put some of the blood upon the horns of the altar of sweet incense before the LORD, which is in the tabernacle of the congregation; and shall pour all the blood of the bullock at the bottom of the altar of the burnt offering, which is at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall take off from it all the fat of the bullock for the sin offering; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away, 
As it was taken off from the bullock of the sacrifice of peace offerings: and the priest shall burn them upon the altar of the burnt offering. 
And the skin of the bullock, and all his flesh, with his head, and with his legs, a
798,there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the outward court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And he brought me to the north gate, and measured it according to these measures; 
The little chambers thereof, the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, and the windows to it round about: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits. 
And the posts thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And the chambers and the entries thereof were by the posts of the gates,
941,n this should be. 
And the angel said unto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found favour with God. 
And, behold, thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a son, and shalt call his name JESUS. 
He shall be great, and shall be called the Son of the Highest: and the Lord God shall give unto him the throne of his father David: 
And he shall reign over the house of Jacob for ever; and of his kingdom there shall be no end. 
Then said Mary unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know not a man? 
And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy Ghost shall come upon thee, and the power of the Highest shall overshadow thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God. 
And, behold, thy cousin Elisabeth, she hath also conceived a son in her old age: and this is the sixth month with her, who was called barren. 
For with God nothing shall be impossible. 
And Mary said, Behold th
849,than these. 
And he saith unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Hereafter ye shall see heaven open, and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man. 
And the third day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there: 
And both Jesus was called, and his disciples, to the marriage. 
And when they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They have no wine. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come. 
His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it. 
And there were set there six waterpots of stone, after the manner of the purifying of the Jews, containing two or three firkins apiece. 
Jesus saith unto them, Fill the waterpots with water. And they filled them up to the brim. 
And he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bea
735,e dead of old. 
He hath hedged me about, that I cannot get out: he hath made my chain heavy. 
Also when I cry and shout, he shutteth out my prayer. 
He hath inclosed my ways with hewn stone, he hath made my paths crooked. 
He was unto me as a bear lying in wait, and as a lion in secret places. 
He hath turned aside my ways, and pulled me in pieces: he hath made me desolate. 
He hath bent his bow, and set me as a mark for the arrow. 
He hath caused the arrows of his quiver to enter into my reins. 
I was a derision to all my people; and their song all the day. 
He hath filled me with bitterness, he hath made me drunken with wormwood. 
He hath also broken my teeth with gravel stones, he hath covered me with ashes. 
And thou hast
768,king, Jonathan hath yet a son, which is lame on his feet. 
And the king said unto him, Where is he? And Ziba said unto the king, Behold, he is in the house of Machir, the son of Ammiel, in Lodebar. 
Then king David sent, and fetched him out of the house of Machir, the son of Ammiel, from Lodebar. 
Now when Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan, the son of Saul, was come unto David, he fell on his face, and did reverence. And David said, Mephibosheth. And he answered, Behold thy servant! 
And David said unto him, Fear not: for I will surely shew thee kindness for Jonathan thy father's sake, and will restore thee all the land of Saul thy father; and thou shalt eat bread at my table continually. 
And he bowed himself, and said, What is thy servant, that thou should
847,me it. 
But the men that went up with him said, We be not able to go up against the people; for they are stronger than we. 
And they brought up an evil report of the land which they had searched unto the children of Israel, saying, The land, through which we have gone to search it, is a land that eateth up the inhabitants thereof; and all the people that we saw in it are men of a great stature. 
And there we saw the giants, the sons of Anak, which come of the giants: and we were in our own sight as grasshoppers, and so we were in their sight. 
And all the congregation lifted up their voice, and cried; and the people wept that night. 
And all the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron: and the whole congregation said unto them, Would God that we had died in the land of Egypt! or would God we had died in this wildern
823,the LORD: for he hath delivered the soul of the poor from the hand of evildoers. 
Cursed be the day wherein I was born: let not the day wherein my mother bare me be blessed. 
Cursed be the man who brought tidings to my father, saying, A man child is born unto thee; making him very glad. 
And let that man be as the cities which the LORD overthrew, and repented not: and let him hear the cry in the morning, and the shouting at noontide; 
Because he slew me not from the womb; or that my mother might have been my grave, and her womb to be always great with me. 
Wherefore came I forth out of the womb to see labour and sorrow, that my days should be consumed with shame? 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur the son of Melchiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the pr
654,ve I called my son. 
Then Herod, when he saw that he was mocked of the wise men, was exceeding wroth, and sent forth, and slew all the children that were in Bethlehem, and in all the coasts thereof, from two years old and under, according to the time which he had diligently enquired of the wise men. 
Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, 
In Rama was there a voice heard, lamentation, and weeping, and great mourning, Rachel weeping for her children, and would not be comforted, because they are not. 
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, 
Saying, Arise, and t
694, them that have no might he increaseth strength. 
Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: 
But they that wait upon the LORD shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed 
806,estroy him that remaineth of the city. 
And when he looked on Amalek, he took up his parable, and said, Amalek was the first of the nations; but his latter end shall be that he perish for ever. 
And he looked on the Kenites, and took up his parable, and said, Strong is thy dwellingplace, and thou puttest thy nest in a rock. 
Nevertheless the Kenite shall be wasted, until Asshur shall carry thee away captive. 
And he took up his parable, and said, Alas, who shall live when God doeth this! 
And ships shall come from the coast of Chittim, and shall afflict Asshur, and shall afflict Eber, and he also shall perish for ever. 
And Balaam rose up, and went and returned to his place: and Balak also went his way. 
And Israel abode in Shittim, and the people began to commit whoredom with the daughters of M
852,st that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. 
He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not. 
This spake he, signifying by what death he should glorify God. And when he had spoken this, he saith unto h
790,rth. 
He hath remembered his covenant for ever, the word which he commanded to a thousand generations. 
Which covenant he made with Abraham, and his oath unto Isaac; 
And confirmed the same unto Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant: 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance: 
When they were but a few men in number; yea, very few, and strangers in it. 
When they went from one nation to another, from one kingdom to another people; 
He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved kings for their sakes; 
Saying, Touch not mine anointed, and do my prophets no harm. 
Moreover he called for a famine upon the land: he brake the whole staff of bread. 
He sent a man before them, even Joseph, who was sold for a servant: 
Whose
656, him: but if Baal, then follow him. And the people answered him not a word. 
Then said Elijah unto the people, I, even I only, remain a prophet of the LORD; but Baal's prophets are four hundred and fifty men. 
Let them therefore give us two bullocks; and let them choose one bullock for themselves, and cut it in pieces, and lay it on wood, and put no fire under: and I will dress the other bullock, and lay it on wood, and put no fire under: 
And call ye on the name of your gods, and I will call on the name of the LORD: and the God that answereth by fire, let him be God. And all the people answered and said, It is well spoken. 
And Elijah said unto th
651,andment, and the decree was given in Shushan the palace. And the king and Haman sat down to drink; but the city Shushan was perplexed. 
When Mordecai perceived all that was done, Mordecai rent his clothes, and put on sackcloth with ashes, and went out into the midst of the city, and cried with a loud and a bitter cry; 
And came even before the king's gate: for none might enter into the king's gate clothed with sackcloth. 
And in every province, whithersoever the king's commandment and his decree came, there was great mourning among the Jews, and fasting, and weeping, and wailing; and many lay in sackcloth and ashes. 
So Esther's maids and her 
769,over he will preserve it. 
Turn ye unto him from whom the children of Israel have deeply revolted. 
For in that day every man shall cast away his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which your own hands have made unto you for a sin. 
Then shall the Assyrian fall with the sword, not of a mighty man; and the sword, not of a mean man, shall devour him: but he shall flee from the sword, and his young men shall be discomfited. 
And he shall pass over to his strong hold for fear, and his princes shall be afraid of the ensign, saith the LORD, whose fire is in Zion, and his furnace in Jerusalem. 
Behold, a king shall reign in righteousness, and princes shall rule in judgment. 
And a man shall be as an hiding place from the wind, and a covert from the tempest; as 
705,n, that ye shall set up these stones, which I command you this day, in mount Ebal, and thou shalt plaister them with plaister. 
And there shalt thou build an altar unto the LORD thy God, an altar of stones: thou shalt not lift up any iron tool upon them. 
Thou shalt build the altar of the LORD thy God of whole stones: and thou shalt offer burnt offerings thereon unto the LORD thy God: 
And thou shalt offer peace offerings, and shalt eat there, and rejoice before the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt write upon the stones all the words of this law very plainly. 
And Moses and the priests the Levites spake unto all Israel, saying, Take heed, and hearken, O Israel; this day thou art become the people of
822,and, behold, I am gathering two sticks, that I may go in and dress it for me and my son, that we may eat it, and die. 
And Elijah said unto her, Fear not; go and do as thou hast said: but make me thereof a little cake first, and bring it unto me, and after make for thee and for thy son. 
For thus saith the LORD God of Israel, The barrel of meal shall not waste, neither shall the cruse of oil fail, until the day that the LORD sendeth rain upon the earth. 
And she went and did according to the saying of Elijah: and she, and he, and her house, did eat many days. 
And the barrel of meal wasted not, neither did the cruse of oil fail, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Elijah. 
And it came to pass after these things, that the son of the woman, the mistress of the house, fell sick; and his sickness w
696,d rise not at all? why are they then baptized for the dead? 
And why stand we in jeopardy every hour? 
I protest by your rejoicing which I have in Christ Jesus our Lord, I die daily. 
If after the manner of men I have fought with beasts at Ephesus, what advantageth it me, if the dead rise not? let us eat and drink; for to morrow we die. 
Be not deceived: evil communications corrupt good manners. 
Awake to righteousness, and sin not; for some have not the knowledge of God: I speak this to your shame. 
But some man will say, How are the dead raised up? and with what body do they come? 
Thou fool, that which thou sowest is not quickened, except it die: 
And that which thou sowest, thou sowe
818,not well pleased: for they were overthrown in the wilderness. 
Now these things were our examples, to the intent we should not lust after evil things, as they also lusted. 
Neither be ye idolaters, as were some of them; as it is written, The people sat down to eat and drink, and rose up to play. 
Neither let us commit fornication, as some of them committed, and fell in one day three and twenty thousand. 
Neither let us tempt Christ, as some of them also tempted, and were destroyed of serpents. 
Neither murmur ye, as some of them also murmured, and were destroyed of the destroyer. 
Now all these things happened unto them for ensamples: and they are written for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the world are come. 
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall. 
There hath no temptati
650,heir witnesses, that they may be justified: or let them hear, and say, It is truth. 
Ye are my witnesses, saith the LORD, and my servant whom I have chosen: that ye may know and believe me, and understand that I am he: before me there was no God formed, neither shall there be after me. 
I, even I, am the LORD; and beside me there is no saviour. 
I have declared, and have saved, and I have shewed, when there was no strange god among you: therefore ye are my witnesses, saith the LORD, that I am God. 
Yea, before the day was I am he; and there is none that can deliver out of my hand: I will work, and who shall let it? 
Thus saith the LORD, your 
782,eyes have seen. 
Go not forth hastily to strive, lest thou know not what to do in the end thereof, when thy neighbour hath put thee to shame. 
Debate thy cause with thy neighbour himself; and discover not a secret to another: 
Lest he that heareth it put thee to shame, and thine infamy turn not away. 
A word fitly spoken is like apples of gold in pictures of silver. 
As an earring of gold, and an ornament of fine gold, so is a wise reprover upon an obedient ear. 
As the cold of snow in the time of harvest, so is a faithful messenger to them that send him: for he refresheth the soul of his masters. 
Whoso boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind without rain. 
By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou found ho
866,I command you, to do them, to love the LORD your God, to walk in all his ways, and to cleave unto him; 
Then will the LORD drive out all these nations from before you, and ye shall possess greater nations and mightier than yourselves. 
Every place whereon the soles of your feet shall tread shall be yours: from the wilderness and Lebanon, from the river, the river Euphrates, even unto the uttermost sea shall your coast be. 
There shall no man be able to stand before you: for the LORD your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he hath said unto you. 
Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the w
716,ng you near to himself to do the service of the tabernacle of the LORD, and to stand before the congregation to minister unto them? 
And he hath brought thee near to him, and all thy brethren the sons of Levi with thee: and seek ye the priesthood also? 
For which cause both thou and all thy company are gathered together against the LORD: and what is Aaron, that ye murmur against him? 
And Moses sent to call Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab: which said, We will not come up: 
Is it a small thing that thou hast brought us up out of a land that floweth with milk and honey, to kill us in the wilderness, except thou make thyself altogether a prince over us? 
Moreover thou hast not brought us into a land that 
825,hai the Hushathite slew Sippai, that was of the children of the giant: and they were subdued. 
And there was war again with the Philistines; and Elhanan the son of Jair slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, whose spear staff was like a weaver's beam. 
And yet again there was war at Gath, where was a man of great stature, whose fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each hand, and six on each foot and he also was the son of the giant. 
But when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimea David's brother slew him. 
These were born unto the giant in Gath; and they fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And Satan stood up against Israel, and provoked David to number Israel. 
And David said to Joab and to the rulers of the people, Go, number Israel from Beersheba even to Dan; and 
808, LORD, to offer the burnt offerings of the LORD, as it is written in the law of Moses, with rejoicing and with singing, as it was ordained by David. 
And he set the porters at the gates of the house of the LORD, that none which was unclean in any thing should enter in. 
And he took the captains of hundreds, and the nobles, and the governors of the people, and all the people of the land, and brought down the king from the house of the LORD: and they came through the high gate into the king's house, and set the king upon the throne of the kingdom. 
And all the people of the land rejoiced: and the city was quiet, after that they had slain Athaliah with the sword. 
Joash was seven years old when he began to reign, and he reigned forty years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Zibiah of Beersheba.
799,continue thy lovingkindness unto them that know thee; and thy righteousness to the upright in heart. 
Let not the foot of pride come against me, and let not the hand of the wicked remove me. 
There are the workers of iniquity fallen: they are cast down, and shall not be able to rise. 
Fret not thyself because of evildoers, neither be thou envious against the workers of iniquity. 
For they shall soon be cut down like the grass, and wither as the green herb. 
Trust in the LORD, and do good; so shalt thou dwell in the land, and verily thou shalt be fed. 
Delight thyself also in the LORD: and he shall give thee the desires of thine heart. 
Commit thy way unto the LORD; trust also in him; and he shall bring it to pass. 
And he shall bring forth thy righteousness as the light, and thy judgment 
802,e chief captain came, and said unto him, Tell me, art thou a Roman? He said, Yea. 
And the chief captain answered, With a great sum obtained I this freedom. And Paul said, But I was free born. 
Then straightway they departed from him which should have examined him: and the chief captain also was afraid, after he knew that he was a Roman, and because he had bound him. 
On the morrow, because he would have known the certainty wherefore he was accused of the Jews, he loosed him from his bands, and commanded the chief priests and all their council to appear, and brought Paul down, and set him before them. 
And Paul, earnestly beholding the council, said, Men and brethren, I have lived in all good conscience before God until this day. 
And the high priest Ananias commanded them that stood by him 
718,ch is desert. 
And he arose and went: and, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the charge of all her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship, 
Was returning, and sitting in his chariot read Esaias the prophet. 
Then the Spirit said unto Philip, Go near, and join thyself to this chariot. 
And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest? 
And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me? And he desired Philip that he would come up and sit with him. 
The place of the scripture which he read was this, He was led as a sheep to the slaughter; and like a lamb dumb 
729,m Hamath, and from the islands of the sea. 
And he shall set up an ensign for the nations, and shall assemble the outcasts of Israel, and gather together the dispersed of Judah from the four corners of the earth. 
The envy also of Ephraim shall depart, and the adversaries of Judah shall be cut off: Ephraim shall not envy Judah, and Judah shall not vex Ephraim. 
But they shall fly upon the shoulders of the Philistines toward the west; they shall spoil them of the east together: they shall lay their hand upon Edom and Moab; and the children of Ammon shall obey them. 
And the LORD shall utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian sea; and with his mighty wind shall he shake his hand over the river, and shall smite it in the
732,ade the ships in Eziongaber. 
Then Eliezer the son of Dodavah of Mareshah prophesied against Jehoshaphat, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah, the LORD hath broken thy works. And the ships were broken, that they were not able to go to Tarshish. 
Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
And he had brethren the sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah: all these were the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel. 
And their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold, and of precious things, with fenced cities in Judah: but the kingdom gave he to Jehoram; 
809,fore err, because ye know not the scriptures, neither the power of God? 
For when they shall rise from the dead, they neither marry, nor are given in marriage; but are as the angels which are in heaven. 
And as touching the dead, that they rise: have ye not read in the book of Moses, how in the bush God spake unto him, saying, I am the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob? 
He is not the God of the dead, but the God of the living: ye therefore do greatly err. 
And one of the scribes came, and having heard them reasoning together, and perceiving that he had answered them well, asked him, Which is the first commandment of all? 
And Jesus answered him, The first of all the commandments is, Hear, O Israel; The Lord our God is one Lord: 
And thou shalt love the Lord thy God with al
757,aban's flocks. 
And Jacob took him rods of green poplar, and of the hazel and chesnut tree; and pilled white strakes in them, and made the white appear which was in the rods. 
And he set the rods which he had pilled before the flocks in the gutters in the watering troughs when the flocks came to drink, that they should conceive when they came to drink. 
And the flocks conceived before the rods, and brought forth cattle ringstraked, speckled, and spotted. 
And Jacob did separate the lambs, and set the faces of the flocks toward the ringstraked, and all the brown in the flock of Laban; and he put his own flocks by themselves, and put them not unto Laban's cattle. 
And it came to pass, whensoever the stronger cattle did conceive, that Jacob laid the 
775,followeth after righteousness. 
Correction is grievous unto him that forsaketh the way: and he that hateth reproof shall die. 
Hell and destruction are before the LORD: how much more then the hearts of the children of men? 
A scorner loveth not one that reproveth him: neither will he go unto the wise. 
A merry heart maketh a cheerful countenance: but by sorrow of the heart the spirit is broken. 
The heart of him that hath understanding seeketh knowledge: but the mouth of fools feedeth on foolishness. 
All the days of the afflicted are evil: but he that is of a merry heart hath a continual feast. 
Better is little with the fear of the LORD than great treasure and trouble therewith. 
Better is a dinner of herbs where love is, than a stalled ox and hatred therewith. 

673,ess, goodness, faith, 
Meekness, temperance: against such there is no law. 
And they that are Christ's have crucified the flesh with the affections and lusts. 
If we live in the Spirit, let us also walk in the Spirit. 
Let us not be desirous of vain glory, provoking one another, envying one another. 
Brethren, if a man be overtaken in a fault, ye which are spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering thyself, lest thou also be tempted. 
Bear ye one another's burdens, and so fulfil the law of Christ. 
For if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself. 
But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he
898, and honey; and they shall have eaten and filled themselves, and waxen fat; then will they turn unto other gods, and serve them, and provoke me, and break my covenant. 
And it shall come to pass, when many evils and troubles are befallen them, that this song shall testify against them as a witness; for it shall not be forgotten out of the mouths of their seed: for I know their imagination which they go about, even now, before I have brought them into the land which I sware. 
Moses therefore wrote this song the same day, and taught it the children of Israel. 
And he gave Joshua the son of Nun a charge, and said, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou shalt bring the children of Israel into the land which I sware unto them: and I will be with thee. 
And it came to pass, when Moses had made an end of writing the words of this law in a book, until they were finished, 
That Moses command
803,on Jesus Christ. 
And these things write we unto you, that your joy may be full. 
This then is the message which we have heard of him, and declare unto you, that God is light, and in him is no darkness at all. 
If we say that we have fellowship with him, and walk in darkness, we lie, and do not the truth: 
But if we walk in the light, as he is in the light, we have fellowship one with another, and the blood of Jesus Christ his Son cleanseth us from all sin. 
If we say that we have no sin, we deceive ourselves, and the truth is not in us. 
If we confess our sins, he is faithful and just to forgive us our sins, and to cleanse us from all unrighteousness. 
If we say that we have not sinned, we make him a liar, and his word is not in us. 
My little children, these things write I unto you, that ye
834,ing Agrippa, I was not disobedient unto the heavenly vision: 
But shewed first unto them of Damascus, and at Jerusalem, and throughout all the coasts of Judaea, and then to the Gentiles, that they should repent and turn to God, and do works meet for repentance. 
For these causes the Jews caught me in the temple, and went about to kill me. 
Having therefore obtained help of God, I continue unto this day, witnessing both to small and great, saying none other things than those which the prophets and Moses did say should come: 
That Christ should suffer, and that he should be the first that should rise from the dead, and should shew light unto the people, and to the Gentiles. 
And as he thus spake for himself, Festus said with a loud voice, Paul, thou art beside thyself; much learning doth make thee mad. 
But he said, I am not
656, the Hagarenes; 
Gebal, and Ammon, and Amalek; the Philistines with the inhabitants of Tyre; 
Assur also is joined with them: they have holpen the children of Lot. Selah. 
Do unto them as unto the Midianites; as to Sisera, as to Jabin, at the brook of Kison: 
Which perished at Endor: they became as dung for the earth. 
Make their nobles like Oreb, and like Zeeb: yea, all their princes as Zebah, and as Zalmunna: 
Who said, Let us take to ourselves the houses of God in possession. 
O my God, make them like a wheel; as the stubble before the wind. 
As the fire burneth a wood, and as the flame setteth the mountains on fire; 
So persecute them with thy 
949,et the trumpet to thy mouth. He shall come as an eagle against the house of the LORD, because they have transgressed my covenant, and trespassed against my law. 
Israel shall cry unto me, My God, we know thee. 
Israel hath cast off the thing that is good: the enemy shall pursue him. 
They have set up kings, but not by me: they have made princes, and I knew it not: of their silver and their gold have they made them idols, that they may be cut off. 
Thy calf, O Samaria, hath cast thee off; mine anger is kindled against them: how long will it be ere they attain to innocency? 
For from Israel was it also: the workman made it; therefore it is not God: but the calf of Samaria shall be broken in pieces. 
For they have sown the wind, and they shall reap the whirlwind: it hath no stalk; the bud shall yield no meal: if so be it yield, the strangers shall swallow it up. 
Israel is swallowed up: now shall they be among the Gentiles as a vessel whe
904,offering and the meat offering; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he set the laver between the tent of the congregation and the altar, and put water there, to wash withal. 
And Moses and Aaron and his sons washed their hands and their feet thereat: 
When they went into the tent of the congregation, and when they came near unto the altar, they washed; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the altar, and set up the hanging of the court gate. So Moses finished the work. 
Then a cloud covered the tent of the congregation, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And Moses was not able to enter into the tent of the congregation, because the cloud abode thereon, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward in all their journeys: 
But if the cl
736, merchants of Sheba, Asshur, and Chilmad, were thy merchants. 
These were thy merchants in all sorts of things, in blue clothes, and broidered work, and in chests of rich apparel, bound with cords, and made of cedar, among thy merchandise. 
The ships of Tarshish did sing of thee in thy market: and thou wast replenished, and made very glorious in the midst of the seas. 
Thy rowers have brought thee into great waters: the east wind hath broken thee in the midst of the seas. 
Thy riches, and thy fairs, thy merchandise, thy mariners, and thy pilots, thy calkers, and the occupiers of thy merchandise, and all thy men of war, that are in thee, and in all thy company which is in the midst of thee, shall fall into the midst of the seas
719,e locusts were like unto horses prepared unto battle; and on their heads were as it were crowns like gold, and their faces were as the faces of men. 
And they had hair as the hair of women, and their teeth were as the teeth of lions. 
And they had breastplates, as it were breastplates of iron; and the sound of their wings was as the sound of chariots of many horses running to battle. 
And they had tails like unto scorpions, and there were stings in their tails: and their power was to hurt men five months. 
And they had a king over them, which is the angel of the bottomless pit, whose name in the Hebrew tongue is Abaddon, but in the Greek tongue hath his name Apollyon. 
One woe is past; and, behold, there come 
916,e rod of his oppressor, as in the day of Midian. 
For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and garments rolled in blood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of fire. 
For unto us a child is born, unto us a son is given: and the government shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be called Wonderful, Counsellor, The mighty God, The everlasting Father, The Prince of Peace. 
Of the increase of his government and peace there shall be no end, upon the throne of David, and upon his kingdom, to order it, and to establish it with judgment and with justice from henceforth even for ever. The zeal of the LORD of hosts will perform this. 
The Lord sent a word into Jacob, and it hath lighted upon Israel. 
And all the people shall know, even Ephraim and the inhabitant of Samaria, that say in the pride and stoutness of heart, 
The bricks are fallen down, but we will build with hewn stones: the
687, these ten times, and have not hearkened to my voice; 
Surely they shall not see the land which I sware unto their fathers, neither shall any of them that provoked me see it: 
But my servant Caleb, because he had another spirit with him, and hath followed me fully, him will I bring into the land whereinto he went; and his seed shall possess it. 
(Now the Amalekites and the Canaanites dwelt in the valley.) Tomorrow turn you, and get you into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, which murmur against me? I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they mu
751,ay ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work. 
Also in the day of the firstfruits, when ye bring a new meat offering unto the LORD, after your weeks be out, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work: 
But ye shall offer the burnt offering for a sweet savour unto the LORD; two young bullocks, one ram, seven lambs of the first year; 
And their meat offering of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto one bullock, two tenth deals unto one ram, 
A several tenth deal unto one lamb, throughout the seven lambs; 
And one kid of the goats, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer them beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, (they shall be unto you without blemish) and their drin
768,ot. For Jesus knew from the beginning who they were that believed not, and who should betray him. 
And he said, Therefore said I unto you, that no man can come unto me, except it were given unto him of my Father. 
From that time many of his disciples went back, and walked no more with him. 
Then said Jesus unto the twelve, Will ye also go away? 
Then Simon Peter answered him, Lord, to whom shall we go? thou hast the words of eternal life. 
And we believe and are sure that thou art that Christ, the Son of the living God. 
Jesus answered them, Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you is a devil? 
He spake of Judas Iscariot the son of Simon: for he it was that should betray him, being one of the twelve. 
After these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he wo
801,as afraid before my name. 
The law of truth was in his mouth, and iniquity was not found in his lips: he walked with me in peace and equity, and did turn many away from iniquity. 
For the priest's lips should keep knowledge, and they should seek the law at his mouth: for he is the messenger of the LORD of hosts. 
But ye are departed out of the way; ye have caused many to stumble at the law; ye have corrupted the covenant of Levi, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore have I also made you contemptible and base before all the people, according as ye have not kept my ways, but have been partial in the law. 
Have we not all one father? hath not one God created us? why do we deal treacherously every man against his brother, by profaning the covenant of our fathers? 
Judah hath dealt treacherously,
951, morning till the stars appeared. 
Likewise at the same time said I unto the people, Let every one with his servant lodge within Jerusalem, that in the night they may be a guard to us, and labour on the day. 
So neither I, nor my brethren, nor my servants, nor the men of the guard which followed me, none of us put off our clothes, saving that every one put them off for washing. 
And there was a great cry of the people and of their wives against their brethren the Jews. 
For there were that said, We, our sons, and our daughters, are many: therefore we take up corn for them, that we may eat, and live. 
Some also there were that said, We have mortgaged our lands, vineyards, and houses, that we might buy corn, because of the dearth. 
There were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's tribute, and that upon our lands and vineyards. 
Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children: and, lo, we br
670, my transgressions: according to thy mercy remember thou me for thy goodness' sake, O LORD. 
Good and upright is the LORD: therefore will he teach sinners in the way. 
The meek will he guide in judgment: and the meek will he teach his way. 
All the paths of the LORD are mercy and truth unto such as keep his covenant and his testimonies. 
For thy name's sake, O LORD, pardon mine iniquity; for it is great. 
What man is he that feareth the LORD? him shall he teach in the way that he shall choose. 
His soul shall dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the earth. 
The secret of the LORD is with them that fear him; and he will shew them his covenant. 
Mine eyes are
792, it. 
And the child grew, and she brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter, and he became her son. And she called his name Moses: and she said, Because I drew him out of the water. 
And it came to pass in those days, when Moses was grown, that he went out unto his brethren, and looked on their burdens: and he spied an Egyptian smiting an Hebrew, one of his brethren. 
And he looked this way and that way, and when he saw that there was no man, he slew the Egyptian, and hid him in the sand. 
And when he went out the second day, behold, two men of the Hebrews strove together: and he said to him that did the wrong, Wherefore smitest thou thy fellow? 
And he said, Who made thee a prince and a judge over us? intendest thou to kill me, as thou killedst the Egyptian? And Moses feared, and said, 
893,at he sware unto their fathers: and there stood not a man of all their enemies before them; the LORD delivered all their enemies into their hand. 
There failed not ought of any good thing which the LORD had spoken unto the house of Israel; all came to pass. 
Then Joshua called the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, 
And said unto them, Ye have kept all that Moses the servant of the LORD commanded you, and have obeyed my voice in all that I commanded you: 
Ye have not left your brethren these many days unto this day, but have kept the charge of the commandment of the LORD your God. 
And now the LORD your God hath given rest unto your brethren, as he promised them: therefore now return ye, and get you unto your tents, and unto the land of your possession, which Moses the servant of the LORD gave you on the other side Jordan. 
But take diligent heed to do th
872, with him, and tarried all night; and they rose up in the morning, and he said, Send me away unto my master. 
And her brother and her mother said, Let the damsel abide with us a few days, at the least ten; after that she shall go. 
And he said unto them, Hinder me not, seeing the LORD hath prospered my way; send me away that I may go to my master. 
And they said, We will call the damsel, and enquire at her mouth. 
And they called Rebekah, and said unto her, Wilt thou go with this man? And she said, I will go. 
And they sent away Rebekah their sister, and her nurse, and Abraham's servant, and his men. 
And they blessed Rebekah, and said unto her, Thou art our sister, be thou the mother of thousands of millions, and let thy seed possess the gate of those which hate them. 
And Rebekah arose, and her damsels, and they rode upon the camels, and followed the man: an
703,me to the governor's ears, we will persuade him, and secure you. 
So they took the money, and did as they were taught: and this saying is commonly reported among the Jews until this day. 
Then the eleven disciples went away into Galilee, into a mountain where Jesus had appointed them. 
And when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted. 
And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. 
Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 
Teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I have commanded you: and, lo, I am with you alway, even unto the end of the world. Amen
647,l serve me. 
As soon as they hear of me, they shall obey me: the strangers shall submit themselves unto me. 
The strangers shall fade away, and be afraid out of their close places. 
The LORD liveth; and blessed be my rock; and let the God of my salvation be exalted. 
It is God that avengeth me, and subdueth the people under me. 
He delivereth me from mine enemies: yea, thou liftest me up above those that rise up against me: thou hast delivered me from the violent man. 
Therefore will I give thanks unto thee, O LORD, among the heathen, and sing praises unto thy name. 
Great deliverance giveth he to his king; and sheweth mercy to his anointe
953,hey shall take no wood out of the field, neither cut down any out of the forests; for they shall burn the weapons with fire: and they shall spoil those that spoiled them, and rob those that robbed them, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will give unto Gog a place there of graves in Israel, the valley of the passengers on the east of the sea: and it shall stop the noses of the passengers: and there shall they bury Gog and all his multitude: and they shall call it The valley of Hamongog. 
And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying of them, that they may cleanse the land. 
Yea, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown the day that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord GOD. 
And they shall sever out men of continual employment, passing through the land to bury with the passengers those that remain upon the face of the earth, to cleanse it: after the end of seven mon
711,thither twelve thousand men of the valiantest, and commanded them, saying, Go and smite the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead with the edge of the sword, with the women and the children. 
And this is the thing that ye shall do, Ye shall utterly destroy every male, and every woman that hath lain by man. 
And they found among the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead four hundred young virgins, that had known no man by lying with any male: and they brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan. 
And the whole congregation sent some to speak to the children of Benjamin that were in the rock Rimmon, and to call peaceably unto them. 
And Benjamin came again at that time; and they gave them wives whic
877,wind from the wilderness, and smote the four corners of the house, and it fell upon the young men, and they are dead; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
Then Job arose, and rent his mantle, and shaved his head, and fell down upon the ground, and worshipped, 
And said, Naked came I out of my mother's womb, and naked shall I return thither: the LORD gave, and the LORD hath taken away; blessed be the name of the LORD. 
In all this Job sinned not, nor charged God foolishly. 
Again there was a day when the sons of God came to present themselves before the LORD, and Satan came also among them to present himself before the LORD. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, From whence comest thou? And Satan answered the LORD, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and from walking up and down in it. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, Hast thou considered my servant Job, that
665, peradventure he can shew us our way that we should go. 
Then said Saul to his servant, But, behold, if we go, what shall we bring the man? for the bread is spent in our vessels, and there is not a present to bring to the man of God: what have we? 
And the servant answered Saul again, and said, Behold, I have here at hand the fourth part of a shekel of silver: that will I give to the man of God, to tell us our way. 
(Beforetime in Israel, when a man went to enquire of God, thus he spake, Come, and let us go to the seer: for he that is now called a Prophet was beforetime called a Seer.) 
Then said Saul to his servant, Well said; come, let us go. So they went
812,gat him shall thrust him through when he prophesieth. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the prophets shall be ashamed every one of his vision, when he hath prophesied; neither shall they wear a rough garment to deceive: 
But he shall say, I am no prophet, I am an husbandman; for man taught me to keep cattle from my youth. 
And one shall say unto him, What are these wounds in thine hands? Then he shall answer, Those with which I was wounded in the house of my friends. 
Awake, O sword, against my shepherd, and against the man that is my fellow, saith the LORD of hosts: smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered: and I will turn mine hand upon the little ones. 
And it shall come to pass, that in all the land, saith the LORD, two parts therein shall be cut off and die; but the third s
742,ill I magnify myself, and sanctify myself; and I will be known in the eyes of many nations, and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Therefore, thou son of man, prophesy against Gog, and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal: 
And I will turn thee back, and leave but the sixth part of thee, and will cause thee to come up from the north parts, and will bring thee upon the mountains of Israel: 
And I will smite thy bow out of thy left hand, and will cause thine arrows to fall out of thy right hand. 
Thou shalt fall upon the mountains of Israel, thou, and all thy bands, and the people that is with thee: I will give thee unto the ravenous birds of every sort, and to the bea
716, when they arose early on the morrow morning, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the ground before the ark of the LORD; and the head of Dagon and both the palms of his hands were cut off upon the threshold; only the stump of Dagon was left to him. 
Therefore neither the priests of Dagon, nor any that come into Dagon's house, tread on the threshold of Dagon in Ashdod unto this day. 
But the hand of the LORD was heavy upon them of Ashdod, and he destroyed them, and smote them with emerods, even Ashdod and the coasts thereof. 
And when the men of Ashdod saw that it was so, they said, The ark of the God of Israel shall not abide with us: for his hand is sore upon us, and upon Dagon our god. 
They sent th
882,diately we endeavoured to go into Macedonia, assuredly gathering that the Lord had called us for to preach the gospel unto them. 
Therefore loosing from Troas, we came with a straight course to Samothracia, and the next day to Neapolis; 
And from thence to Philippi, which is the chief city of that part of Macedonia, and a colony: and we were in that city abiding certain days. 
And on the sabbath we went out of the city by a river side, where prayer was wont to be made; and we sat down, and spake unto the women which resorted thither. 
And a certain woman named Lydia, a seller of purple, of the city of Thyatira, which worshipped God, heard us: whose heart the Lord opened, that she attended unto the things which were spoken of Paul. 
And when she was baptized, and her household, she besought us, saying, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, 
726, judgment and their dignity shall proceed of themselves. 
Their horses also are swifter than the leopards, and are more fierce than the evening wolves: and their horsemen shall spread themselves, and their horsemen shall come from far; they shall fly as the eagle that hasteth to eat. 
They shall come all for violence: their faces shall sup up as the east wind, and they shall gather the captivity as the sand. 
And they shall scoff at the kings, and the princes shall be a scorn unto them: they shall deride every strong hold; for they shall heap dust, and take it. 
Then shall his mind change, and he shall pass over, and offend, imputing this his power unto his god. 
Art thou not from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Hol
784,ickened us together with Christ, (by grace ye are saved;) 
And hath raised us up together, and made us sit together in heavenly places in Christ Jesus: 
That in the ages to come he might shew the exceeding riches of his grace in his kindness toward us through Christ Jesus. 
For by grace are ye saved through faith; and that not of yourselves: it is the gift of God: 
Not of works, lest any man should boast. 
For we are his workmanship, created in Christ Jesus unto good works, which God hath before ordained that we should walk in them. 
Wherefore remember, that ye being in time past Gentiles in the flesh, who are called Uncircumcision by that which is called the Circumcision in the flesh made by hands; 
That at that time ye were without Christ, being aliens from the commonweal
693,shadow we shall live among the heathen. 
Rejoice and be glad, O daughter of Edom, that dwellest in the land of Uz; the cup also shall pass through unto thee: thou shalt be drunken, and shalt make thyself naked. 
The punishment of thine iniquity is accomplished, O daughter of Zion; he will no more carry thee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us. 
Our necks are under per
909, life: so he that pursueth evil pursueth it to his own death. 
They that are of a froward heart are abomination to the LORD: but such as are upright in their way are his delight. 
Though hand join in hand, the wicked shall not be unpunished: but the seed of the righteous shall be delivered. 
As a jewel of gold in a swine's snout, so is a fair woman which is without discretion. 
The desire of the righteous is only good: but the expectation of the wicked is wrath. 
There is that scattereth, and yet increaseth; and there is that withholdeth more than is meet, but it tendeth to poverty. 
The liberal soul shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall be watered also himself. 
He that withholdeth corn, the people shall curse him: but blessing shall be upon the head of him that selleth it. 
He that diligently seeketh good procureth favour: but he that seeketh mischief, it shall come unto him. 
He that t
863,thee whither I know not; and so when I come and tell Ahab, and he cannot find thee, he shall slay me: but I thy servant fear the LORD from my youth. 
Was it not told my lord what I did when Jezebel slew the prophets of the LORD, how I hid an hundred men of the LORD's prophets by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water? 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here: and he shall slay me. 
And Elijah said, As the LORD of hosts liveth, before whom I stand, I will surely shew myself unto him to day. 
So Obadiah went to meet Ahab, and told him: and Ahab went to meet Elijah. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab saw Elijah, that Ahab said unto him, Art thou he that troubleth Israel? 
And he answered, I have not troubled Israel; but thou, and thy father's house, in that ye have forsaken the commandments of the LORD, and thou hast follo
751,er and stretched out arm, and there is nothing too hard for thee: 
Thou shewest lovingkindness unto thousands, and recompensest the iniquity of the fathers into the bosom of their children after them: the Great, the Mighty God, the LORD of hosts, is his name, 
Great in counsel, and mighty in work: for thine eyes are open upon all the ways of the sons of men: to give every one according to his ways, and according to the fruit of his doings: 
Which hast set signs and wonders in the land of Egypt, even unto this day, and in Israel, and among other men; and hast made thee a name, as at this day; 
And hast brought forth thy people Israel out of the land of Egypt with signs, and with wonders, and with a strong hand, and with a stretched out arm, a
679,he sons of Jehaleleel; Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel. 
And the sons of Ezra were, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa. 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, which Mered took. 
And the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite. 
And the sons of Shimon were, Amnon, and Rinnah, Benhanan, and Tilon. And the sons of Ishi were, Zoheth, and Benzoheth. 
The sons of Shelah the son of Judah were,
842,it was so from that day forward, that he made it a statute and an ordinance for Israel unto this day. 
And when David came to Ziklag, he sent of the spoil unto the elders of Judah, even to his friends, saying, Behold a present for you of the spoil of the enemies of the LORD; 
To them which were in Bethel, and to them which were in south Ramoth, and to them which were in Jattir, 
And to them which were in Aroer, and to them which were in Siphmoth, and to them which were in Eshtemoa, 
And to them which were in Rachal, and to them which were in the cities of the Jerahmeelites, and to them which were in the cities of the Kenites, 
And to them which were in Hormah, and to them which were in Chorashan, and to them which were in Athach, 
And to them which were in Hebron, and to all the places where David himself and his men were wont to 
825,ould walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antichrist. 
Look to yourselves, that we lose not those things which we have wrought, but that we receive a full reward. 
Whosoever transgresseth, and abideth not in the doctrine of Christ, hath not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. 
If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed: 
For he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds. 
Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with paper and ink: but I trust to come unto you, and speak face to face, that our joy may be full. 
The children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen. 

692,her, and Benjamin. If I be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved. 
And the men took that present, and they took double money in their hand and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood before Joseph. 
And when Joseph saw Benjamin with them, he said to the ruler of his house, Bring these men home, and slay, and make ready; for these men shall dine with me at noon. 
And the man did as Joseph bade; and the man brought the men into Joseph's house. 
And the men were afraid, because they were brought into Joseph's house; and they said, Because of the money that was returned in our sacks at the first time are we brought in; that he may seek occasion against us, and fall upon
928,n offering: all this was a burnt offering unto the LORD. 
And they delivered the king's commissions unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors on this side the river: and they furthered the people, and the house of God. 
Now when these things were done, the princes came to me, saying, The people of Israel, and the priests, and the Levites, have not separated themselves from the people of the lands, doing according to their abominations, even of the Canaanites, the Hittites, the Perizzites, the Jebusites, the Ammonites, the Moabites, the Egyptians, and the Amorites. 
For they have taken of their daughters for themselves, and for their sons: so that the holy seed have mingled themselves with the people of those lands: yea, the hand of the princes and rulers hath been chief in this trespass. 
And when I heard this thing, I rent my garment and my mantle, and plucked off the hair of my head and of my beard, and s
798,possession of the Levites, and from the possession of the city, being in the midst of that which is the prince's, between the border of Judah and the border of Benjamin, shall be for the prince. 
As for the rest of the tribes, from the east side unto the west side, Benjamin shall have a portion. 
And by the border of Benjamin, from the east side unto the west side, Simeon shall have a portion. 
And by the border of Simeon, from the east side unto the west side, Issachar a portion. 
And by the border of Issachar, from the east side unto the west side, Zebulun a portion. 
And by the border of Zebulun, from the east side unto the west side, Gad a portion. 
And by the border of Gad, at the south side southward, the border shall be even from Tamar unto the waters of strife in Kadesh, and to t
654,e were the sons of Adah. 
And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife. 
These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes. 
These are the sons of Seir the Horite, who inhabited the land; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, 
And Dishon, and Ezer, and Dishan: these are the dukes of the Horites, the children o
673, his legs, and put them unto his pieces, and unto his head. 
And thou shalt burn the whole ram upon the altar: it is a burnt offering unto the LORD: it is a sweet savour, an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And thou shalt take the other ram; and Aaron and his sons shall put their hands upon the head of the ram. 
Then shalt thou kill the ram, and take of his blood, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of Aaron, and upon the tip of the right ear of his sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great toe of their right foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And thou shalt take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of the
673,ds. 
Wherefore ye shall make images of your emerods, and images of your mice that mar the land; and ye shall give glory unto the God of Israel: peradventure he will lighten his hand from off you, and from off your gods, and from off your land. 
Wherefore then do ye harden your hearts, as the Egyptians and Pharaoh hardened their hearts? when he had wrought wonderfully among them, did they not let the people go, and they departed? 
Now therefore make a new cart, and take two milch kine, on which there hath come no yoke, and tie the kine to the cart, and bring their calves home from them: 
And take the ark of the LORD, and lay it upon the cart; and put the jewels of g
899, were eyewitnesses of his majesty. 
For he received from God the Father honour and glory, when there came such a voice to him from the excellent glory, This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased. 
And this voice which came from heaven we heard, when we were with him in the holy mount. 
We have also a more sure word of prophecy; whereunto ye do well that ye take heed, as unto a light that shineth in a dark place, until the day dawn, and the day star arise in your hearts: 
Knowing this first, that no prophecy of the scripture is of any private interpretation. 
For the prophecy came not in old time by the will of man: but holy men of God spake as they were moved by the Holy Ghost. 
But there were false prophets also among the people, even as there shall be false teachers among you, who privily shall bring in damnable heresies, even denying the Lord that bought them, and bring upon t
692,Paul to morrow into the council, as though they would enquire somewhat of him more perfectly. 
But do not thou yield unto them: for there lie in wait for him of them more than forty men, which have bound themselves with an oath, that they will neither eat nor drink till they have killed him: and now are they ready, looking for a promise from thee. 
So the chief captain then let the young man depart, and charged him, See thou tell no man that thou hast shewed these things to me. 
And he called unto him two centurions, saying, Make ready two hundred soldiers to go to Caesarea, and horsemen threescore and ten, and spearmen two hundred, at the third hour of the night; 
And provide them b
741,plied in Jerusalem greatly; and a great company of the priests were obedient to the faith. 
And Stephen, full of faith and power, did great wonders and miracles among the people. 
Then there arose certain of the synagogue, which is called the synagogue of the Libertines, and Cyrenians, and Alexandrians, and of them of Cilicia and of Asia, disputing with Stephen. 
And they were not able to resist the wisdom and the spirit by which he spake. 
Then they suborned men, which said, We have heard him speak blasphemous words against Moses, and against God. 
And they stirred up the people, and the elders, and the scribes, and came upon him, and caught him, and brought him to the council, 
And set up false witnesses, which said, This man cea
951,e right hand unto the inhabitants of Entappuah. 
Now Manasseh had the land of Tappuah: but Tappuah on the border of Manasseh belonged to the children of Ephraim; 
And the coast descended unto the river Kanah, southward of the river: these cities of Ephraim are among the cities of Manasseh: the coast of Manasseh also was on the north side of the river, and the outgoings of it were at the sea: 
Southward it was Ephraim's, and northward it was Manasseh's, and the sea is his border; and they met together in Asher on the north, and in Issachar on the east. 
And Manasseh had in Issachar and in Asher Bethshean and her towns, and Ibleam and her towns, and the inhabitants of Dor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Endor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Taanach and her towns, and the inhabitants of Megiddo and her towns, even three countries. 
Yet the children of Manasseh could not drive out the inhabitants of those cities; but the Canaanit
662,tion without the vail, which is before the testimony, Aaron and his sons shall order it from evening to morning before the LORD: it shall be a statute for ever unto their generations on the behalf of the children of Israel. 
And take thou unto thee Aaron thy brother, and his sons with him, from among the children of Israel, that he may minister unto me in the priest's office, even Aaron, Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar, Aaron's sons. 
And thou shalt make holy garments for Aaron thy brother for glory and for beauty. 
And thou shalt speak unto all that are wise hearted, whom I have filled with the spirit of wisdom, that they may make Aaron's garments 
802, How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing the women are destroyed out of Benjamin? 
And they said, There must be an inheritance for them that be escaped of Benjamin, that a tribe be not destroyed out of Israel. 
Howbeit we may not give them wives of our daughters: for the children of Israel have sworn, saying, Cursed be he that giveth a wife to Benjamin. 
Then they said, Behold, there is a feast of the LORD in Shiloh yearly in a place which is on the north side of Bethel, on the east side of the highway that goeth up from Bethel to Shechem, and on the south of Lebonah. 
Therefore they commanded the children of Benjamin, saying, Go and lie in wait in the vineyards; 
And see, and, behold, if the daughters of Shiloh come out to dance in dances, then come ye out of the vineyards, a
683,oever he went. 
And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadadezer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
And from Betah, and from Berothai, cities of Hadadezer, king David took exceeding much brass. 
When Toi king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer, 
Then Toi sent Joram his son unto king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer, and smitten him: for Hadadezer had wars with Toi. And Joram brought with him vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass: 
Which also king David did dedicate unto the LORD, with the silver and gold that he had dedicated of all nations which he subd
755,he scripture was fulfilled, which saith, And he was numbered with the transgressors. 
And they that passed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and saying, Ah, thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, 
Save thyself, and come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking said among themselves with the scribes, He saved others; himself he cannot save. 
Let Christ the King of Israel descend now from the cross, that we may see and believe. And they that were crucified with him reviled him. 
And when the sixth hour was come, there was darkness over the whole land until the ninth hour. 
And at the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eloi, Eloi, lama sabachthani? which is, being interpreted, My God
805,made haste, and took two hundred loaves, and two bottles of wine, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of parched corn, and an hundred clusters of raisins, and two hundred cakes of figs, and laid them on asses. 
And she said unto her servants, Go on before me; behold, I come after you. But she told not her husband Nabal. 
And it was so, as she rode on the ass, that she came down by the covert on the hill, and, behold, David and his men came down against her; and she met them. 
Now David had said, Surely in vain have I kept all that this fellow hath in the wilderness, so that nothing was missed of all that pertained unto him: and he hath requited me evil for good. 
So and more also do God unto the enemies of David, if I leave of all that pertain to him by the morning light any that pi
771,hat bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace! O Judah, keep thy solemn feasts, perform thy vows: for the wicked shall no more pass through thee; he is utterly cut off. 
He that dasheth in pieces is come up before thy face: keep the munition, watch the way, make thy loins strong, fortify thy power mightily. 
For the LORD hath turned away the excellency of Jacob, as the excellency of Israel: for the emptiers have emptied them out, and marred their vine branches. 
The shield of his mighty men is made red, the valiant men are in scarlet: the chariots shall be with flaming torches in the day of his preparation, and the fir trees shall be terribly shaken. 
The chariots shall rage in the streets, they shall justle one against another in the broad ways: they shall 
905, his own pit: but the upright shall have good things in possession. 
The rich man is wise in his own conceit; but the poor that hath understanding searcheth him out. 
When righteous men do rejoice, there is great glory: but when the wicked rise, a man is hidden. 
He that covereth his sins shall not prosper: but whoso confesseth and forsaketh them shall have mercy. 
Happy is the man that feareth alway: but he that hardeneth his heart shall fall into mischief. 
As a roaring lion, and a ranging bear; so is a wicked ruler over the poor people. 
The prince that wanteth understanding is also a great oppressor: but he that hateth covetousness shall prolong his days. 
A man that doeth violence to the blood of any person shall flee to the pit; let no man stay him. 
Whoso walketh uprightly shall be saved: but he that is perverse in his ways shall fall at once. 
He that tilleth his land shall have plent
868,ll that are with me salute thee. Greet them that love us in the faith. Grace be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, a prisoner of Jesus Christ, and Timothy our brother, unto Philemon our dearly beloved, and fellowlabourer, 
And to our beloved Apphia, and Archippus our fellowsoldier, and to the church in thy house: 
Grace to you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
I thank my God, making mention of thee always in my prayers, 
Hearing of thy love and faith, which thou hast toward the Lord Jesus, and toward all saints; 
That the communication of thy faith may become effectual by the acknowledging of every good thing which is in you in Christ Jesus. 
For we have great joy and consolation in thy love, because the bowels of the saints are refreshed by thee, brother. 
Wherefore, though I might be much bold in Christ to enjoin thee that which is conv
742,old went to one target. 
And he made three hundred shields of beaten gold; three pound of gold went to one shield: and the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with the best gold. 
The throne had six steps, and the top of the throne was round behind: and there were stays on either side on the place of the seat, and two lions stood beside the stays. 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps: there was not the like made in any kingdom. 
And all king Solomon's drinking vessels were of gold, and all the vessels of the house of the forest of Lebanon were of pure gold; none were of silver: it was nothing accounted of in
867,on, and a bear, and took a lamb out of the flock: 
And I went out after him, and smote him, and delivered it out of his mouth: and when he arose against me, I caught him by his beard, and smote him, and slew him. 
Thy servant slew both the lion and the bear: and this uncircumcised Philistine shall be as one of them, seeing he hath defied the armies of the living God. 
David said moreover, The LORD that delivered me out of the paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of the hand of this Philistine. And Saul said unto David, Go, and the LORD be with thee. 
And Saul armed David with his armour, and he put an helmet of brass upon his head; also he armed him with a coat of mail. 
And David girded his sword upon his armour, and he assayed to go; for he had not proved it. And David said unto Saul, I cannot go with these; for I have
905,d confirmation of the gospel, ye all are partakers of my grace. 
For God is my record, how greatly I long after you all in the bowels of Jesus Christ. 
And this I pray, that your love may abound yet more and more in knowledge and in all judgment; 
That ye may approve things that are excellent; that ye may be sincere and without offence till the day of Christ. 
Being filled with the fruits of righteousness, which are by Jesus Christ, unto the glory and praise of God. 
But I would ye should understand, brethren, that the things which happened unto me have fallen out rather unto the furtherance of the gospel; 
So that my bonds in Christ are manifest in all the palace, and in all other places; 
And many of the brethren in the Lord, waxing confident by my bonds, are much more bold to speak the word without fear. 
Some indeed preach Christ even of envy and strife; and some also of good will: 
The o
662, him up another adversary, Rezon the son of Eliadah, which fled from his lord Hadadezer king of Zobah: 
And he gathered men unto him, and became captain over a band, when David slew them of Zobah: and they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and reigned in Damascus. 
And he was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon, beside the mischief that Hadad did: and he abhorred Israel, and reigned over Syria. 
And Jeroboam the son of Nebat, an Ephrathite of Zereda, Solomon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built
953, slay the broken in heart. 
As he loved cursing, so let it come unto him: as he delighted not in blessing, so let it be far from him. 
As he clothed himself with cursing like as with his garment, so let it come into his bowels like water, and like oil into his bones. 
Let it be unto him as the garment which covereth him, and for a girdle wherewith he is girded continually. 
Let this be the reward of mine adversaries from the LORD, and of them that speak evil against my soul. 
But do thou for me, O GOD the Lord, for thy name's sake: because thy mercy is good, deliver thou me. 
For I am poor and needy, and my heart is wounded within me. 
I am gone like the shadow when it declineth: I am tossed up and down as the locust. 
My knees are weak through fasting; and my flesh faileth of fatness. 
I became also a reproach unto them: when they looked upon me they shaked their heads. 
Help me, O LORD my God: O save me according to thy mercy: 
That they
790,a captain to return to their bondage: but thou art a God ready to pardon, gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and forsookest them not. 
Yea, when they had made them a molten calf, and said, This is thy God that brought thee up out of Egypt, and had wrought great provocations; 
Yet thou in thy manifold mercies forsookest them not in the wilderness: the pillar of the cloud departed not from them by day, to lead them in the way; neither the pillar of fire by night, to shew them light, and the way wherein they should go. 
Thou gavest also thy good spirit to instruct them, and withheldest not thy manna from their mouth, and gavest them water for their thirst. 
Yea, forty years didst thou sustain them in the wilderness, so that they lacked nothing; their clothe
751,are her near kinswomen: it is wickedness. 
Neither shalt thou take a wife to her sister, to vex her, to uncover her nakedness, beside the other in her life time. 
Also thou shalt not approach unto a woman to uncover her nakedness, as long as she is put apart for her uncleanness. 
Moreover thou shalt not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife, to defile thyself with her. 
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to Molech, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination. 
Neither shalt thou lie with any beast to defile thyself therewith: neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye your
714,the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he shall offer unto the LORD. 
If he offer it for a thanksgiving, then he shall offer with the sacrifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of fine flour, fried. 
Besides the cakes, he shall offer for his offering leavened bread with the sacrifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an heave offering unto the LORD, and it shall be the priest's that sprinkleth the blood of the peace offerings. 
And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten the same day that it is offered; he shall 
857,e trees, and strawed them in the way. 
And they that went before, and they that followed, cried, saying, Hosanna; Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord: 
Blessed be the kingdom of our father David, that cometh in the name of the Lord: Hosanna in the highest. 
And Jesus entered into Jerusalem, and into the temple: and when he had looked round about upon all things, and now the eventide was come, he went out unto Bethany with the twelve. 
And on the morrow, when they were come from Bethany, he was hungry: 
And seeing a fig tree afar off having leaves, he came, if haply he might find any thing thereon: and when he came to it, he found nothing but leaves; for the time of figs was not yet. 
And Jesus answered and said unto it, No man eat fruit of thee hereafter for ever. And his disciples heard it. 
And they come to Jerusalem: and Jesus w
838,
And changed the glory of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping things. 
Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves: 
Who changed the truth of God into a lie, and worshipped and served the creature more than the Creator, who is blessed for ever. Amen. 
For this cause God gave them up unto vile affections: for even their women did change the natural use into that which is against nature: 
And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet. 
And even as they did not like to retain God in the
757, go to Caesarea, and horsemen threescore and ten, and spearmen two hundred, at the third hour of the night; 
And provide them beasts, that they may set Paul on, and bring him safe unto Felix the governor. 
And he wrote a letter after this manner: 
Claudius Lysias unto the most excellent governor Felix sendeth greeting. 
This man was taken of the Jews, and should have been killed of them: then came I with an army, and rescued him, having understood that he was a Roman. 
And when I would have known the cause wherefore they accused him, I brought him forth into their council: 
Whom I perceived to be accused of questions of their law, but to have nothing laid to his charge worthy of death or of bonds. 
And when it was told me how that the Jews laid wa
758,nd threshing instruments and other instruments of the oxen for wood. 
All these things did Araunah, as a king, give unto the king. And Araunah said unto the king, The LORD thy God accept thee. 
And the king said unto Araunah, Nay; but I will surely buy it of thee at a price: neither will I offer burnt offerings unto the LORD my God of that which doth cost me nothing. So David bought the threshingfloor and the oxen for fifty shekels of silver. 
And David built there an altar unto the LORD, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings. So the LORD was intreated for the land, and the plague was stayed from Israel. 
Now king David was old and stricken in years; and they covered him with clothes, but he gat no heat. 
Wherefore his servants said unto 
796, to another, Let us make a captain, and let us return into Egypt. 
Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before all the assembly of the congregation of the children of Israel. 
And Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of them that searched the land, rent their clothes: 
And they spake unto all the company of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to search it, is an exceeding good land. 
If the LORD delight in us, then he will bring us into this land, and give it us; a land which floweth with milk and honey. 
Only rebel not ye against the LORD, neither fear ye the people of the land; for they are bread for us: their defence is departed from them, and the LORD is with us: fear them not. 
But all the congregation bade stone them 
751,iven unto him out of the children of Israel. 
And thou shalt appoint Aaron and his sons, and they shall wait on their priest's office: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
And I, behold, I have taken the Levites from among the children of Israel instead of all the firstborn that openeth the matrix among the children of Israel: therefore the Levites shall be mine; 
Because all the firstborn are mine; for on the day that I smote all the firstborn in the land of Egypt I hallowed unto me all the firstborn in Israel, both man and beast: mine shall they be: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, saying, 
Number the children of Levi after the house of th
851,e to pass, when he was come, that he blew a trumpet in the mountain of Ephraim, and the children of Israel went down with him from the mount, and he before them. 
And he said unto them, Follow after me: for the LORD hath delivered your enemies the Moabites into your hand. And they went down after him, and took the fords of Jordan toward Moab, and suffered not a man to pass over. 
And they slew of Moab at that time about ten thousand men, all lusty, and all men of valour; and there escaped not a man. 
So Moab was subdued that day under the hand of Israel. And the land had rest fourscore years. 
And after him was Shamgar the son of Anath, which slew of the Philistines six hundred men with an ox goad: and he also delivered Israel. 
And the children of Israel again did evil in the sight of the LORD, when Ehud was dead. 
And the LORD sold them 
776,ies shall perish. 
Delight is not seemly for a fool; much less for a servant to have rule over princes. 
The discretion of a man deferreth his anger; and it is his glory to pass over a transgression. 
The king's wrath is as the roaring of a lion; but his favour is as dew upon the grass. 
A foolish son is the calamity of his father: and the contentions of a wife are a continual dropping. 
House and riches are the inheritance of fathers: and a prudent wife is from the LORD. 
Slothfulness casteth into a deep sleep; and an idle soul shall suffer hunger. 
He that keepeth the commandment keepeth his own soul; but he that despiseth his ways shall die. 
He that hath pity upon the poor lendeth unto the LORD; and that which he hath given will he pay him again. 
Chasten thy so
833,e have not kept the charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols; they shall even bear their iniquity. 
Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at the gates of the house, and ministering to the house: they shall slay the burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and they shall stand before them to minister unto them. 
Because they ministered unto them before their idols, and caused the house of Israel to fall into iniquity; therefore have I lifted up m
700, then? Is the law sin? God forbid. Nay, I had not known sin, but by the law: for I had not known lust, except the law had said, Thou shalt not covet. 
But sin, taking occasion by the commandment, wrought in me all manner of concupiscence. For without the law sin was dead. 
For I was alive without the law once: but when the commandment came, sin revived, and I died. 
And the commandment, which was ordained to life, I found to be unto death. 
For sin, taking occasion by the commandment, deceived me, and by it slew me. 
Wherefore the law is holy, and the commandment holy, and just, and good. 
Was then that which is good made death unto me? God forbid. But sin, that it might appear sin, working 
875,nor of any of their's: neither shall there be wailing for them. 
The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
For the seller shall not return to that which is sold, although they were yet alive: for the vision is touching the whole multitude thereof, which shall not return; neither shall any strengthen himself in the iniquity of his life. 
They have blown the trumpet, even to make all ready; but none goeth to the battle: for my wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
The sword is without, and the pestilence and the famine within: he that is in the field shall die with the sword; and he that is in the city, famine and pestilence shall devour him. 
But they that escape of them shall escape, and shall be on the mountains like doves of the valleys, all of them mourning, every 
844,s of trouble? 
The wicked in his pride doth persecute the poor: let them be taken in the devices that they have imagined. 
For the wicked boasteth of his heart's desire, and blesseth the covetous, whom the LORD abhorreth. 
The wicked, through the pride of his countenance, will not seek after God: God is not in all his thoughts. 
His ways are always grievous; thy judgments are far above out of his sight: as for all his enemies, he puffeth at them. 
He hath said in his heart, I shall not be moved: for I shall never be in adversity. 
His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his tongue is mischief and vanity. 
He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret places doth he murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against the poor. 
He lieth in wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait to ca
729,t shut me up into the hand of the enemy: thou hast set my feet in a large room. 
Have mercy upon me, O LORD, for I am in trouble: mine eye is consumed with grief, yea, my soul and my belly. 
For my life is spent with grief, and my years with sighing: my strength faileth because of mine iniquity, and my bones are consumed. 
I was a reproach among all mine enemies, but especially among my neighbours, and a fear to mine acquaintance: they that did see me without fled from me. 
I am forgotten as a dead man out of mind: I am like a broken vessel. 
For I have heard the slander of many: fear was on every side: while they took counsel together against me, they devised to take away my life. 
But I trusted in thee, O LORD: I said
824,ed: others said, An angel spake to him. 
Jesus answered and said, This voice came not because of me, but for your sakes. 
Now is the judgment of this world: now shall the prince of this world be cast out. 
And I, if I be lifted up from the earth, will draw all men unto me. 
This he said, signifying what death he should die. 
The people answered him, We have heard out of the law that Christ abideth for ever: and how sayest thou, The Son of man must be lifted up? who is this Son of man? 
Then Jesus said unto them, Yet a little while is the light with you. Walk while ye have the light, lest darkness come upon you: for he that walketh in darkness knoweth not whither he goeth. 
While ye have light, believe in the light, that ye may be the children of light. These things spake Jesus, and departed, and did hide himself 
677,, yet he shall keep the passover unto the LORD. 
The fourteenth day of the second month at even they shall keep it, and eat it with unleavened bread and bitter herbs. 
They shall leave none of it unto the morning, nor break any bone of it: according to all the ordinances of the passover they shall keep it. 
But the man that is clean, and is not in a journey, and forbeareth to keep the passover, even the same soul shall be cut off from among his people: because he brought not the offering of the LORD in his appointed season, that man shall bear his sin. 
And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover unto the LORD; according to the ordinance of th
838,s the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he slew it; and Moses took of the blood of it, and put it upon the tip of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot. 
And he brought Aaron's sons, and Moses put of the blood upon the tip of their right ear, and upon the thumbs of their right hands, and upon the great toes of their right feet: and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he took the fat, and the rump, and all the fat that was upon the inwards, and the caul above the liver, and the two kidneys, and their fat, and the right shoulder: 
And out of the basket of unleavened bread, that was before the LORD, he took one unleavened cake, and a c
746,an will not be in rest, until he have finished the thing this day. 
Then went Boaz up to the gate, and sat him down there: and, behold, the kinsman of whom Boaz spake came by; unto whom he said, Ho, such a one! turn aside, sit down here. And he turned aside, and sat down. 
And he took ten men of the elders of the city, and said, Sit ye down here. And they sat down. 
And he said unto the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, selleth a parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it before the inhabitants, and before the elders of my people. If thou wilt redeem it, redeem it: but if thou wilt not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know: for there is none to rede
767, ye shall not cover your lips, nor eat the bread of men. 
And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their daughters, 
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto thee, to cause thee to hear it with thine ears? 
In that day shall thy mouth be opened to him which is escaped, and thou shalt sp
893,he captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the joints of the harness: wherefore he said unto the driver of his chariot, Turn thine hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am wounded. 
And the battle increased that day: and the king was stayed up in his chariot against the Syrians, and died at even: and the blood ran out of the wound into the midst of the chariot. 
And there went a proclamation throughout the host about the going down of the sun, saying, Every man to his city, and every man to his own country. 
So the king died, and was brought to Samaria; and they buried the king in Samaria. 
And one washed the chariot in the pool of Samaria; and the dogs licked up his blood; and they washed his armour; according unto the word o
689,the people that were in Mizpah, even the king's daughters, and all the people that remained in Mizpah, whom Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had committed to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah carried them away captive, and departed to go over to the Ammonites. 
But when Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had done, 
Then they took all the men, and went to fight with Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great waters that are in Gibeon. 
Now it came to pass, that when all the people which were with Ishmael saw Johanan the son of Kareah, a
745, and Aaron. 
And it came to pass on the day when the LORD spake unto Moses in the land of Egypt, 
That the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, I am the LORD: speak thou unto Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I say unto thee. 
And Moses said before the LORD, Behold, I am of uncircumcised lips, and how shall Pharaoh hearken unto me? 
And the LORD said unto Moses, See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh: and Aaron thy brother shall be thy prophet. 
Thou shalt speak all that I command thee: and Aaron thy brother shall speak unto Pharaoh, that he send the children of Israel out of his land. 
And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my wonders in the land of Egypt. 
But Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you, that I may lay my hand up
829,rts, nor his power, nor his comely proportion. 
Who can discover the face of his garment? or who can come to him with his double bridle? 
Who can open the doors of his face? his teeth are terrible round about. 
His scales are his pride, shut up together as with a close seal. 
One is so near to another, that no air can come between them. 
They are joined one to another, they stick together, that they cannot be sundered. 
By his neesings a light doth shine, and his eyes are like the eyelids of the morning. 
Out of his mouth go burning lamps, and sparks of fire leap out. 
Out of his nostrils goeth smoke, as out of a seething pot or caldron. 
His breath kindleth coals, and a flame goeth out of his mouth. 
In his neck remaineth strength, and sorrow is turned into joy before him. 
The flakes of his flesh are joined together
751,gressions: make me not the reproach of the foolish. 
I was dumb, I opened not my mouth; because thou didst it. 
Remove thy stroke away from me: I am consumed by the blow of thine hand. 
When thou with rebukes dost correct man for iniquity, thou makest his beauty to consume away like a moth: surely every man is vanity. Selah. 
Hear my prayer, O LORD, and give ear unto my cry; hold not thy peace at my tears: for I am a stranger with thee, and a sojourner, as all my fathers were. 
O spare me, that I may recover strength, before I go hence, and be no more. 
I waited patiently for the LORD; and he inclined unto me, and heard my cry. 
He brought me up also out of an horrible pit, out of the miry clay, and set my feet upon a rock, and established m
813,ed in his field: 
But while men slept, his enemy came and sowed tares among the wheat, and went his way. 
But when the blade was sprung up, and brought forth fruit, then appeared the tares also. 
So the servants of the householder came and said unto him, Sir, didst not thou sow good seed in thy field? from whence then hath it tares? 
He said unto them, An enemy hath done this. The servants said unto him, Wilt thou then that we go and gather them up? 
But he said, Nay; lest while ye gather up the tares, ye root up also the wheat with them. 
Let both grow together until the harvest: and in the time of harvest I will say to the reapers, Gather ye together first the tares, and bind them in bundles to burn them: but gather the wheat into my barn. 
Another parable put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom 
940,eper than the skin, and the hair thereof be not turned white; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague seven days: 
And the priest shall look on him the seventh day: and, behold, if the plague in his sight be at a stay, and the plague spread not in the skin; then the priest shall shut him up seven days more: 
And the priest shall look on him again the seventh day: and, behold, if the plague be somewhat dark, and the plague spread not in the skin, the priest shall pronounce him clean: it is but a scab: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scab spread much abroad in the skin, after that he hath been seen of the priest for his cleansing, he shall be seen of the priest again. 
And if the priest see that, behold, the scab spreadeth in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a leprosy. 
When the plague of leprosy is in a man, then he shall be brought unto the priest; 
And the pr
877,ined, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves unto them, so as it should not fail, that they would keep these two days according to their writing, and according to their appointed time every year; 
And that these days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the memorial of them perish from their seed. 
Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority, to confirm this second letter of Purim. 
And he sent the letters unto all the Jews, to the hundred twenty and seven provinces of the kingdom of Ahasuerus, with words of peace and truth, 
To confirm these days of Purim in their times appointed, according as Mordecai the Jew and Esther the queen had enj
887,ss, when all that knew him beforetime saw that, behold, he prophesied among the prophets, then the people said one to another, What is this that is come unto the son of Kish? Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And one of the same place answered and said, But who is their father? Therefore it became a proverb, Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And when he had made an end of prophesying, he came to the high place. 
And Saul's uncle said unto him and to his servant, Whither went ye? And he said, To seek the asses: and when we saw that they were no where, we came to Samuel. 
And Saul's uncle said, Tell me, I pray thee, what Samuel said unto you. 
And Saul said unto his uncle, He told us plainly that the asses were found. But of the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he told him not. 
And Samuel called the people together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the child
878,lves against me, saying, Mine own hand hath saved me. 
Now therefore go to, proclaim in the ears of the people, saying, Whosoever is fearful and afraid, let him return and depart early from mount Gilead. And there returned of the people twenty and two thousand; and there remained ten thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people are yet too many; bring them down unto the water, and I will try them for thee there: and it shall be, that of whom I say unto thee, This shall go with thee, the same shall go with thee; and of whomsoever I say unto thee, This shall not go with thee, the same shall not go. 
So he brought down the people unto the water: and the LORD said unto Gideon, Every one that lappeth of the water with his tongue, as a dog lappeth, him shalt thou set by himself; likewise every one that boweth down upon his knees to drink. 
And the number of them t
726,ousand left alive did the children of Judah carry away captive, and brought them unto the top of the rock, and cast them down from the top of the rock, that they all were broken in pieces. 
But the soldiers of the army which Amaziah sent back, that they should not go with him to battle, fell upon the cities of Judah, from Samaria even unto Bethhoron, and smote three thousand of them, and took much spoil. 
Now it came to pass, after that Amaziah was come from the slaughter of the Edomites, that he brought the gods of the children of Seir, and set them up to be his gods, and bowed down himself before them, and burned incense unto them. 
Wherefore the anger of the LORD was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent unto him a
652,s of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were slain. 
And there ran a man of Benjamin out of the army, and came to Shiloh the same day with his clothes rent, and with earth upon his head. 
And when he came, lo, Eli sat upon a seat by the wayside watching: for his heart trembled for the ark of God. And when the man came into the city, and told it, all the city cried out. 
And when Eli heard the noise of the crying, he said, What meaneth the noise of this tumult? And the man came in hastily, and told Eli. 
Now Eli was ninety and eight years old; and his eyes were dim, that he could not see. 
And the man said unto Eli, I am he that came out of the army, and
932, with them that go down to the pit. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; In the day when he went down to the grave I caused a mourning: I covered the deep for him, and I restrained the floods thereof, and the great waters were stayed: and I caused Lebanon to mourn for him, and all the trees of the field fainted for him. 
I made the nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I cast him down to hell with them that descend into the pit: and all the trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water, shall be comforted in the nether parts of the earth. 
They also went down into hell with him unto them that be slain with the sword; and they that were his arm, that dwelt under his shadow in the midst of the heathen. 
To whom art thou thus like in glory and in greatness among the trees of Eden? yet shalt thou be brought down with the trees of Eden unto the nether parts of the earth: thou shalt lie in the midst of t
950, crushed before the moth? 
They are destroyed from morning to evening: they perish for ever without any regarding it. 
Doth not their excellency which is in them go away? they die, even without wisdom. 
Call now, if there be any that will answer thee; and to which of the saints wilt thou turn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitation. 
His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, neither is there any to deliver them. 
Whose harvest the hungry eateth up, and taketh it even out of the thorns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance. 
Although affliction cometh not forth of the dust, neither doth trouble spring out of the ground; 
Yet man is born unto trouble, as the sparks fly upward. 
I would seek unto God, and unto God would I commit my cause: 
Which doeth great things and unsearchable; marvellous things with
857,tray from me, neither be polluted any more with all their transgressions; but that they may be my people, and I may be their God, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again to me, saying, 
Son of man, when the land sinneth against me by trespassing grievously, then will I stretch out mine hand upon it, and will break the staff of the bread thereof, and will send famine upon it, and will cut off man and beast from it: 
Though these three men, Noah, Daniel, and Job, were in it, they should deliver but their own souls by their righteousness, saith the Lord GOD. 
If I cause noisome beasts to pass through the land, and they spoil it, so that it be desolate, that no man may pass through because of the beasts: 
Though these three men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither sons nor daughters; they only shall be d
805,ed himself exceedingly. 
Moreover Uzziah built towers in Jerusalem at the corner gate, and at the valley gate, and at the turning of the wall, and fortified them. 
Also he built towers in the desert, and digged many wells: for he had much cattle, both in the low country, and in the plains: husbandmen also, and vine dressers in the mountains, and in Carmel: for he loved husbandry. 
Moreover Uzziah had an host of fighting men, that went out to war by bands, according to the number of their account by the hand of Jeiel the scribe and Maaseiah the ruler, under the hand of Hananiah, one of the king's captains. 
The whole number of the chief of the fathers of the mighty men of valour were two thousand and six hundred. 
And under their hand was an army, three hundred thousand and seven thousand and fi
933,est they die. These things are the burden of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And to the office of Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest pertaineth the oil for the light, and the sweet incense, and the daily meat offering, and the anointing oil, and the oversight of all the tabernacle, and of all that therein is, in the sanctuary, and in the vessels thereof. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron saying, 
Cut ye not off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the Levites: 
But thus do unto them, that they may live, and not die, when they approach unto the most holy things: Aaron and his sons shall go in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden: 
But they shall not go in to see when the holy things are covered, lest they die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take also the sum of the sons of Gershon, throughout the houses of their fathers, by their 
810,d she shall continue in the blood of her purifying threescore and six days. 
And when the days of her purifying are fulfilled, for a son, or for a daughter, she shall bring a lamb of the first year for a burnt offering, and a young pigeon, or a turtledove, for a sin offering, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, unto the priest: 
Who shall offer it before the LORD, and make an atonement for her; and she shall be cleansed from the issue of her blood. This is the law for her that hath born a male or a female. 
And if she be not able to bring a lamb, then she shall bring two turtles, or two young pigeons; the one for the burnt offering, and the other for a sin offering: and the priest shall make an atonement for her, and she shall be clean. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron, sayi
947,D; the plague is begun. 
And Aaron took as Moses commanded, and ran into the midst of the congregation; and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and he put on incense, and made an atonement for the people. 
And he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was stayed. 
Now they that died in the plague were fourteen thousand and seven hundred, beside them that died about the matter of Korah. 
And Aaron returned unto Moses unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and the plague was stayed. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and take of every one of them a rod according to the house of their fathers, of all their princes according to the house of their fathers twelve rods: write thou every man's name upon his rod. 
And thou shalt write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one rod shall be for the head of the house of their fathers. 
And thou shalt lay them up i
898,found, 
Or all that about which he hath sworn falsely; he shall even restore it in the principal, and shall add the fifth part more thereto, and give it unto him to whom it appertaineth, in the day of his trespass offering. 
And he shall bring his trespass offering unto the LORD, a ram without blemish out of the flock, with thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: 
And the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD: and it shall be forgiven him for any thing of all that he hath done in trespassing therein. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command Aaron and his sons, saying, This is the law of the burnt offering: It is the burnt offering, because of the burning upon the altar all night unto the morning, and the fire of the altar shall be burning in it. 
And the priest shall put on his linen garment, and his linen breeches shall he put upon his flesh,
868,d service. 
And these things will they do unto you, because they have not known the Father, nor me. 
But these things have I told you, that when the time shall come, ye may remember that I told you of them. And these things I said not unto you at the beginning, because I was with you. 
But now I go my way to him that sent me; and none of you asketh me, Whither goest thou? 
But because I have said these things unto you, sorrow hath filled your heart. 
Nevertheless I tell you the truth; It is expedient for you that I go away: for if I go not away, the Comforter will not come unto you; but if I depart, I will send him unto you. 
And when he is come, he will reprove the world of sin, and of righteousness, and of judgment: 
Of sin, because they believe not on me; 
Of righteousness, because I go to my Father, and ye see me no more; 
Of judgment, because the prin
905, her nakedness; for they are her near kinswomen: it is wickedness. 
Neither shalt thou take a wife to her sister, to vex her, to uncover her nakedness, beside the other in her life time. 
Also thou shalt not approach unto a woman to uncover her nakedness, as long as she is put apart for her uncleanness. 
Moreover thou shalt not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife, to defile thyself with her. 
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to Molech, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination. 
Neither shalt thou lie with any beast to defile thyself therewith: neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which I cast out before you: 
And the land is defiled: th
847,ut their name from under heaven: and I will make of thee a nation mightier and greater than they. 
So I turned and came down from the mount, and the mount burned with fire: and the two tables of the covenant were in my two hands. 
And I looked, and, behold, ye had sinned against the LORD your God, and had made you a molten calf: ye had turned aside quickly out of the way which the LORD had commanded you. 
And I took the two tables, and cast them out of my two hands, and brake them before your eyes. 
And I fell down before the LORD, as at the first, forty days and forty nights: I did neither eat bread, nor drink water, because of all your sins which ye sinned, in doing wickedly in the sight of the LORD, to provoke him to anger. 
For I was afraid of the anger and hot displeasure, wherewith the LORD was wroth against you to destroy you. B
857,elt in that land, that Reuben went and lay with Bilhah his father's concubine: and Israel heard it. Now the sons of Jacob were twelve: 
The sons of Leah; Reuben, Jacob's firstborn, and Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Zebulun: 
The sons of Rachel; Joseph, and Benjamin: 
And the sons of Bilhah, Rachel's handmaid; Dan, and Naphtali: 
And the sons of Zilpah, Leah's handmaid: Gad, and Asher: these are the sons of Jacob, which were born to him in Padanaram. 
And Jacob came unto Isaac his father unto Mamre, unto the city of Arbah, which is Hebron, where Abraham and Isaac sojourned. 
And the days of Isaac were an hundred and fourscore years. 
And Isaac gave up the ghost, and died, and was gathered unto his people, being old and full of days: and his sons Esau and Jacob buried him. 
Now these are the generations of Esau, who is Edom. 
Esau
873,all that the Philistines had done to Saul, 
They arose, all the valiant men, and took away the body of Saul, and the bodies of his sons, and brought them to Jabesh, and buried their bones under the oak in Jabesh, and fasted seven days. 
So Saul died for his transgression which he committed against the LORD, even against the word of the LORD, which he kept not, and also for asking counsel of one that had a familiar spirit, to enquire of it; 
And enquired not of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom unto David the son of Jesse. 
Then all Israel gathered themselves to David unto Hebron, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
And moreover in time past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD thy God said unto thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my peopl
906,tly sought the goat of the sin offering, and, behold, it was burnt: and he was angry with Eleazar and Ithamar, the sons of Aaron which were left alive, saying, 
Wherefore have ye not eaten the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have eaten it in the holy place, as I commanded. 
And Aaron said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered their sin offering and their burnt offering before the LORD; and such things have befallen me: and if I had eaten the sin offering to day, should it have been accepted in the sight of the LORD? 
And when Moses heard that, he was content. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and to Aaron, saying unto them, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, Thes
740,ht which no man can approach unto; whom no man hath seen, nor can see: to whom be honour and power everlasting. Amen. 
Charge them that are rich in this world, that they be not highminded, nor trust in uncertain riches, but in the living God, who giveth us richly all things to enjoy; 
That they do good, that they be rich in good works, ready to distribute, willing to communicate; 
Laying up in store for themselves a good foundation against the time to come, that they may lay hold on eternal life. 
O Timothy, keep that which is committed to thy trust, avoiding profane and vain babblings, and oppositions of science falsely so called: 
Which some professing have erred concerning the faith. Grace be with thee. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle 
947,re alive and remain unto the coming of the Lord shall not prevent them which are asleep. 
For the Lord himself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall rise first: 
Then we which are alive and remain shall be caught up together with them in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the air: and so shall we ever be with the Lord. 
Wherefore comfort one another with these words. 
But of the times and the seasons, brethren, ye have no need that I write unto you. 
For yourselves know perfectly that the day of the Lord so cometh as a thief in the night. 
For when they shall say, Peace and safety; then sudden destruction cometh upon them, as travail upon a woman with child; and they shall not escape. 
But ye, brethren, are not in darkness, that that day should overtake you as a thief. 
Ye are all the children of light, and the children of the day: we are not of t
739,thy wife shall have a son. And Sarah heard it in the tent door, which was behind him. 
Now Abraham and Sarah were old and well stricken in age; and it ceased to be with Sarah after the manner of women. 
Therefore Sarah laughed within herself, saying, After I am waxed old shall I have pleasure, my lord being old also? 
And the LORD said unto Abraham, Wherefore did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I of a surety bear a child, which am old? 
Is any thing too hard for the LORD? At the time appointed I will return unto thee, according to the time of life, and Sarah shall have a son. 
Then Sarah denied, saying, I laughed not; for she was afraid. And he said, Nay; but thou didst laugh. 
And the men rose up from thence, and looked toward Sodom:
653,u eat not the blood: for the blood is the life; and thou mayest not eat the life with the flesh. 
Thou shalt not eat it; thou shalt pour it upon the earth as water. 
Thou shalt not eat it; that it may go well with thee, and with thy children after thee, when thou shalt do that which is right in the sight of the LORD. 
Only thy holy things which thou hast, and thy vows, thou shalt take, and go unto the place which the LORD shall choose: 
And thou shalt offer thy burnt offerings, the flesh and the blood, upon the altar of the LORD thy God: and the blood of thy sacrifices shall be poured out upon the altar of the LORD thy God, and thou shalt eat th
664,Who had his dwelling among the tombs; and no man could bind him, no, not with chains: 
Because that he had been often bound with fetters and chains, and the chains had been plucked asunder by him, and the fetters broken in pieces: neither could any man tame him. 
And always, night and day, he was in the mountains, and in the tombs, crying, and cutting himself with stones. 
But when he saw Jesus afar off, he ran and worshipped him, 
And cried with a loud voice, and said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of the most high God? I adjure thee by God, that thou torment me not. 
For he said unto him, Come out of the man, thou unclean spirit. 
And he a
649,fore Absalom sent for Joab, to have sent him to the king; but he would not come to him: and when he sent again the second time, he would not come. 
Therefore he said unto his servants, See, Joab's field is near mine, and he hath barley there; go and set it on fire. And Absalom's servants set the field on fire. 
Then Joab arose, and came to Absalom unto his house, and said unto him, Wherefore have thy servants set my field on fire? 
And Absalom answered Joab, Behold, I sent unto thee, saying, Come hither, that I may send thee to the king, to say, Wherefore am I come from Geshur? it had been good for me to have been there still: now therefore 
712, the fear of God. 
Receive us; we have wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we have defrauded no man. 
I speak not this to condemn you: for I have said before, that ye are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told us your ea
899,ge: because thou hast rejected knowledge, I will also reject thee, that thou shalt be no priest to me: seeing thou hast forgotten the law of thy God, I will also forget thy children. 
As they were increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will I change their glory into shame. 
They eat up the sin of my people, and they set their heart on their iniquity. 
And there shall be, like people, like priest: and I will punish them for their ways, and reward them their doings. 
For they shall eat, and not have enough: they shall commit whoredom, and shall not increase: because they have left off to take heed to the LORD. 
Whoredom and wine and new wine take away the heart. 
My people ask counsel at their stocks, and their staff declareth unto them: for the spirit of whoredoms hath caused them to err, and they have gone a whoring from under their God. 
They sacrifice upon the tops of the mou
653,eseech you, brethren, by the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ, and by our gathering together unto him, 
That ye be not soon shaken in mind, or be troubled, neither by spirit, nor by word, nor by letter as from us, as that the day of Christ is at hand. 
Let no man deceive you by any means: for that day shall not come, except there come a falling away first, and that man of sin be revealed, the son of perdition; 
Who opposeth and exalteth himself above all that is called God, or that is worshipped; so that he as God sitteth in the temple of God, shewing himself that he is God. 
Remember ye not, that, when I was yet with you, I told you these things
659,o him, I have given unto thy master's son all that pertained to Saul and to all his house. 
Thou therefore, and thy sons, and thy servants, shall till the land for him, and thou shalt bring in the fruits, that thy master's son may have food to eat: but Mephibosheth thy master's son shall eat bread alway at my table. Now Ziba had fifteen sons and twenty servants. 
Then said Ziba unto the king, According to all that my lord the king hath commanded his servant, so shall thy servant do. As for Mephibosheth, said the king, he shall eat at my table, as one of the king's sons. 
And Mephibosheth had a young son, whose name was Micha. And all that dwelt in the
810, had done to Saul; 
All the valiant men arose, and went all night, and took the body of Saul and the bodies of his sons from the wall of Bethshan, and came to Jabesh, and burnt them there. 
And they took their bones, and buried them under a tree at Jabesh, and fasted seven days. 
Now it came to pass after the death of Saul, when David was returned from the slaughter of the Amalekites, and David had abode two days in Ziklag; 
It came even to pass on the third day, that, behold, a man came out of the camp from Saul with his clothes rent, and earth upon his head: and so it was, when he came to David, that he fell to the earth, and did obeisance. 
And David said unto him, From whence comest thou? And he said unto him, Out of the camp of Israel am I escaped. 
And David said unto him, How went the matter?
884,iquity, because he hath profaned the hallowed thing of the LORD: and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not wholly reap the corners of thy field, neither shalt thou gather the gleanings of thy harvest. 
And thou shalt not glean thy vineyard, neither shalt thou gather every grape of thy vineyard; thou shalt leave them for the poor and stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall not steal, neither deal falsely, neither lie one to another. 
And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
Thou shalt not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind, but shalt fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall 
716, his servant from a child shall have him become his son at the length. 
An angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in transgression. 
A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the humble in spirit. 
Whoso is partner with a thief hateth his own soul: he heareth cursing, and bewrayeth it not. 
The fear of man bringeth a snare: but whoso putteth his trust in the LORD shall be safe. 
Many seek the ruler's favour; but every man's judgment cometh from the LORD. 
An unjust man is an abomination to the just: and he that is upright in the way is abomination to the wicked. 
The words of Agur the son of Jakeh, even the prophecy: the man spake unto Ithiel, even unto Ithiel and Ucal, 

761,ness against Jesus to put him to death; and found none. 
For many bare false witness against him, but their witness agreed not together. 
And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying, 
We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with hands, and within three days I will build another made without hands. 
But neither so did their witness agree together. 
And the high priest stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus, saying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee? 
But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him, and said unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son of the Blessed? 
And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power
847,d said, Wilt thou also destroy the righteous with the wicked? 
Peradventure there be fifty righteous within the city: wilt thou also destroy and not spare the place for the fifty righteous that are therein? 
That be far from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far from thee: Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right? 
And the LORD said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the city, then I will spare all the place for their sakes. 
And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the LORD, which am but dust and ashes: 
Peradventure there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou destroy all the city for lack of five? And he said, If I find there forty and five, I will not destroy it. 
And he spake unto 
744,untest my soul to take it. 
The LORD judge between me and thee, and the LORD avenge me of thee: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
As saith the proverb of the ancients, Wickedness proceedeth from the wicked: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
After whom is the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou pursue? after a dead dog, after a flea. 
The LORD therefore be judge, and judge between me and thee, and see, and plead my cause, and deliver me out of thine hand. 
And it came to pass, when David had made an end of speaking these words unto Saul, that Saul said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And Saul lifted up his voice, and wept. 
And he said to David, Thou art more righteous than I: for thou hast rewarded me good, where
916,moved. 
Have ye not known? have ye not heard? hath it not been told you from the beginning? have ye not understood from the foundations of the earth? 
It is he that sitteth upon the circle of the earth, and the inhabitants thereof are as grasshoppers; that stretcheth out the heavens as a curtain, and spreadeth them out as a tent to dwell in: 
That bringeth the princes to nothing; he maketh the judges of the earth as vanity. 
Yea, they shall not be planted; yea, they shall not be sown: yea, their stock shall not take root in the earth: and he shall also blow upon them, and they shall wither, and the whirlwind shall take them away as stubble. 
To whom then will ye liken me, or shall I be equal? saith the Holy One. 
Lift up your eyes on high, and behold who hath created these things, that bringeth out their host by number: he calleth them all by names by the greatness of his might, for that he is strong in
951,hat he had done. 
And he went down, and talked with the woman; and she pleased Samson well. 
And after a time he returned to take her, and he turned aside to see the carcase of the lion: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees and honey in the carcase of the lion. 
And he took thereof in his hands, and went on eating, and came to his father and mother, and he gave them, and they did eat: but he told not them that he had taken the honey out of the carcase of the lion. 
So his father went down unto the woman: and Samson made there a feast; for so used the young men to do. 
And it came to pass, when they saw him, that they brought thirty companions to be with him. 
And Samson said unto them, I will now put forth a riddle unto you: if ye can certainly declare it me within the seven days of the feast, and find it out, then I will give you thirty sheets and thirty change of garments: 
But if ye cannot declare it me, then shall ye give me thirty
891,i: now there was a valley between them and Ai. 
And he took about five thousand men, and set them to lie in ambush between Bethel and Ai, on the west side of the city. 
And when they had set the people, even all the host that was on the north of the city, and their liers in wait on the west of the city, Joshua went that night into the midst of the valley. 
And it came to pass, when the king of Ai saw it, that they hasted and rose up early, and the men of the city went out against Israel to battle, he and all his people, at a time appointed, before the plain; but he wist not that there were liers in ambush against him behind the city. 
And Joshua and all Israel made as if they were beaten before them, and fled by the way of the wilderness. 
And all the people that were in Ai were called together to pursue after them: and they pursued after Joshua, and were drawn away from the cit
875,, and join thyself to this chariot. 
And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest? 
And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me? And he desired Philip that he would come up and sit with him. 
The place of the scripture which he read was this, He was led as a sheep to the slaughter; and like a lamb dumb before his shearer, so opened he not his mouth: 
In his humiliation his judgment was taken away: and who shall declare his generation? for his life is taken from the earth. 
And the eunuch answered Philip, and said, I pray thee, of whom speaketh the prophet this? of himself, or of some other man? 
Then Philip opened his mouth, and began at the same scripture, and preached unto him Jesus. 
And as they went on their way, they came unto a certain water: and the eunuch said, See, here i
754,id, according to the saying of Gad, went up as the LORD commanded. 
And Araunah looked, and saw the king and his servants coming on toward him: and Araunah went out, and bowed himself before the king on his face upon the ground. 
And Araunah said, Wherefore is my lord the king come to his servant? And David said, To buy the threshingfloor of thee, to build an altar unto the LORD, that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Araunah said unto David, Let my lord the king take and offer up what seemeth good unto him: behold, here be oxen for burnt sacrifice, and threshing instruments and other instruments of the oxen for wood. 
All these things did Araunah, as a king, give unto the king. And Araunah said unto the king, The LORD thy God acce
775, son in law, Comfort thine heart with a morsel of bread, and afterward go your way. 
And they sat down, and did eat and drink both of them together: for the damsel's father had said unto the man, Be content, I pray thee, and tarry all night, and let thine heart be merry. 
And when the man rose up to depart, his father in law urged him: therefore he lodged there again. 
And he arose early in the morning on the fifth day to depart; and the damsel's father said, Comfort thine heart, I pray thee. And they tarried until afternoon, and they did eat both of them. 
And when the man rose up to depart, he, and his concubine, and his servant, his father in law, the damsel's father, said unto him, Behold, now the day draweth toward evening, I pray you tarry all night: behold, 
927,owed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old. 
But they rebelled, and vexed his holy Spirit: therefore he was turned to be their enemy, and he fought against them. 
Then he remembered the days of old, Moses, and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea with the shepherd of his flock? where is he that put his holy Spirit within him? 
That led them by the right hand of Moses with his glorious arm, dividing the water before them, to make himself an everlasting name? 
That led them throug
749,the Spirit; 
That the Gentiles should be fellowheirs, and of the same body, and partakers of his promise in Christ by the gospel: 
Whereof I was made a minister, according to the gift of the grace of God given unto me by the effectual working of his power. 
Unto me, who am less than the least of all saints, is this grace given, that I should preach among the Gentiles the unsearchable riches of Christ; 
And to make all men see what is the fellowship of the mystery, which from the beginning of the world hath been hid in God, who created all things by Jesus Christ: 
To the intent that now unto the principalities and powers in heavenly places might be known by the church the manifold wisdom of God, 
According to the eternal purpose which he pu
841,shall add the fifth part thereto, and give it unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if a soul sin, and commit any of these things which are forbidden to be done by the commandments of the LORD; though he wist it not, yet is he guilty, and shall bear his iniquity. 
And he shall bring a ram without blemish out of the flock, with thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him concerning his ignorance wherein he erred and wist it not, and it shall be forgiven him. 
It is a trespass offering: he hath certainly trespassed against the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
If a soul sin, and commit a trespass against the LORD, and lie unto his neighbour in that which was de
725,leg lived after he begat Reu two hundred and nine years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Reu lived two and thirty years, and begat Serug: 
And Reu lived after he begat Serug two hundred and seven years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Serug lived thirty years, and begat Nahor: 
And Serug lived after he begat Nahor two hundred years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Nahor lived nine and twenty years, and begat Terah: 
And Nahor lived after he begat Terah an hundred and nineteen years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Terah lived seventy years, and begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran. 
Now these are the generations of Terah: Terah begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran; and Haran begat Lot. 
And Haran died before his fathe
664,ed with might by his Spirit in the inner man; 
That Christ may dwell in your hearts by faith; that ye, being rooted and grounded in love, 
May be able to comprehend with all saints what is the breadth, and length, and depth, and height; 
And to know the love of Christ, which passeth knowledge, that ye might be filled with all the fulness of God. 
Now unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly above all that we ask or think, according to the power that worketh in us, 
Unto him be glory in the church by Christ Jesus throughout all ages, world without end. Amen. 
I therefore, the prisoner of the Lord, beseech you that ye walk worthy of the vocation wher
746, laugh them to scorn. 
Whereas our substance is not cut down, but the remnant of them the fire consumeth. 
Acquaint now thyself with him, and be at peace: thereby good shall come unto thee. 
Receive, I pray thee, the law from his mouth, and lay up his words in thine heart. 
If thou return to the Almighty, thou shalt be built up, thou shalt put away iniquity far from thy tabernacles. 
Then shalt thou lay up gold as dust, and the gold of Ophir as the stones of the brooks. 
Yea, the Almighty shall be thy defence, and thou shalt have plenty of silver. 
For then shalt thou have thy delight in the Almighty, and shalt lift up thy face unto God. 
Thou shalt make thy prayer unto him, and he shall hear thee, and thou shalt pay thy vows. 
Thou sha
789,ttered and peeled, and from a people terrible from their beginning hitherto; a nation meted out and trodden under foot, whose land the rivers have spoiled, to the place of the name of the LORD of hosts, the mount Zion. 
The burden of Egypt. Behold, the LORD rideth upon a swift cloud, and shall come into Egypt: and the idols of Egypt shall be moved at his presence, and the heart of Egypt shall melt in the midst of it. 
And I will set the Egyptians against the Egyptians: and they shall fight every one against his brother, and every one against his neighbour; city against city, and kingdom against kingdom. 
And the spirit of Egypt shall fail in the midst thereof; and I will destroy the counsel thereof: and they shall seek to the idols, and to the charmers, and to them that have fam
915,ltereth not. 
Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be changed. 
Then the king commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he will deliver thee. 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with t
798,nt through the corn fields on the sabbath day; and his disciples began, as they went, to pluck the ears of corn. 
And the Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that which is not lawful? 
And he said unto them, Have ye never read what David did, when he had need, and was an hungred, he, and they that were with him? 
How he went into the house of God in the days of Abiathar the high priest, and did eat the shewbread, which is not lawful to eat but for the priests, and gave also to them which were with him? 
And he said unto them, The sabbath was made for man, and not man for the sabbath: 
Therefore the Son of man is Lord also of the sabbath. 
And he entered again into the synagogue; and there was a man there which had a withered hand. 
And they watched him, whethe
847,you. 
Herein is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall ye be my disciples. 
As the Father hath loved me, so have I loved you: continue ye in my love. 
If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kept my Father's commandments, and abide in his love. 
These things have I spoken unto you, that my joy might remain in you, and that your joy might be full. 
This is my commandment, That ye love one another, as I have loved you. 
Greater love hath no man than this, that a man lay down his life for his friends. 
Ye are my friends, if ye do whatsoever I command you. 
Henceforth I call you not servants; for the servant knoweth not what his lord doeth: but I have called you friends; for all things that I have heard of my Father I have made known unto you. 
Ye have not chosen me, but I have chosen you, and 
721,e moved. 
The LORD is great in Zion; and he is high above all the people. 
Let them praise thy great and terrible name; for it is holy. 
The king's strength also loveth judgment; thou dost establish equity, thou executest judgment and righteousness in Jacob. 
Exalt ye the LORD our God, and worship at his footstool; for he is holy. 
Moses and Aaron among his priests, and Samuel among them that call upon his name; they called upon the LORD, and he answered them. 
He spake unto them in the cloudy pillar: they kept his testimonies, and the ordinance that he gave them. 
Thou answeredst them, O LORD our God: thou wast a God that forgavest them, though thou tookest vengeance of their inventions. 
Exalt the LORD our God
925, the beasts of the south: into the land of trouble and anguish, from whence come the young and old lion, the viper and fiery flying serpent, they will carry their riches upon the shoulders of young asses, and their treasures upon the bunches of camels, to a people that shall not profit them. 
For the Egyptians shall help in vain, and to no purpose: therefore have I cried concerning this, Their strength is to sit still. 
Now go, write it before them in a table, and note it in a book, that it may be for the time to come for ever and ever: 
That this is a rebellious people, lying children, children that will not hear the law of the LORD: 
Which say to the seers, See not; and to the prophets, Prophesy not unto us right things, speak unto us smooth things, prophesy deceits: 
Get you out of the way, turn aside out of the path, cause the Holy One of Israel to cease from before us. 
Wherefore thus saith the Holy One of 
705,ned into Galilee, to their own city Nazareth. 
And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, filled with wisdom: and the grace of God was upon him. 
Now his parents went to Jerusalem every year at the feast of the passover. 
And when he was twelve years old, they went up to Jerusalem after the custom of the feast. 
And when they had fulfilled the days, as they returned, the child Jesus tarried behind in Jerusalem; and Joseph and his mother knew not of it. 
But they, supposing him to have been in the company, went a day's journey; and they sought him among their kinsfolk and acquaintance. 
And when they found him not, they turned back again to Jerusalem, seeking him. 
And it came to pass, that a
858,le, he removed them to cities from one end of the borders of Egypt even to the other end thereof. 
Only the land of the priests bought he not; for the priests had a portion assigned them of Pharaoh, and did eat their portion which Pharaoh gave them: wherefore they sold not their lands. 
Then Joseph said unto the people, Behold, I have bought you this day and your land for Pharaoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall sow the land. 
And it shall come to pass in the increase, that ye shall give the fifth part unto Pharaoh, and four parts shall be your own, for seed of the field, and for your food, and for them of your households, and for food for your little ones. 
And they said, Thou hast saved our lives: let us find grace in the sight of my lord, and we will be Pharaoh's servants. 
And Joseph made it a law over the land of Egypt unto this day, 
947, I will punish them that dwell in the land of Egypt, as I have punished Jerusalem, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence: 
So that none of the remnant of Judah, which are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall escape or remain, that they should return into the land of Judah, to the which they have a desire to return to dwell there: for none shall return but such as shall escape. 
Then all the men which knew that their wives had burned incense unto other gods, and all the women that stood by, a great multitude, even all the people that dwelt in the land of Egypt, in Pathros, answered Jeremiah, saying, 
As for the word that thou hast spoken unto us in the name of the LORD, we will not hearken unto thee. 
But we will certainly do whatsoever thing goeth forth out of our own mouth, to burn incense unto the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her, as we have done, we, and our fathers, our kings, 
870,My father peradventure will feel me, and I shall seem to him as a deceiver; and I shall bring a curse upon me, and not a blessing. 
And his mother said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only obey my voice, and go fetch me them. 
And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved. 
And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son: 
And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smooth of his neck: 
And she gave the savoury meat and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob. 
And he came unto his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here am I; who art thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou 
678,eaking of the potters' vessel that is broken in pieces; he shall not spare: so that there shall not be found in the bursting of it a sherd to take fire from the hearth, or to take water withal out of the pit. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, the Holy One of Israel; In returning and rest shall ye be saved; in quietness and in confidence shall be your strength: and ye would not. 
But ye said, No; for we will flee upon horses; therefore shall ye flee: and, We will ride upon the swift; therefore shall they that pursue you be swift. 
One thousand shall flee at the rebuke of one; at the rebuke of five shall ye flee: till ye be left as a beacon upon the top of a mountain, and as 
757, said unto the king of Israel, Enquire, I pray thee, at the word of the LORD to day. 
Therefore the king of Israel gathered together of prophets four hundred men, and said unto them, Shall we go to Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And they said, Go up; for God will deliver it into the king's hand. 
But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of the LORD besides, that we might enquire of him? 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, There is yet one man, by whom we may enquire of the LORD: but I hate him; for he never prophesied good unto me, but always evil: the same is Micaiah the son of Imla. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so. 
And the king of Israel called for one of his officers, and said, Fetch quickly Micai
720,ept him as the apple of his eye. 
As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young, spreadeth abroad her wings, taketh them, beareth them on her wings: 
So the LORD alone did lead him, and there was no strange god with him. 
He made him ride on the high places of the earth, that he might eat the increase of the fields; and he made him to suck honey out of the rock, and oil out of the flinty rock; 
Butter of kine, and milk of sheep, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and goats, with the fat of kidneys of wheat; and thou didst drink the pure blood of the grape. 
But Jeshurun waxed fat, and kicked: thou art waxen fat, thou art grown thick, thou art covered with fatness; then he forsook 
930,the covenant, when, lo, he had given his hand, and hath done all these things, he shall not escape. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As I live, surely mine oath that he hath despised, and my covenant that he hath broken, even it will I recompense upon his own head. 
And I will spread my net upon him, and he shall be taken in my snare, and I will bring him to Babylon, and will plead with him there for his trespass that he hath trespassed against me. 
And all his fugitives with all his bands shall fall by the sword, and they that remain shall be scattered toward all winds: and ye shall know that I the LORD have spoken it. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also take of the highest branch of the high cedar, and will set it; I will crop off from the top of his young twigs a tender one, and will plant it upon an high mountain and eminent: 
In the mountain of the height of Israel will I plant it: and it shall bring forth 
850,. 
And, behold, a certain lawyer stood up, and tempted him, saying, Master, what shall I do to inherit eternal life? 
He said unto him, What is written in the law? how readest thou? 
And he answering said, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy strength, and with all thy mind; and thy neighbour as thyself. 
And he said unto him, Thou hast answered right: this do, and thou shalt live. 
But he, willing to justify himself, said unto Jesus, And who is my neighbour? 
And Jesus answering said, A certain man went down from Jerusalem to Jericho, and fell among thieves, which stripped him of his raiment, and wounded him, and departed, leaving him half dead. 
And by chance there came down a certain priest that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other side. 
And likewise a Levite, when
709,ings to you, to me indeed is not grievous, but for you it is safe. 
Beware of dogs, beware of evil workers, beware of the concision. 
For we are the circumcision, which worship God in the spirit, and rejoice in Christ Jesus, and have no confidence in the flesh. 
Though I might also have confidence in the flesh. If any other man thinketh that he hath whereof he might trust in the flesh, I more: 
Circumcised the eighth day, of the stock of Israel, of the tribe of Benjamin, an Hebrew of the Hebrews; as touching the law, a Pharisee; 
Concerning zeal, persecuting the church; touching the righteousness which is in the law, blameless. 
But what things were gain to me, those I counted loss for Christ. 
Yea d
807,ity by a well of water at the time of the evening, even the time that women go out to draw water. 
And he said O LORD God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send me good speed this day, and shew kindness unto my master Abraham. 
Behold, I stand here by the well of water; and the daughters of the men of the city come out to draw water: 
And let it come to pass, that the damsel to whom I shall say, Let down thy pitcher, I pray thee, that I may drink; and she shall say, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: let the same be she that thou hast appointed for thy servant Isaac; and thereby shall I know that thou hast shewed kindness unto my master. 
And it came to pass, before he had done speaking, that, behold, Rebekah came out, who was born to Bethuel, son of Milcah, the wife of Nahor, Abraham
832,elds and vineyards, and make you all captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds; 
That all of you have conspired against me, and there is none that sheweth me that my son hath made a league with the son of Jesse, and there is none of you that is sorry for me, or sheweth unto me that my son hath stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then answered Doeg the Edomite, which was set over the servants of Saul, and said, I saw the son of Jesse coming to Nob, to Ahimelech the son of Ahitub. 
And he enquired of the LORD for him, and gave him victuals, and gave him the sword of Goliath the Philistine. 
Then the king sent to call Ahimelech the priest, the son of Ahitub, and all his father's house, the priests that were in Nob: and they came all of them to the king. 
And Saul said, Hear now, thou son
722, the God of Israel? And they answered, Let the ark of the God of Israel be carried about unto Gath. And they carried the ark of the God of Israel about thither. 
And it was so, that, after they had carried it about, the hand of the LORD was against the city with a very great destruction: and he smote the men of the city, both small and great, and they had emerods in their secret parts. 
Therefore they sent the ark of God to Ekron. And it came to pass, as the ark of God came to Ekron, that the Ekronites cried out, saying, They have brought about the ark of the God of Israel to us, to slay us and our people. 
So they sent and gathered together all the lords of the Philistines, and said, Send away the ark of the God
876, they are offended. 
And these are they which are sown among thorns; such as hear the word, 
And the cares of this world, and the deceitfulness of riches, and the lusts of other things entering in, choke the word, and it becometh unfruitful. 
And these are they which are sown on good ground; such as hear the word, and receive it, and bring forth fruit, some thirtyfold, some sixty, and some an hundred. 
And he said unto them, Is a candle brought to be put under a bushel, or under a bed? and not to be set on a candlestick? 
For there is nothing hid, which shall not be manifested; neither was any thing kept secret, but that it should come abroad. 
If any man have ears to hear, let him hear. 
And he said unto them, Take heed what ye hear: with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you: and unto you that hear shall more be given. 
For he that hath, to him shall
712,had said this unto them; and they believed the scripture, and the word which Jesus had said. 
Now when he was in Jerusalem at the passover, in the feast day, many believed in his name, when they saw the miracles which he did. 
But Jesus did not commit himself unto them, because he knew all men, 
And needed not that any should testify of man: for he knew what was in man. 
There was a man of the Pharisees, named Nicodemus, a ruler of the Jews: 
The same came to Jesus by night, and said unto him, Rabbi, we know that thou art a teacher come from God: for no man can do these miracles that thou doest, except God be with him. 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be b
746,, by a statute for ever. 
And the priest, whom he shall anoint, and whom he shall consecrate to minister in the priest's office in his father's stead, shall make the atonement, and shall put on the linen clothes, even the holy garments: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy sanctuary, and he shall make an atonement for the tabernacle of the congregation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for the priests, and for all the people of the congregation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. And he did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, and unto his sons, and unto all the chil
651,crifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of fine flour, fried. 
Besides the cakes, he shall offer for his offering leavened bread with the sacrifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an heave offering unto the LORD, and it shall be the priest's that sprinkleth the blood of the peace offerings. 
And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten the same day that it is offered; he shall not leave any of it until the morning. 
But if the sacrifice of his offeri
820,th in the circuit of heaven. 
Hast thou marked the old way which wicked men have trodden? 
Which were cut down out of time, whose foundation was overflown with a flood: 
Which said unto God, Depart from us: and what can the Almighty do for them? 
Yet he filled their houses with good things: but the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
The righteous see it, and are glad: and the innocent laugh them to scorn. 
Whereas our substance is not cut down, but the remnant of them the fire consumeth. 
Acquaint now thyself with him, and be at peace: thereby good shall come unto thee. 
Receive, I pray thee, the law from his mouth, and lay up his words in thine heart. 
If thou return to the Almighty, thou shalt be built up, thou shalt put away iniquity far from thy tabernacles. 
Then shalt thou lay up gold as dust, and t
860,gthen the house of Judah, and I will save the house of Joseph, and I will bring them again to place them; for I have mercy upon them: and they shall be as though I had not cast them off: for I am the LORD their God, and will hear them. 
And they of Ephraim shall be like a mighty man, and their heart shall rejoice as through wine: yea, their children shall see it, and be glad; their heart shall rejoice in the LORD. 
I will hiss for them, and gather them; for I have redeemed them: and they shall increase as they have increased. 
And I will sow them among the people: and they shall remember me in far countries; and they shall live with their children, and turn again. 
I will bring them again also out of the land of Egypt, and gather them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them. 

843,it: he stayeth his rough wind in the day of the east wind. 
By this therefore shall the iniquity of Jacob be purged; and this is all the fruit to take away his sin; when he maketh all the stones of the altar as chalkstones that are beaten in sunder, the groves and images shall not stand up. 
Yet the defenced city shall be desolate, and the habitation forsaken, and left like a wilderness: there shall the calf feed, and there shall he lie down, and consume the branches thereof. 
When the boughs thereof are withered, they shall be broken off: the women come, and set them on fire: for it is a people of no understanding: therefore he that made them will not have mercy on them, and he that formed them will shew them no favour. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall beat off from the channel of the river unto the stre
934,anity? 
For the earth shall be filled with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
Woe unto him that giveth his neighbour drink, that puttest thy bottle to him, and makest him drunken also, that thou mayest look on their nakedness! 
Thou art filled with shame for glory: drink thou also, and let thy foreskin be uncovered: the cup of the LORD's right hand shall be turned unto thee, and shameful spewing shall be on thy glory. 
For the violence of Lebanon shall cover thee, and the spoil of beasts, which made them afraid, because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
What profiteth the graven image that the maker thereof hath graven it; the molten image, and a teacher of lies, that the maker of his work trusteth therein, to make dumb idols? 
Woe unto him that saith to the wood, Awake; to the dumb stone, Arise, it shall teach! Behold, it is 
749,are with him. 
Now Jonathan and Ahimaaz stayed by Enrogel; for they might not be seen to come into the city: and a wench went and told them; and they went and told king David. 
Nevertheless a lad saw them, and told Absalom: but they went both of them away quickly, and came to a man's house in Bahurim, which had a well in his court; whither they went down. 
And the woman took and spread a covering over the well's mouth, and spread ground corn thereon; and the thing was not known. 
And when Absalom's servants came to the woman to the house, they said, Where is Ahimaaz and Jonathan? And the woman said unto them, They be gone over the brook of water. And when they had sought and could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to 
773,peak not evil one of another, brethren. He that speaketh evil of his brother, and judgeth his brother, speaketh evil of the law, and judgeth the law: but if thou judge the law, thou art not a doer of the law, but a judge. 
There is one lawgiver, who is able to save and to destroy: who art thou that judgest another? 
Go to now, ye that say, To day or to morrow we will go into such a city, and continue there a year, and buy and sell, and get gain: 
Whereas ye know not what shall be on the morrow. For what is your life? It is even a vapour, that appeareth for a little time, and then vanisheth away. 
For that ye ought to say, If the Lord will, we shall live, and do this, or that. 
But now ye rejoice in your boastings: all such rejoicing is evil. 
Therefore to him tha
914,ever shall alter this word, let timber be pulled down from his house, and being set up, let him be hanged thereon; and let his house be made a dunghill for this. 
And the God that hath caused his name to dwell there destroy all kings and people, that shall put to their hand to alter and to destroy this house of God which is at Jerusalem. I Darius have made a decree; let it be done with speed. 
Then Tatnai, governor on this side the river, Shetharboznai, and their companions, according to that which Darius the king had sent, so they did speedily. 
And the elders of the Jews builded, and they prospered through the prophesying of Haggai the prophet and Zechariah the son of Iddo. And they builded, and finished it, according to the commandment of the God of Israel, and according to the commandment of Cyrus, and Darius, and Artaxerxes king of Persia. 
And this house was finished on the third day of the mont
657,p sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright. 
And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the indignation: for at the time appointed the end shall be. 
The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media and Persia. 
And the rough goat is the king of Grecia: and the great horn that is between his eyes is the first king. 
Now that being broken, whereas four stood up for it, four kingdoms shall stand up out of the nation, but not in his power. 
And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors are come to the full, a king of fierce countenance, and understandin
886,gypt; 
Wondrous works in the land of Ham, and terrible things by the Red sea. 
Therefore he said that he would destroy them, had not Moses his chosen stood before him in the breach, to turn away his wrath, lest he should destroy them. 
Yea, they despised the pleasant land, they believed not his word: 
But murmured in their tents, and hearkened not unto the voice of the LORD. 
Therefore he lifted up his hand against them, to overthrow them in the wilderness: 
To overthrow their seed also among the nations, and to scatter them in the lands. 
They joined themselves also unto Baalpeor, and ate the sacrifices of the dead. 
Thus they provoked him to anger with their inventions: and the plague brake in upon them. 
Then stood up Phinehas, and executed judgment: and so the plague was stayed. 
And that was counted unto him for righteousness unto all generations for evermore. 
They an
686,ORD. 
And Ishmael the son of Nethaniah went forth from Mizpah to meet them, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met them, he said unto them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam. 
And it was so, when they came into the midst of the city, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst of the pit, he, and the men that were with him. 
But ten men were found among them that said unto Ishmael, Slay us not: for we have treasures in the field, of wheat, and of barley, and of oil, and of honey. So he forbare, and slew them not among their brethren. 
Now the pit wherein Ishmael had cast all the dead bodies of the men, whom he had slain becau
694,he goeth unto the grave to weep there. 
Then when Mary was come where Jesus was, and saw him, she fell down at his feet, saying unto him, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died. 
When Jesus therefore saw her weeping, and the Jews also weeping which came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and was troubled. 
And said, Where have ye laid him? They said unto him, Lord, come and see. 
Jesus wept. 
Then said the Jews, Behold how he loved him! 
And some of them said, Could not this man, which opened the eyes of the blind, have caused that even this man should not have died? 
Jesus therefore again groaning in himself cometh to the grave. It was a cave, and a stone lay upon it.
700,his way. 
There is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the LORD. 
The horse is prepared against the day of battle: but safety is of the LORD. 
A GOOD name is rather to be chosen than great riches, and loving favour rather than silver and gold. 
The rich and poor meet together: the LORD is the maker of them all. 
A prudent man foreseeth the evil, and hideth himself: but the simple pass on, and are punished. 
By humility and the fear of the LORD are riches, and honour, and life. 
Thorns and snares are in the way of the froward: he that doth keep his soul shall be far from them. 
Train up a child in the way he should go: and when he is old, he will not depart from it. 
The rich rule
795, the vessels of a potter shall they be broken to shivers: even as I received of my Father. 
And I will give him the morning star. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
And unto the angel of the church in Sardis write; These things saith he that hath the seven Spirits of God, and the seven stars; I know thy works, that thou hast a name that thou livest, and art dead. 
Be watchful, and strengthen the things which remain, that are ready to die: for I have not found thy works perfect before God. 
Remember therefore how thou hast received and heard, and hold fast, and repent. If therefore thou shalt not watch, I will come on thee as a thief, and thou shalt not know what hour I will come upon thee. 
Thou hast a few names even in Sardis which have not d
741,t that I heard in mine own land of thy acts and of thy wisdom. 
Howbeit I believed not the words, until I came, and mine eyes had seen it: and, behold, the half was not told me: thy wisdom and prosperity exceedeth the fame which I heard. 
Happy are thy men, happy are these thy servants, which stand continually before thee, and that hear thy wisdom. 
Blessed be the LORD thy God, which delighted in thee, to set thee on the throne of Israel: because the LORD loved Israel for ever, therefore made he thee king, to do judgment and justice. 
And she gave the king an hundred and twenty talents of gold, and of spices very great store, and precious stones: there came no more such abundance of spices as these which the queen of Sheba gave to 
841,mla. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so. 
And the king of Israel called for one of his officers, and said, Fetch quickly Micaiah the son of Imla. 
And the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat king of Judah sat either of them on his throne, clothed in their robes, and they sat in a void place at the entering in of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied before them. 
And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah had made him horns of iron, and said, Thus saith the LORD, With these thou shalt push Syria until they be consumed. 
And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him, saying, Behold, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one assent; let thy word therefore,
768,ise of thy viols: the worm is spread under thee, and the worms cover thee. 
How art thou fallen from heaven, O Lucifer, son of the morning! how art thou cut down to the ground, which didst weaken the nations! 
For thou hast said in thine heart, I will ascend into heaven, I will exalt my throne above the stars of God: I will sit also upon the mount of the congregation, in the sides of the north: 
I will ascend above the heights of the clouds; I will be like the most High. 
Yet thou shalt be brought down to hell, to the sides of the pit. 
They that see thee shall narrowly look upon thee, and consider thee, saying, Is this the man that made the earth to tremble, that did shake kingdoms; 
That made the world as a wilderness, and destroyed the cities thereof; tha
682,e they to whom it is given. 
For there are some eunuchs, which were so born from their mother's womb: and there are some eunuchs, which were made eunuchs of men: and there be eunuchs, which have made themselves eunuchs for the kingdom of heaven's sake. He that is able to receive it, let him receive it. 
Then were there brought unto him little children, that he should put his hands on them, and pray: and the disciples rebuked them. 
But Jesus said, Suffer little children, and forbid them not, to come unto me: for of such is the kingdom of heaven. 
And he laid his hands on them, and departed thence. 
And, behold, one came and said unto him, Good Master, what good thing shall 
654,ee which is wild by nature, and wert graffed contrary to nature into a good olive tree: how much more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree? 
For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this mystery, lest ye should be wise in your own conceits; that blindness in part is happened to Israel, until the fulness of the Gentiles be come in. 
And so all Israel shall be saved: as it is written, There shall come out of Sion the Deliverer, and shall turn away ungodliness from Jacob: 
For this is my covenant unto them, when I shall take away their sins. 
As concerning the gospel, they are enemies for y
790,relieve them, and let not the church be charged; that it may relieve them that are widows indeed. 
Let the elders that rule well be counted worthy of double honour, especially they who labour in the word and doctrine. 
For the scripture saith, thou shalt not muzzle the ox that treadeth out the corn. And, The labourer is worthy of his reward. 
Against an elder receive not an accusation, but before two or three witnesses. 
Them that sin rebuke before all, that others also may fear. 
I charge thee before God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, and the elect angels, that thou observe these things without preferring one before another, doing nothing by partiality. 
Lay hands suddenly on no man, neither be partaker of other men's sins: keep thyself pure. 
Drink no longer water, but use a littl
748,f ye wrote unto me: It is good for a man not to touch a woman. 
Nevertheless, to avoid fornication, let every man have his own wife, and let every woman have her own husband. 
Let the husband render unto the wife due benevolence: and likewise also the wife unto the husband. 
The wife hath not power of her own body, but the husband: and likewise also the husband hath not power of his own body, but the wife. 
Defraud ye not one the other, except it be with consent for a time, that ye may give yourselves to fasting and prayer; and come together again, that Satan tempt you not for your incontinency. 
But I speak this by permission, and not of commandment. 
For I would that all men were even as I myself. But every man hath his proper gift of G
797,If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of them that slept. 
For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead. 
For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ shall all be made alive. 
But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ's at his coming. 
Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power. 
For he must reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet. 
The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death. 
For he hath put all things under his feet. But when he saith all things are put under him, it is manifest th
909,he shewed unto them his hands and his side. Then were the disciples glad, when they saw the LORD. 
Then said Jesus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father hath sent me, even so send I you. 
And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Receive ye the Holy Ghost: 
Whose soever sins ye remit, they are remitted unto them; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are retained. 
But Thomas, one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not with them when Jesus came. 
The other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the LORD. But he said unto them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of the nails, and put my finger into the print of the nails, and thrust my hand into his side, I will not believe. 
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and Thomas with them: then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you. 
Then
767, and the king of Bela, which is Zoar. 
All these were joined together in the vale of Siddim, which is the salt sea. 
Twelve years they served Chedorlaomer, and in the thirteenth year they rebelled. 
And in the fourteenth year came Chedorlaomer, and the kings that were with him, and smote the Rephaims in Ashteroth Karnaim, and the Zuzims in Ham, and the Emins in Shaveh Kiriathaim, 
And the Horites in their mount Seir, unto Elparan, which is by the wilderness. 
And they returned, and came to Enmishpat, which is Kadesh, and smote all the country of the Amalekites, and also the Amorites, that dwelt in Hazezontamar. 
And there went out the king of Sodom, and the king of Gomorrah, and the king of Admah, and the king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela (the same is Z
774,orlaomer, and of the kings that were with him, at the valley of Shaveh, which is the king's dale. 
And Melchizedek king of Salem brought forth bread and wine: and he was the priest of the most high God. 
And he blessed him, and said, Blessed be Abram of the most high God, possessor of heaven and earth: 
And blessed be the most high God, which hath delivered thine enemies into thy hand. And he gave him tithes of all. 
And the king of Sodom said unto Abram, Give me the persons, and take the goods to thyself. 
And Abram said to the king of Sodom, I have lift up mine hand unto the LORD, the most high God, the possessor of heaven and earth, 
That I will not take from a thread even to a shoelatchet, and that I will not take any thing that is thine, lest thou shouldest s
655, that the king of Babylon had made Gedaliah the son of Ahikam governor in the land, and had committed unto him men, and women, and children, and of the poor of the land, of them that were not carried away captive to Babylon; 
Then they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan and Jonathan the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of a Maachathite, they and their men. 
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, an
674,on unto me; and my fury, it upheld me. 
And I will tread down the people in mine anger, and make them drunk in my fury, and I will bring down their strength to the earth. 
I will mention the lovingkindnesses of the LORD, and the praises of the LORD, according to all that the LORD hath bestowed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity h
813,is own house. 
But thou art cast out of thy grave like an abominable branch, and as the raiment of those that are slain, thrust through with a sword, that go down to the stones of the pit; as a carcase trodden under feet. 
Thou shalt not be joined with them in burial, because thou hast destroyed thy land, and slain thy people: the seed of evildoers shall never be renowned. 
Prepare slaughter for his children for the iniquity of their fathers; that they do not rise, nor possess the land, nor fill the face of the world with cities. 
For I will rise up against them, saith the LORD of hosts, and cut off from Babylon the name, and remnant, and son, and nephew, saith the LORD. 
I will also make it a possession for the bittern, and pools of water: and I will sweep it with the besom of destruction, saith the L
863,hy right hand? pluck it out of thy bosom. 
For God is my King of old, working salvation in the midst of the earth. 
Thou didst divide the sea by thy strength: thou brakest the heads of the dragons in the waters. 
Thou brakest the heads of leviathan in pieces, and gavest him to be meat to the people inhabiting the wilderness. 
Thou didst cleave the fountain and the flood: thou driedst up mighty rivers. 
The day is thine, the night also is thine: thou hast prepared the light and the sun. 
Thou hast set all the borders of the earth: thou hast made summer and winter. 
Remember this, that the enemy hath reproached, O LORD, and that the foolish people have blasphemed thy name. 
O deliver not the soul of thy turtledove unto the multitude of the wicked: forget not the congregation of thy poor for ever. 
Have respect unto the covenant: for the dark places of t
798, her meat in the summer, and gathereth her food in the harvest. 
How long wilt thou sleep, O sluggard? when wilt thou arise out of thy sleep? 
Yet a little sleep, a little slumber, a little folding of the hands to sleep: 
So shall thy poverty come as one that travelleth, and thy want as an armed man. 
A naughty person, a wicked man, walketh with a froward mouth. 
He winketh with his eyes, he speaketh with his feet, he teacheth with his fingers; 
Frowardness is in his heart, he deviseth mischief continually; he soweth discord. 
Therefore shall his calamity come suddenly; suddenly shall he be broken without remedy. 
These six things doth the LORD hate: yea, seven are an abomination unto him: 
A proud look, a lying tongue, and hands that shed innocent blood, 
An heart that deviseth wicked i
773,nd ye shall be his servants. 
And ye shall cry out in that day because of your king which ye shall have chosen you; and the LORD will not hear you in that day. 
Nevertheless the people refused to obey the voice of Samuel; and they said, Nay; but we will have a king over us; 
That we also may be like all the nations; and that our king may judge us, and go out before us, and fight our battles. 
And Samuel heard all the words of the people, and he rehearsed them in the ears of the LORD. 
And the LORD said to Samuel, Hearken unto their voice, and make them a king. And Samuel said unto the men of Israel, Go ye every man unto his city. 
Now there was a man of Benjamin, whose name was Kish, the son of Abiel, the son of Zeror, the son of Bechorath, the son of Aphiah, a B
688,sses to record, Uriah the priest, and Zechariah the son of Jeberechiah. 
And I went unto the prophetess; and she conceived, and bare a son. Then said the LORD to me, Call his name Mahershalalhashbaz. 
For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and my mother, the riches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be taken away before the king of Assyria. 
The LORD spake also unto me again, saying, 
Forasmuch as this people refuseth the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in Rezin and Remaliah's son; 
Now therefore, behold, the Lord bringeth up upon them the waters of the river, strong and many, even the king of Assyria, and all his glory: and he shall co
924,with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out, will I rule over you: 
And I will bring you out from the people, and will gather you out of the countries wherein ye are scattered, with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out. 
And I will bring you into the wilderness of the people, and there will I plead with you face to face. 
Like as I pleaded with your fathers in the wilderness of the land of Egypt, so will I plead with you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will cause you to pass under the rod, and I will bring you into the bond of the covenant: 
And I will purge out from among you the rebels, and them that transgress against me: I will bring them forth out of the country where they sojourn, and they shall not enter into the land of Israel: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
As for you, O house of Israel, thus saith the Lord GOD; Go ye, serve ye every one his idols, and hereaf
725, he prolong the perfection thereof upon the earth. 
He shall not depart out of darkness; the flame shall dry up his branches, and by the breath of his mouth shall he go away. 
Let not him that is deceived trust in vanity: for vanity shall be his recompence. 
It shall be accomplished before his time, and his branch shall not be green. 
He shall shake off his unripe grape as the vine, and shall cast off his flower as the olive. 
For the congregation of hypocrites shall be desolate, and fire shall consume the tabernacles of bribery. 
They conceive mischief, and bring forth vanity, and their belly prepareth deceit. 
Then Job answered and said, 
I have heard many such things: miserable comforters are ye all. 
Shall vain 
771,r gods, and have worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath the LORD brought upon them all this evil. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, when Solomon had built the two houses, the house of the LORD, and the king's house, 
(Now Hiram the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar trees and fir trees, and with gold, according to all his desire,) that then king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee. 
And Hiram came out from Tyre to see the cities which Solomon had given him; and they pleased him not. 
And he said, What cities are these which thou hast given me, my brother? And he called them the land of Cabul unto this day. 
And Hiram sent to the king sixscore talents of gold. 
And this is the reason of the levy which king 
790,e LORD, to the mighty One of Israel. 
And the LORD shall cause his glorious voice to be heard, and shall shew the lighting down of his arm, with the indignation of his anger, and with the flame of a devouring fire, with scattering, and tempest, and hailstones. 
For through the voice of the LORD shall the Assyrian be beaten down, which smote with a rod. 
And in every place where the grounded staff shall pass, which the LORD shall lay upon him, it shall be with tabrets and harps: and in battles of shaking will he fight with it. 
For Tophet is ordained of old; yea, for the king it is prepared; he hath made it deep and large: the pile thereof is fire and much wood; the breath of the LORD, like a stream of brimstone, doth kindle it. 
Woe to them that go down to Egypt for help; and sta
746,since the fathers fell asleep, all things continue as they were from the beginning of the creation. 
For this they willingly are ignorant of, that by the word of God the heavens were of old, and the earth standing out of the water and in the water: 
Whereby the world that then was, being overflowed with water, perished: 
But the heavens and the earth, which are now, by the same word are kept in store, reserved unto fire against the day of judgment and perdition of ungodly men. 
But, beloved, be not ignorant of this one thing, that one day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one day. 
The Lord is not slack concerning his promise, as some men count slackness; but is longsuffering to us-ward, not willing that any 
663,the ears of corn and to eat. 
But when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy disciples do that which is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day. 
But he said unto them, Have ye not read what David did, when he was an hungred, and they that were with him; 
How he entered into the house of God, and did eat the shewbread, which was not lawful for him to eat, neither for them which were with him, but only for the priests? 
Or have ye not read in the law, how that on the sabbath days the priests in the temple profane the sabbath, and are blameless? 
But I say unto you, That in this place is one greater than the temple. 
But if ye had known what t
669,tes before the LORD: and the children of Israel shall put their hands upon the Levites: 
And Aaron shall offer the Levites before the LORD for an offering of the children of Israel, that they may execute the service of the LORD. 
And the Levites shall lay their hands upon the heads of the bullocks: and thou shalt offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, unto the LORD, to make an atonement for the Levites. 
And thou shalt set the Levites before Aaron, and before his sons, and offer them for an offering unto the LORD. 
Thus shalt thou separate the Levites from among the children of Israel: and the Levites shall be mine. 
And after tha
846,lock, they were troubled, because there was no shepherd. 
Mine anger was kindled against the shepherds, and I punished the goats: for the LORD of hosts hath visited his flock the house of Judah, and hath made them as his goodly horse in the battle. 
Out of him came forth the corner, out of him the nail, out of him the battle bow, out of him every oppressor together. 
And they shall be as mighty men, which tread down their enemies in the mire of the streets in the battle: and they shall fight, because the LORD is with them, and the riders on horses shall be confounded. 
And I will strengthen the house of Judah, and I will save the house of Joseph, and I will bring them again to place them; for I have mercy upon them: and they shall be as though I had not cast them off: for I am the LORD their God, and will hear them. 
And they of Ephra
707, saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 
And the king said unto his servants, Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel? 
And I am this day weak, though anointed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah be too hard for me: the LORD shall reward the doer of evil according to his wickedness. 
And when Saul's son heard that Abner was dead in Hebron, his hands were feeble, and all the Israelite
848, the tabernacle, and the tabernacle of the congregation, his covering, and the covering of the badgers' skins that is above upon it, and the hanging for the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, 
And the hangings of the court, and the hanging for the door of the gate of the court, which is by the tabernacle and by the altar round about, and their cords, and all the instruments of their service, and all that is made for them: so shall they serve. 
At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As f
862,ng you, and shall make marriages with them, and go in unto them, and they to you: 
Know for a certainty that the LORD your God will no more drive out any of these nations from before you; but they shall be snares and traps unto you, and scourges in your sides, and thorns in your eyes, until ye perish from off this good land which the LORD your God hath given you. 
And, behold, this day I am going the way of all the earth: and ye know in all your hearts and in all your souls, that not one thing hath failed of all the good things which the LORD your God spake concerning you; all are come to pass unto you, and not one thing hath failed thereof. 
Therefore it shall come to pass, that as all good things are come upon you, which the LORD your God promised you; so shall the LORD bring upon you all evil things, until he have destroyed you from off this good 
768,ple came near unto him. And he repaired the altar of the LORD that was broken down. 
And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, unto whom the word of the LORD came, saying, Israel shall be thy name: 
And with the stones he built an altar in the name of the LORD: and he made a trench about the altar, as great as would contain two measures of seed. 
And he put the wood in order, and cut the bullock in pieces, and laid him on the wood, and said, Fill four barrels with water, and pour it on the burnt sacrifice, and on the wood. 
And he said, Do it the second time. And they did it the second time. And he said, Do it the third time. And they did it the third time. 
And the water ran round about the altar; and he fill
892,d unto Jacob; because they have not wholly followed me: 
Save Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite, and Joshua the son of Nun: for they have wholly followed the LORD. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled against Israel, and he made them wander in the wilderness forty years, until all the generation, that had done evil in the sight of the LORD, was consumed. 
And, behold, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves will go ready armed before the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto their place: and our little ones shall dwell in th
952,alley, that is in the country of Moab, to the top of Pisgah, which looketh toward Jeshimon. 
And Israel sent messengers unto Sihon king of the Amorites, saying, 
Let me pass through thy land: we will not turn into the fields, or into the vineyards; we will not drink of the waters of the well: but we will go along by the king's high way, until we be past thy borders. 
And Sihon would not suffer Israel to pass through his border: but Sihon gathered all his people together, and went out against Israel into the wilderness: and he came to Jahaz, and fought against Israel. 
And Israel smote him with the edge of the sword, and possessed his land from Arnon unto Jabbok, even unto the children of Ammon: for the border of the children of Ammon was strong. 
And Israel took all these cities: and Israel dwelt in all the cities of the Amorites, in Heshbon, and in all the villages thereof. 
For Heshbon was the city of Sihon the king of the Amorites, who
829,ister of Ahaziah,) hid him from Athaliah, so that she slew him not. 
And he was with them hid in the house of God six years: and Athaliah reigned over the land. 
And in the seventh year Jehoiada strengthened himself, and took the captains of hundreds, Azariah the son of Jeroham, and Ishmael the son of Jehohanan, and Azariah the son of Obed, and Maaseiah the son of Adaiah, and Elishaphat the son of Zichri, into covenant with him. 
And they went about in Judah, and gathered the Levites out of all the cities of Judah, and the chief of the fathers of Israel, and they came to Jerusalem. 
And all the congregation made a covenant with the king in the house of God. And he said unto them, Behold, the king's son shall reign, as the LORD hath said of the sons of David. 
This is the thing that ye shall do; A third part of you ent
762,ard. 
And they shall look unto the earth; and behold trouble and darkness, dimness of anguish; and they shall be driven to darkness. 
Nevertheless the dimness shall not be such as was in her vexation, when at the first he lightly afflicted the land of Zebulun and the land of Naphtali, and afterward did more grievously afflict her by the way of the sea, beyond Jordan, in Galilee of the nations. 
The people that walked in darkness have seen a great light: they that dwell in the land of the shadow of death, upon them hath the light shined. 
Thou hast multiplied the nation, and not increased the joy: they joy before thee according to the joy in harvest, and as men rejoice when they divide the spoil. 
For thou hast broken the yoke of his burden, and the sta
954,e house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
In the five and twentieth year of our captivity, in the beginning of the year, in the tenth day of the month, in the fourteenth year after that the city was smitten, in the selfsame day the hand of the LORD was upon me, and brought me thither. 
In the visions of God brought he me into the land of Israel, and set me upon a very high mountain, by which was as the frame of a city on the south. 
And he brought me thither, and, behold, there was a man, whose appearance was like the appearance of brass, with a line of flax in his hand, and a measuring reed; and he stood in the gate. 
And the man said unto me, Son of man, behold with thine eyes, and hear with thine ears, and set thine heart upon all that I shall shew thee; for to the intent that I might shew them unto thee art thou brought hither: declare all that thou seest to the house of Israel. 
And behold a wall on the outside of the house round about, 
955,unto my master, the LORD's anointed, to stretch forth mine hand against him, seeing he is the anointed of the LORD. 
So David stayed his servants with these words, and suffered them not to rise against Saul. But Saul rose up out of the cave, and went on his way. 
David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine eyes have seen how that the LORD had delivered thee to day into mine hand in the cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand against my lord; for he is the LORD's anointed. 
Moreover, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my hand: for in that I cut off the skirt of thy robe, and killed thee not, kn
694,ion of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the congregation that came out of Israel, and the strangers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced. 
So there was great joy in Jerusalem: for since the time of Solomon the son of David king of Israel there was not the like in Jerusalem. 
Then the priests the Levites arose and blessed the people: and their voice was heard, and their prayer came up to his holy dwelling place, even unto heaven. 
Now when all this was finished, all Israel that were present went out to the cities of Judah, and brake the images in pieces, and cut down the groves, and threw down the high places and the altars out of all Ju
935, come to him, they changed their minds, and said that he was a god. 
In the same quarters were possessions of the chief man of the island, whose name was Publius; who received us, and lodged us three days courteously. 
And it came to pass, that the father of Publius lay sick of a fever and of a bloody flux: to whom Paul entered in, and prayed, and laid his hands on him, and healed him. 
So when this was done, others also, which had diseases in the island, came, and were healed: 
Who also honoured us with many honours; and when we departed, they laded us with such things as were necessary. 
And after three months we departed in a ship of Alexandria, which had wintered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux. 
And landing at Syracuse, we tarried there three days. 
And from thence we fetched a compass, and came to Rhegium: and after one day the south wind blew, and we came the next day to Puteoli: 
Where we found breth
702,n riches, but in the living God, who giveth us richly all things to enjoy; 
That they do good, that they be rich in good works, ready to distribute, willing to communicate; 
Laying up in store for themselves a good foundation against the time to come, that they may lay hold on eternal life. 
O Timothy, keep that which is committed to thy trust, avoiding profane and vain babblings, and oppositions of science falsely so called: 
Which some professing have erred concerning the faith. Grace be with thee. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, according to the promise of life which is in Christ Jesus, 
To Timothy, my dearly beloved son: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the Fat
788,alt let him go free from thee. 
And when thou sendest him out free from thee, thou shalt not let him go away empty: 
Thou shalt furnish him liberally out of thy flock, and out of thy floor, and out of thy winepress: of that wherewith the LORD thy God hath blessed thee thou shalt give unto him. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in the land of Egypt, and the LORD thy God redeemed thee: therefore I command thee this thing to day. 
And it shall be, if he say unto thee, I will not go away from thee; because he loveth thee and thine house, because he is well with thee; 
Then thou shalt take an aul, and thrust it through his ear unto the door, and he shall be thy servant for ever. And also unto thy maidservant thou shalt do likewise. 
It shall not seem hard unto thee, 
720, I arose, and they spake against me. 
All my inward friends abhorred me: and they whom I loved are turned against me. 
My bone cleaveth to my skin and to my flesh, and I am escaped with the skin of my teeth. 
Have pity upon me, have pity upon me, O ye my friends; for the hand of God hath touched me. 
Why do ye persecute me as God, and are not satisfied with my flesh? 
Oh that my words were now written! oh that they were printed in a book! 
That they were graven with an iron pen and lead in the rock for ever! 
For I know that my redeemer liveth, and that he shall stand at the latter day upon the earth: 
And though after my skin worms destroy this body, yet in my flesh shall I see God: 
Whom I shall see for mysel
827, together. 
And they drew Alexander out of the multitude, the Jews putting him forward. And Alexander beckoned with the hand, and would have made his defence unto the people. 
But when they knew that he was a Jew, all with one voice about the space of two hours cried out, Great is Diana of the Ephesians. 
And when the townclerk had appeased the people, he said, Ye men of Ephesus, what man is there that knoweth not how that the city of the Ephesians is a worshipper of the great goddess Diana, and of the image which fell down from Jupiter? 
Seeing then that these things cannot be spoken against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rashly. 
For ye have brought hither these men, which are neither robbers of churches, nor yet blasphemers of your goddess. 
Wherefore if Demetrius, and the craftsmen which are with him, 
826,ved us, and hath given us everlasting consolation and good hope through grace, 
Comfort your hearts, and stablish you in every good word and work. 
Finally, brethren, pray for us, that the word of the Lord may have free course, and be glorified, even as it is with you: 
And that we may be delivered from unreasonable and wicked men: for all men have not faith. 
But the Lord is faithful, who shall stablish you, and keep you from evil. 
And we have confidence in the Lord touching you, that ye both do and will do the things which we command you. 
And the Lord direct your hearts into the love of God, and into the patient waiting for Christ. 
Now we command you, brethren, in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, that ye withdraw yourselves from every brother that walketh disorderly, and not after the tradition which he rece
821,hich were to be spoken after; 
But Christ as a son over his own house; whose house are we, if we hold fast the confidence and the rejoicing of the hope firm unto the end. 
Wherefore (as the Holy Ghost saith, To day if ye will hear his voice, 
Harden not your hearts, as in the provocation, in the day of temptation in the wilderness: 
When your fathers tempted me, proved me, and saw my works forty years. 
Wherefore I was grieved with that generation, and said, They do alway err in their heart; and they have not known my ways. 
So I sware in my wrath, They shall not enter into my rest.) 
Take heed, brethren, lest there be in any of you an evil heart of unbelief, in departing from the living God. 
But exhort one another daily, while it is called To day; lest any of you be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin.
706,lethites: 
And Adoram was over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder: 
And Sheva was scribe: and Zadok and Abiathar were the priests: 
And Ira also the Jairite was a chief ruler about David. 
Then there was a famine in the days of David three years, year after year; and David enquired of the LORD. And the LORD answered, It is for Saul, and for his bloody house, because he slew the Gibeonites. 
And the king called the Gibeonites, and said unto them; (now the Gibeonites were not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal to the children of Israel and Judah.) 
Wherefore D
715,and the assemblies of violent men have sought after my soul; and have not set thee before them. 
But thou, O Lord, art a God full of compassion, and gracious, long suffering, and plenteous in mercy and truth. 
O turn unto me, and have mercy upon me; give thy strength unto thy servant, and save the son of thine handmaid. 
Shew me a token for good; that they which hate me may see it, and be ashamed: because thou, LORD, hast holpen me, and comforted me. 
His foundation is in the holy mountains. 
The LORD loveth the gates of Zion more than all the dwellings of Jacob. 
Glorious things are spoken of thee, O city of God. Selah. 
I will make mention of Rahab and Babylon to them that know me: behold Philistia, and 
780,n hath hired us. He saith unto them, Go ye also into the vineyard; and whatsoever is right, that shall ye receive. 
So when even was come, the lord of the vineyard saith unto his steward, Call the labourers, and give them their hire, beginning from the last unto the first. 
And when they came that were hired about the eleventh hour, they received every man a penny. 
But when the first came, they supposed that they should have received more; and they likewise received every man a penny. 
And when they had received it, they murmured against the goodman of the house, 
Saying, These last have wrought but one hour, and thou hast made them equal unto us, which have borne the burden and heat of the day. 
But he answered one of them, and said, Friend, I do thee no wrong: didst 
887,ears old was I when Moses the servant of the LORD sent me from Kadeshbarnea to espy out the land; and I brought him word again as it was in mine heart. 
Nevertheless my brethren that went up with me made the heart of the people melt: but I wholly followed the LORD my God. 
And Moses sware on that day, saying, Surely the land whereon thy feet have trodden shall be thine inheritance, and thy children's for ever, because thou hast wholly followed the LORD my God. 
And now, behold, the LORD hath kept me alive, as he said, these forty and five years, even since the LORD spake this word unto Moses, while the children of Israel wandered in the wilderness: and now, lo, I am this day fourscore and five years old. 
As yet I am as strong this day as I was in the day that Moses sent me: as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war, both to go out, and to come in. 
Now th
678,of my people is become cruel, like the ostriches in the wilderness. 
The tongue of the sucking child cleaveth to the roof of his mouth for thirst: the young children ask bread, and no man breaketh it unto them. 
They that did feed delicately are desolate in the streets: they that were brought up in scarlet embrace dunghills. 
For the punishment of the iniquity of the daughter of my people is greater than the punishment of the sin of Sodom, that was overthrown as in a moment, and no hands stayed on her. 
Her Nazarites were purer than snow, they were whiter than milk, they were more ruddy in body than rubies, their polishing was of sapphire: 
Their visage is blacker than 
733,at ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom, and sit on thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to have you, that he may sift you as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto them, When I sent you without purse, and scrip, and shoes, lacked ye any thing? And they said, Nothing. 
Then said he unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him take it, and 
828,here they had not much earth: and forthwith they sprung up, because they had no deepness of earth: 
And when the sun was up, they were scorched; and because they had no root, they withered away. 
And some fell among thorns; and the thorns sprung up, and choked them: 
But other fell into good ground, and brought forth fruit, some an hundredfold, some sixtyfold, some thirtyfold. 
Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And the disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest thou unto them in parables? 
He answered and said unto them, Because it is given unto you to know the mysteries of the kingdom of heaven, but to them it is not given. 
For whosoever hath, to him shall be given, and he shall have more abundance: but whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken away even that he hath. 
Therefore speak I to them in parabl
728, and slaves, and souls of men. 
And the fruits that thy soul lusted after are departed from thee, and all things which were dainty and goodly are departed from thee, and thou shalt find them no more at all. 
The merchants of these things, which were made rich by her, shall stand afar off for the fear of her torment, weeping and wailing, 
And saying, Alas, alas that great city, that was clothed in fine linen, and purple, and scarlet, and decked with gold, and precious stones, and pearls! 
For in one hour so great riches is come to nought. And every shipmaster, and all the company in ships, and sailors, and as many as trade by sea, stood afar off, 
And cried when they saw the smoke of her burning, saying, What city is li
803,nd widowhood: they shall come upon thee in their perfection for the multitude of thy sorceries, and for the great abundance of thine enchantments. 
For thou hast trusted in thy wickedness: thou hast said, None seeth me. Thy wisdom and thy knowledge, it hath perverted thee; and thou hast said in thine heart, I am, and none else beside me. 
Therefore shall evil come upon thee; thou shalt not know from whence it riseth: and mischief shall fall upon thee; thou shalt not be able to put it off: and desolation shall come upon thee suddenly, which thou shalt not know. 
Stand now with thine enchantments, and with the multitude of thy sorceries, wherein thou hast laboured from thy youth; if so be thou shalt be able to profit, if so be thou mayest prevail. 
Thou art wearied in the multitude of thy couns
722,end now prosperity. 
Blessed be he that cometh in the name of the LORD: we have blessed you out of the house of the LORD. 
God is the LORD, which hath shewed us light: bind the sacrifice with cords, even unto the horns of the altar. 
Thou art my God, and I will praise thee: thou art my God, I will exalt thee. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Blessed are the undefiled in the way, who walk in the law of the LORD. 
Blessed are they that keep his testimonies, and that seek him with the whole heart. 
They also do no iniquity: they walk in his ways. 
Thou hast commanded us to keep thy precepts diligently. 
O that my ways were directed to keep thy statutes! 
Then shall I no
700,e church daily such as should be saved. 
Now Peter and John went up together into the temple at the hour of prayer, being the ninth hour. 
And a certain man lame from his mother's womb was carried, whom they laid daily at the gate of the temple which is called Beautiful, to ask alms of them that entered into the temple; 
Who seeing Peter and John about to go into the temple asked an alms. 
And Peter, fastening his eyes upon him with John, said, Look on us. 
And he gave heed unto them, expecting to receive something of them. 
Then Peter said, Silver and gold have I none; but such as I have give I thee: In the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth rise up and walk. 
And he took him by the right han
821,ished in thine hand. 
Swear now therefore unto me by the LORD, that thou wilt not cut off my seed after me, and that thou wilt not destroy my name out of my father's house. 
And David sware unto Saul. And Saul went home; but David and his men gat them up unto the hold. 
And Samuel died; and all the Israelites were gathered together, and lamented him, and buried him in his house at Ramah. And David arose, and went down to the wilderness of Paran. 
And there was a man in Maon, whose possessions were in Carmel; and the man was very great, and he had three thousand sheep, and a thousand goats: and he was shearing his sheep in Carmel. 
Now the name of the man was Nabal; and the name of his wife Abigail: and she was a woman of good understanding, and of a beautiful countenance: but the man was churlish and evil in h
835,re in Laodicea, and Nymphas, and the church which is in his house. 
And when this epistle is read among you, cause that it be read also in the church of the Laodiceans; and that ye likewise read the epistle from Laodicea. 
And say to Archippus, Take heed to the ministry which thou hast received in the Lord, that thou fulfil it. 
The salutation by the hand of me Paul. Remember my bonds. Grace be with you. Amen. 
Paul, and Silvanus, and Timotheus, unto the church of the Thessalonians which is in God the Father and in the Lord Jesus Christ: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father, and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We give thanks to God always for you all, making mention of you in our prayers; 
Remembering without ceasing your work of faith, and labour of love, and patience of hope in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the sight of 
859, delivered the book to Shaphan. 
And Shaphan carried the book to the king, and brought the king word back again, saying, All that was committed to thy servants, they do it. 
And they have gathered together the money that was found in the house of the LORD, and have delivered it into the hand of the overseers, and to the hand of the workmen. 
Then Shaphan the scribe told the king, saying, Hilkiah the priest hath given me a book. And Shaphan read it before the king. 
And it came to pass, when the king had heard the words of the law, that he rent his clothes. 
And the king commanded Hilkiah, and Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Abdon the son of Micah, and Shaphan the scribe, and Asaiah a servant of the king's, saying, 
Go, enquire of the LORD for me, and for them that are left in Israel and in Judah, concerning the words of the book that is found: for 
879,ed, he shall not be afraid, until he see his desire upon his enemies. 
He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire of the wicked shall perish. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise, O ye servants of the LORD, praise the name of the LORD. 
Blessed be the name of the LORD from this time forth and for evermore. 
From the rising of the sun unto the going down of the same the LORD's name is to be praised. 
The LORD is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens. 
Who is like unto the LORD our God, who dwelleth on high, 
Who humbleth himself to behold the things that are in heaven, and in the earth! 
He raiseth up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth the needy out of the dunghill; 
That he may se
719,t of them; and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, saith the Lord GOD, when I shall be sanctified in you before their eyes. 
For I will take you from among the heathen, and gather you out of all countries, and will bring you into your own land. 
Then will I sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean: from all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I cleanse you. 
A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put within you: and I will take away the stony heart out of your flesh, and I will give you an heart of flesh. 
And I will put my spirit within you, and cause you to walk in my statutes, and ye shall keep my judgments, and do them. 
And ye shall dwell in the land that I
641, have been to you: quit yourselves like men, and fight. 
And the Philistines fought, and Israel was smitten, and they fled every man into his tent: and there was a very great slaughter; for there fell of Israel thirty thousand footmen. 
And the ark of God was taken; and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were slain. 
And there ran a man of Benjamin out of the army, and came to Shiloh the same day with his clothes rent, and with earth upon his head. 
And when he came, lo, Eli sat upon a seat by the wayside watching: for his heart trembled for the ark of God. And when the man came into the city, and told it, all the city cried o
808, hidden things of darkness, and will make manifest the counsels of the hearts: and then shall every man have praise of God. 
And these things, brethren, I have in a figure transferred to myself and to Apollos for your sakes; that ye might learn in us not to think of men above that which is written, that no one of you be puffed up for one against another. 
For who maketh thee to differ from another? and what hast thou that thou didst not receive? now if thou didst receive it, why dost thou glory, as if thou hadst not received it? 
Now ye are full, now ye are rich, ye have reigned as kings without us: and I would to God ye did reign, that we also might reign with you. 
For I think that God hath set forth us the apostles last, as it were appointed to death: for we are made a spectacle unto the world,
793,e dogs came and licked his sores. 
And it came to pass, that the beggar died, and was carried by the angels into Abraham's bosom: the rich man also died, and was buried; 
And in hell he lift up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham afar off, and Lazarus in his bosom. 
And he cried and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus, that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am tormented in this flame. 
But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now he is comforted, and thou art tormented. 
And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither can they pass to us, that would co
721,ll things that ever I did: is not this the Christ? 
Then they went out of the city, and came unto him. 
In the mean while his disciples prayed him, saying, Master, eat. 
But he said unto them, I have meat to eat that ye know not of. 
Therefore said the disciples one to another, Hath any man brought him ought to eat? 
Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the will of him that sent me, and to finish his work. 
Say not ye, There are yet four months, and then cometh harvest? behold, I say unto you, Lift up your eyes, and look on the fields; for they are white already to harvest. 
And he that reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal: that both he that soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice tog
715,gypt, which thou wast afraid of; and they shall cleave unto thee. 
Also every sickness, and every plague, which is not written in the book of this law, them will the LORD bring upon thee, until thou be destroyed. 
And ye shall be left few in number, whereas ye were as the stars of heaven for multitude; because thou wouldest not obey the voice of the LORD thy God. 
And it shall come to pass, that as the LORD rejoiced over you to do you good, and to multiply you; so the LORD will rejoice over you to destroy you, and to bring you to nought; and ye shall be plucked from off the land whither thou goest to possess it. 
And the LORD shall scatter thee among all people, from the one end of the earth even unto the 
794,alem. 
Then shalt thou be pleased with the sacrifices of righteousness, with burnt offering and whole burnt offering: then shall they offer bullocks upon thine altar. 
Why boastest thou thyself in mischief, O mighty man? the goodness of God endureth continually. 
The tongue deviseth mischiefs; like a sharp razor, working deceitfully. 
Thou lovest evil more than good; and lying rather than to speak righteousness. Selah. 
Thou lovest all devouring words, O thou deceitful tongue. 
God shall likewise destroy thee for ever, he shall take thee away, and pluck thee out of thy dwelling place, and root thee out of the land of the living. Selah. 
The righteous also shall see, and fear, and shall laugh at him: 
Lo, this is the man that made not God his strength; but trusted in the abundance of 
833,e, yet will I trust in him: but I will maintain mine own ways before him. 
He also shall be my salvation: for an hypocrite shall not come before him. 
Hear diligently my speech, and my declaration with your ears. 
Behold now, I have ordered my cause; I know that I shall be justified. 
Who is he that will plead with me? for now, if I hold my tongue, I shall give up the ghost. 
Only do not two things unto me: then will I not hide myself from thee. 
Withdraw thine hand far from me: and let not thy dread make me afraid. 
Then call thou, and I will answer: or let me speak, and answer thou me. 
How many are mine iniquities and sins? make me to know my transgression and my sin. 
Wherefore hidest thou thy face, and holdest me for thine enemy? 
Wilt thou break a leaf driven to and fro? and wilt thou pursue the dry stubble? 
For th
824,is trespass offering unto the LORD, a ram without blemish out of the flock, with thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: 
And the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD: and it shall be forgiven him for any thing of all that he hath done in trespassing therein. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command Aaron and his sons, saying, This is the law of the burnt offering: It is the burnt offering, because of the burning upon the altar all night unto the morning, and the fire of the altar shall be burning in it. 
And the priest shall put on his linen garment, and his linen breeches shall he put upon his flesh, and take up the ashes which the fire hath consumed with the burnt offering on the altar, and he shall put them beside the altar. 
And he shall put off his garments, and p
945,Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee. 
And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall know that I am the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and I have made it. 
Behold, therefore I am against thee, and against thy rivers, and I will make the land of Egypt utterly waste and desolate, from the tower of Syene even unto the border of Ethiopia. 
No foot of man shall pass through it, nor foot of beast shall pass through it, neither shall it be inhabited forty years. 
And I will make the land of Egypt desolate in the midst of the countries that are desolate, and her cities among the cities that are laid waste shall be desolate forty years: and I wi
697, mine eyes, I considered, and saw fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air. 
And I heard a voice saying unto me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat. 
But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common or unclean hath at any time entered into my mouth. 
But the voice answered me again from heaven, What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common. 
And this was done three times: and all were drawn up again into heaven. 
And, behold, immediately there were three men already come unto the house where I was, sent from Caesarea unto me. 
And the Spirit bade me go with them, nothing doubting. Moreover these six brethren accompanied me, and we entered into the
680,ifts of healings, helps, governments, diversities of tongues. 
Are all apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all workers of miracles? 
Have all the gifts of healing? do all speak with tongues? do all interpret? 
But covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way. 
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and
688,ef priests heard these things, they doubted of them whereunto this would grow. 
Then came one and told them, saying, Behold, the men whom ye put in prison are standing in the temple, and teaching the people. 
Then went the captain with the officers, and brought them without violence: for they feared the people, lest they should have been stoned. 
And when they had brought them, they set them before the council: and the high priest asked them, 
Saying, Did not we straitly command you that ye should not teach in this name? and, behold, ye have filled Jerusalem with your doctrine, and intend to bring this man's blood upon us. 
Then Peter and the other apostles answered and said, We 
722,according to the word of the LORD, which he spake unto him. 
And he spake to his sons, saying, Saddle me the ass. And they saddled him. 
And he went and found his carcase cast in the way, and the ass and the lion standing by the carcase: the lion had not eaten the carcase, nor torn the ass. 
And the prophet took up the carcase of the man of God, and laid it upon the ass, and brought it back: and the old prophet came to the city, to mourn and to bury him. 
And he laid his carcase in his own grave; and they mourned over him, saying, Alas, my brother! 
And it came to pass, after he had buried him, that he spake to his sons, saying, When I am dead, then bury me in the sepulchre wherein the man of God is buried; lay m
868,those lands any ways able to deliver their lands out of mine hand? 
Who was there among all the gods of those nations that my fathers utterly destroyed, that could deliver his people out of mine hand, that your God should be able to deliver you out of mine hand? 
Now therefore let not Hezekiah deceive you, nor persuade you on this manner, neither yet believe him: for no god of any nation or kingdom was able to deliver his people out of mine hand, and out of the hand of my fathers: how much less shall your God deliver you out of mine hand? 
And his servants spake yet more against the LORD God, and against his servant Hezekiah. 
He wrote also letters to rail on the LORD God of Israel, and to speak against him, saying, As the gods of the nations of other lands have not delivered their people out of mine hand, so shall not the God of Hezekiah deliver his peopl
919,st ye up, cast ye up, prepare the way, take up the stumblingblock out of the way of my people. 
For thus saith the high and lofty One that inhabiteth eternity, whose name is Holy; I dwell in the high and holy place, with him also that is of a contrite and humble spirit, to revive the spirit of the humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always wroth: for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made. 
For the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him: I hid me, and was wroth, and he went on frowardly in the way of his heart. 
I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and restore comforts unto him and to his mourners. 
I create the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea
879,eth. 
And the Gentiles shall see thy righteousness, and all kings thy glory: and thou shalt be called by a new name, which the mouth of the LORD shall name. 
Thou shalt also be a crown of glory in the hand of the LORD, and a royal diadem in the hand of thy God. 
Thou shalt no more be termed Forsaken; neither shall thy land any more be termed Desolate: but thou shalt be called Hephzibah, and thy land Beulah: for the LORD delighteth in thee, and thy land shall be married. 
For as a young man marrieth a virgin, so shall thy sons marry thee: and as the bridegroom rejoiceth over the bride, so shall thy God rejoice over thee. 
I have set watchmen upon thy walls, O Jerusalem, which shall never hold their peace day nor night: ye that make mention of the LORD, keep not silence, 
And give him no rest, till he establish, and till he make Jerusalem a praise in the earth. 
The LO
645, instruments of musick. 
And the women answered one another as they played, and said, Saul hath slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands. 
And Saul was very wroth, and the saying displeased him; and he said, They have ascribed unto David ten thousands, and to me they have ascribed but thousands: and what can he have more but the kingdom? 
And Saul eyed David from that day and forward. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the evil spirit from God came upon Saul, and he prophesied in the midst of the house: and David played with his hand, as at other times: and there was a javelin in Saul's hand. 
And Saul cast the javelin; for
672,th. 
He that hideth hatred with lying lips, and he that uttereth a slander, is a fool. 
In the multitude of words there wanteth not sin: but he that refraineth his lips is wise. 
The tongue of the just is as choice silver: the heart of the wicked is little worth. 
The lips of the righteous feed many: but fools die for want of wisdom. 
The blessing of the LORD, it maketh rich, and he addeth no sorrow with it. 
It is as sport to a fool to do mischief: but a man of understanding hath wisdom. 
The fear of the wicked, it shall come upon him: but the desire of the righteous shall be granted. 
As the whirlwind passeth, so is the wicked no more: but the righteous is an ev
752,again I say, Rejoice. 
Let your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand. 
Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God. 
And the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus. 
Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things. 
Those things, which ye have both learned, and received, and heard, and seen in me, do: and the God of peace shall be with you. 
But I rejoiced in
921, that maketh mention thereof shall be afraid in himself, because of the counsel of the LORD of hosts, which he hath determined against it. 
In that day shall five cities in the land of Egypt speak the language of Canaan, and swear to the LORD of hosts; one shall be called, The city of destruction. 
In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall r
860,ll give her her vineyards from thence, and the valley of Achor for a door of hope: and she shall sing there, as in the days of her youth, and as in the day when she came up out of the land of Egypt. 
And it shall be at that day, saith the LORD, that thou shalt call me Ishi; and shalt call me no more Baali. 
For I will take away the names of Baalim out of her mouth, and they shall no more be remembered by their name. 
And in that day will I make a covenant for them with the beasts of the field and with the fowls of heaven, and with the creeping things of the ground: and I will break the bow and the sword and the battle out of the earth, and will make them to lie down safely. 
And I will betroth thee unto me for ever; yea, I will betroth thee unto me in righteousness, and in judgment, and in lovingkindness, and in mercies. 
I will even betroth thee u
701,orsemen. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed and went behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from before their face, and stood behind them: 
And it came between the camp of the Egyptians and the camp of Israel; and it was a cloud and darkness to them, but it gave light by night to these: so that the one came not near the other all the night. 
And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the LORD caused the sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the sea dry land, and the waters were divided. 

676,t a house falleth. 
If Satan also be divided against himself, how shall his kingdom stand? because ye say that I cast out devils through Beelzebub. 
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your sons cast them out? therefore shall they be your judges. 
But if I with the finger of God cast out devils, no doubt the kingdom of God is come upon you. 
When a strong man armed keepeth his palace, his goods are in peace: 
But when a stronger than he shall come upon him, and overcome him, he taketh from him all his armour wherein he trusted, and divideth his spoils. 
He that is not with me is against me: and he that gathereth not with me scattereth. 
When the unclean 
953,the mountains, Shamir, and Jattir, and Socoh, 
And Dannah, and Kirjathsannah, which is Debir, 
And Anab, and Eshtemoh, and Anim, 
And Goshen, and Holon, and Giloh; eleven cities with their villages: 
Arab, and Dumah, and Eshean, 
And Janum, and Bethtappuah, and Aphekah, 
And Humtah, and Kirjatharba, which is Hebron, and Zior; nine cities with their villages: 
Maon, Carmel, and Ziph, and Juttah, 
And Jezreel, and Jokdeam, and Zanoah, 
Cain, Gibeah, and Timnah; ten cities with their villages: 
Halhul, Bethzur, and Gedor, 
And Maarath, and Bethanoth, and Eltekon; six cities with their villages: 
Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, and Rabbah; two cities with their villages: 
In the wilderness, Betharabah, Middin, and Secacah, 
And Nibshan, and the city of Salt, and Engedi; six cities with their villages. 
As for the Jebusites the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the children of Judah could not drive them out; but the Jebusites dwell with the childr
696, the Lord God of his father, and walked in his commandments, and not after the doings of Israel. 
Therefore the LORD stablished the kingdom in his hand; and all Judah brought to Jehoshaphat presents; and he had riches and honour in abundance. 
And his heart was lifted up in the ways of the LORD: moreover he took away the high places and groves out of Judah. 
Also in the third year of his reign he sent to his princes, even to Benhail, and to Obadiah, and to Zechariah, and to Nethaneel, and to Michaiah, to teach in the cities of Judah. 
And with them he sent Levites, even Shemaiah, and Nethaniah, and Zebadiah, and Asahel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehonathan, and Adonijah, and Tobijah, and Toba
889,hee in a clift of the rock, and will cover thee with my hand while I pass by: 
And I will take away mine hand, and thou shalt see my back parts: but my face shall not be seen. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Hew thee two tables of stone like unto the first: and I will write upon these tables the words that were in the first tables, which thou brakest. 
And be ready in the morning, and come up in the morning unto mount Sinai, and present thyself there to me in the top of the mount. 
And no man shall come up with thee, neither let any man be seen throughout all the mount; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before that mount. 
And he hewed two tables of stone like unto the first; and Moses rose up early in the morning, and went up unto mount Sinai, as the LORD had commanded him, and took in his hand the two tables of stone. 
And the LORD descended in the cloud, and stood with h
792,ds. 
And the fortress of the high fort of thy walls shall he bring down, lay low, and bring to the ground, even to the dust. 
In that day shall this song be sung in the land of Judah; We have a strong city; salvation will God appoint for walls and bulwarks. 
Open ye the gates, that the righteous nation which keepeth the truth may enter in. 
Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind is stayed on thee: because he trusteth in thee. 
Trust ye in the LORD for ever: for in the LORD JEHOVAH is everlasting strength: 
For he bringeth down them that dwell on high; the lofty city, he layeth it low; he layeth it low, even to the ground; he bringeth it even to the dust. 
The foot shall tread it down, even the feet of the poor, and the steps of the needy. 
The way of the just is uprightnes
904,. 
Get wisdom, get understanding: forget it not; neither decline from the words of my mouth. 
Forsake her not, and she shall preserve thee: love her, and she shall keep thee. 
Wisdom is the principal thing; therefore get wisdom: and with all thy getting get understanding. 
Exalt her, and she shall promote thee: she shall bring thee to honour, when thou dost embrace her. 
She shall give to thine head an ornament of grace: a crown of glory shall she deliver to thee. 
Hear, O my son, and receive my sayings; and the years of thy life shall be many. 
I have taught thee in the way of wisdom; I have led thee in right paths. 
When thou goest, thy steps shall not be straitened; and when thou runnest, thou shalt not stumble. 
Take fast hold of instruction; let her not go: keep her; for she is thy life. 
Enter not into the path of the wicked, and go not in the way of evil men. 
Avoid it, pass not by it
816,hat thou bring not blood upon thine house, if any man fall from thence. 
Thou shalt not sow thy vineyard with divers seeds: lest the fruit of thy seed which thou hast sown, and the fruit of thy vineyard, be defiled. 
Thou shalt not plow with an ox and an ass together. 
Thou shalt not wear a garment of divers sorts, as of woollen and linen together. 
Thou shalt make thee fringes upon the four quarters of thy vesture, wherewith thou coverest thyself. 
If any man take a wife, and go in unto her, and hate her, 
And give occasions of speech against her, and bring up an evil name upon her, and say, I took this woman, and when I came to her, I found her not a maid: 
Then shall the father of the damsel, and her mother, take and bring forth the tokens of the damsel's virginity unto the elders of the city in the ga
807,iron, tin, and lead, they traded in thy fairs. 
Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were thy merchants: they traded the persons of men and vessels of brass in thy market. 
They of the house of Togarmah traded in thy fairs with horses and horsemen and mules. 
The men of Dedan were thy merchants; many isles were the merchandise of thine hand: they brought thee for a present horns of ivory and ebony. 
Syria was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of the wares of thy making: they occupied in thy fairs with emeralds, purple, and broidered work, and fine linen, and coral, and agate. 
Judah, and the land of Israel, they were thy merchants: they traded in thy market wheat of Minnith, and Pannag, and honey, and oil, and balm. 
Damascus was thy merchant in the multitude of the wares of thy making, for the 
916,nth by courses: a month they were in Lebanon, and two months at home: and Adoniram was over the levy. 
And Solomon had threescore and ten thousand that bare burdens, and fourscore thousand hewers in the mountains; 
Beside the chief of Solomon's officers which were over the work, three thousand and three hundred, which ruled over the people that wrought in the work. 
And the king commanded, and they brought great stones, costly stones, and hewed stones, to lay the foundation of the house. 
And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders did hew them, and the stonesquarers: so they prepared timber and stones to build the house. 
And it came to pass in the four hundred and eightieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the fourth year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Zif, which is the second month, that he began to build the house of the LORD. 
And the house whic
919, slain. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
O Assyrian, the rod of mine anger, and the staff in their hand is mine indignation. 
I will send him against an hypocritical nation, and against the people of my wrath will I give him a charge, to take the spoil, and to take the prey, and to tread them down like the mire of the streets. 
Howbeit he meaneth not so, neither doth his heart think so; but it is in his heart to destroy and cut off nations not a few. 
For he saith, Are not my princes altogether kings? 
Is not Calno as Carchemish? is not Hamath as Arpad? is not Samaria as Damascus? 
As my hand hath found the kingdoms of the idols, and whose graven images did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria; 
Shall I not, as I have done unto Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and her idols? 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, that when the Lord hath performed his wh
743,uperscription? 
They say unto him, Caesar's. Then saith he unto them, Render therefore unto Caesar the things which are Caesar's; and unto God the things that are God's. 
When they had heard these words, they marvelled, and left him, and went their way. 
The same day came to him the Sadducees, which say that there is no resurrection, and asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses said, If a man die, having no children, his brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were with us seven brethren: and the first, when he had married a wife, deceased, and, having no issue, left his wife unto his brother: 
Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the seventh. 
And last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in 
944,udgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Israel his servant, ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones. 
He is the LORD our God; his judgments are in all the earth. 
Be ye mindful always of his covenant; the word which he commanded to a thousand generations; 
Even of the covenant which he made with Abraham, and of his oath unto Isaac; 
And hath confirmed the same to Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant, 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance; 
When ye were but few, even a few, and strangers in it. 
And when they went from nation to nation, and from one kingdom to another people; 
He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved kings for their sakes, 
Saying, Touch not mine anointed, and do my prophets no harm. 
Sing unto the LORD, all the earth; shew forth from day to day his salvation. 
Declare his glory among the heathen; his marvellous works among all nations. 
For gre
676,of the house; 
Then the priest shall command that they take away the stones in which the plague is, and they shall cast them into an unclean place without the city: 
And he shall cause the house to be scraped within round about, and they shall pour out the dust that they scrape off without the city into an unclean place: 
And they shall take other stones, and put them in the place of those stones; and he shall take other morter, and shall plaister the house. 
And if the plague come again, and break out in the house, after that he hath taken away the stones, and after he hath scraped the house, and after it is plaistered; 
Then the priest shall come and look, and, beho
654,m also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe; over Philistia will I triumph. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O God, who hast cast us off? and wilt not thou, O God, go forth with our hosts? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hold not thy peace, O God of my praise; 
For the mouth of the wicked and the mouth of the deceitful are opened against me: they have spoken against me with a lying tongue. 
They compassed me about also
698,eemed. 
Behold, the days come, that I will cut off thine arm, and the arm of thy father's house, that there shall not be an old man in thine house. 
And thou shalt see an enemy in my habitation, in all the wealth which God shall give Israel: and there shall not be an old man in thine house for ever. 
And the man of thine, whom I shall not cut off from mine altar, shall be to consume thine eyes, and to grieve thine heart: and all the increase of thine house shall die in the flower of their age. 
And this shall be a sign unto thee, that shall come upon thy two sons, on Hophni and Phinehas; in one day they shall die both of them. 
And I will raise me up a faithful priest, that shall do accord
922,im on every side, until the LORD put them under the soles of his feet. 
But now the LORD my God hath given me rest on every side, so that there is neither adversary nor evil occurrent. 
And, behold, I purpose to build an house unto the name of the LORD my God, as the LORD spake unto David my father, saying, Thy son, whom I will set upon thy throne in thy room, he shall build an house unto my name. 
Now therefore command thou that they hew me cedar trees out of Lebanon; and my servants shall be with thy servants: and unto thee will I give hire for thy servants according to all that thou shalt appoint: for thou knowest that there is not among us any that can skill to hew timber like unto the Sidonians. 
And it came to pass, when Hiram heard the words of Solomon, that he rejoiced greatly, and said, Blessed be the LORD this day, which hath given unto David a wise son over this great people. 
And Hiram sent to Sol
826,will go three days' journey into the wilderness, and sacrifice to the LORD our God, as he shall command us. 
And Pharaoh said, I will let you go, that ye may sacrifice to the LORD your God in the wilderness; only ye shall not go very far away: intreat for me. 
And Moses said, Behold, I go out from thee, and I will intreat the LORD that the swarms of flies may depart from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people, to morrow: but let not Pharaoh deal deceitfully any more in not letting the people go to sacrifice to the LORD. 
And Moses went out from Pharaoh, and intreated the LORD. 
And the LORD did according to the word of Moses; and he removed the swarms of flies from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people; there remained not one. 
And Pharaoh hardened his heart at this time also, neither would he le
940,had made a covenant before me in the house which is called by my name: 
But ye turned and polluted my name, and caused every man his servant, and every man his handmaid, whom he had set at liberty at their pleasure, to return, and brought them into subjection, to be unto you for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ye have not hearkened unto me, in proclaiming liberty, every one to his brother, and every man to his neighbour: behold, I proclaim a liberty for you, saith the LORD, to the sword, to the pestilence, and to the famine; and I will make you to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And I will give the men that have transgressed my covenant, which have not performed the words of the covenant which they had made before me, when they cut the calf in twain, and passed between the parts thereof, 
The princes of Judah, and the princes of Jerusalem, the eunuchs, and the priests, and all the pe
828,hen the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh answered, and said unto the heads of the thousands of Israel, 
The LORD God of gods, the LORD God of gods, he knoweth, and Israel he shall know; if it be in rebellion, or if in transgression against the LORD, (save us not this day,) 
That we have built us an altar to turn from following the LORD, or if to offer thereon burnt offering or meat offering, or if to offer peace offerings thereon, let the LORD himself require it; 
And if we have not rather done it for fear of this thing, saying, In time to come your children might speak unto our children, saying, What have ye to do with the LORD God of Israel? 
For the LORD hath made Jordan a border between us and you, ye children of Reuben and children of Gad; ye have no part in the LORD: so 
910, of thee; for thou art a stiffnecked people: lest I consume thee in the way. 
And when the people heard these evil tidings, they mourned: and no man did put on him his ornaments. 
For the LORD had said unto Moses, Say unto the children of Israel, Ye are a stiffnecked people: I will come up into the midst of thee in a moment, and consume thee: therefore now put off thy ornaments from thee, that I may know what to do unto thee. 
And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments by the mount Horeb. 
And Moses took the tabernacle, and pitched it without the camp, afar off from the camp, and called it the Tabernacle of the congregation. And it came to pass, that every one which sought the LORD went out unto the tabernacle of the congregation, which was without the camp. 
And it came to pass, when Moses went out unto the tabernacle, that all the people rose up, and stood every man at his
777, unto me: hear, and your soul shall live; and I will make an everlasting covenant with you, even the sure mercies of David. 
Behold, I have given him for a witness to the people, a leader and commander to the people. 
Behold, thou shalt call a nation that thou knowest not, and nations that knew not thee shall run unto thee because of the LORD thy God, and for the Holy One of Israel; for he hath glorified thee. 
Seek ye the LORD while he may be found, call ye upon him while he is near: 
Let the wicked forsake his way, and the unrighteous man his thoughts: and let him return unto the LORD, and he will have mercy upon him; and to our God, for he will abundantly pardon. 
For my thoughts are not your thoughts, neither are your ways my ways, saith the LORD. 
For as the hea
757,d. 
And the days that David reigned over Israel were forty years: seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem. 
Then sat Solomon upon the throne of David his father; and his kingdom was established greatly. 
And Adonijah the son of Haggith came to Bathsheba the mother of Solomon. And she said, Comest thou peaceably? And he said, Peaceably. 
He said moreover, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And she said, Say on. 
And he said, Thou knowest that the kingdom was mine, and that all Israel set their faces on me, that I should reign: howbeit the kingdom is turned about, and is become my brother's: for it was his from the LORD. 
And now I ask one petition of thee, deny me not. And she said unto him, Say on. 
And 
890,s, but that ye break my covenant: 
I also will do this unto you; I will even appoint over you terror, consumption, and the burning ague, that shall consume the eyes, and cause sorrow of heart: and ye shall sow your seed in vain, for your enemies shall eat it. 
And I will set my face against you, and ye shall be slain before your enemies: they that hate you shall reign over you; and ye shall flee when none pursueth you. 
And if ye will not yet for all this hearken unto me, then I will punish you seven times more for your sins. 
And I will break the pride of your power; and I will make your heaven as iron, and your earth as brass: 
And your strength shall be spent in vain: for your land shall not yield her increase, neither shall the trees of the land yield their fruits. 
And if ye walk contrary unto me, and will not hearken unto me; I will bring seven times more plagues upon you
699,, and covenanted to give him money. 
And he promised, and sought opportunity to betray him unto them in the absence of the multitude. 
Then came the day of unleavened bread, when the passover must be killed. 
And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the passover, that we may eat. 
And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare? 
And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city, there shall a man meet you, bearing a pitcher of water; follow him into the house where he entereth in. 
And ye shall say unto the goodman of the house, The Master saith unto thee, Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples? 
And he shall shew you
942,dst terrible things which we looked not for, thou camest down, the mountains flowed down at thy presence. 
For since the beginning of the world men have not heard, nor perceived by the ear, neither hath the eye seen, O God, beside thee, what he hath prepared for him that waiteth for him. 
Thou meetest him that rejoiceth and worketh righteousness, those that remember thee in thy ways: behold, thou art wroth; for we have sinned: in those is continuance, and we shall be saved. 
But we are all as an unclean thing, and all our righteousnesses are as filthy rags; and we all do fade as a leaf; and our iniquities, like the wind, have taken us away. 
And there is none that calleth upon thy name, that stirreth up himself to take hold of thee: for thou hast hid thy face from us, and hast consumed us, because of our iniquities. 
But now, O LORD, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou our potter; and we all are the work of thy hand. 
737,e the king and the princes, saith the LORD. 
But it shall come to pass in the latter days, that I will bring again the captivity of Elam, saith the LORD. 
The word that the LORD spake against Babylon and against the land of the Chaldeans by Jeremiah the prophet. 
Declare ye among the nations, and publish, and set up a standard; publish, and conceal not: say, Babylon is taken, Bel is confounded, Merodach is broken in pieces; her idols are confounded, her images are broken in pieces. 
For out of the north there cometh up a nation against her, which shall make her land desolate, and none shall dwell therein: they shall remove, they shall depart, both man and beast. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the children of 
900,nth old and upward, were twenty and two thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Number all the firstborn of the males of the children of Israel from a month old and upward, and take the number of their names. 
And thou shalt take the Levites for me (I am the LORD) instead of all the firstborn among the children of Israel; and the cattle of the Levites instead of all the firstlings among the cattle of the children of Israel. 
And Moses numbered, as the LORD commanded him, all the firstborn among the children of Israel. 
And all the firstborn males by the number of names, from a month old and upward, of those that were numbered of them, were twenty and two thousand two hundred and threescore and thirteen. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the Levites instead of all the firstborn among the children of Israel, and the cattle of the Levites instead of their cattle; and the Levite
941, fear me, thou wilt receive instruction; so their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them: but they rose early, and corrupted all their doings. 
Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I rise up to the prey: for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to the people a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent. 
From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of my dispersed, shall bring mine offering. 
In that day shalt thou not be ashamed for all thy doings, wherein thou hast transgressed against me: for then I will take away out of the midst of thee them that rejoice in thy pride, and thou shalt no more be haughty because of my holy
917, given you. 
And, behold, this day I am going the way of all the earth: and ye know in all your hearts and in all your souls, that not one thing hath failed of all the good things which the LORD your God spake concerning you; all are come to pass unto you, and not one thing hath failed thereof. 
Therefore it shall come to pass, that as all good things are come upon you, which the LORD your God promised you; so shall the LORD bring upon you all evil things, until he have destroyed you from off this good land which the LORD your God hath given you. 
When ye have transgressed the covenant of the LORD your God, which he commanded you, and have gone and served other gods, and bowed yourselves to them; then shall the anger of the LORD be kindled against you, and ye shall perish quickly from off the good land which he hath given unto you. 
And Joshua gathered all the tribes of Israel to Shechem, and called for 
805,h sat either of them on his throne, clothed in their robes, and they sat in a void place at the entering in of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied before them. 
And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah had made him horns of iron, and said, Thus saith the LORD, With these thou shalt push Syria until they be consumed. 
And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him, saying, Behold, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one assent; let thy word therefore, I pray thee, be like one of their's, and speak thou good. 
And Micaiah said, As the LORD liveth, even what my God saith, that will I speak. 
And when he was come to the kin
827,are come unto the mountain of the Amorites, which the LORD our God doth give unto us. 
Behold, the LORD thy God hath set the land before thee: go up and possess it, as the LORD God of thy fathers hath said unto thee; fear not, neither be discouraged. 
And ye came near unto me every one of you, and said, We will send men before us, and they shall search us out the land, and bring us word again by what way we must go up, and into what cities we shall come. 
And the saying pleased me well: and I took twelve men of you, one of a tribe: 
And they turned and went up into the mountain, and came unto the valley of Eshcol, and searched it out. 
And they took of the fruit of the land in their hands, and brought it down unto us, and brought us word again, and said, It is a good land which the LORD our God doth give us. 
Notwit
934, he come near, are ready to kill him. 
And when Paul's sister's son heard of their lying in wait, he went and entered into the castle, and told Paul. 
Then Paul called one of the centurions unto him, and said, Bring this young man unto the chief captain: for he hath a certain thing to tell him. 
So he took him, and brought him to the chief captain, and said, Paul the prisoner called me unto him, and prayed me to bring this young man unto thee, who hath something to say unto thee. 
Then the chief captain took him by the hand, and went with him aside privately, and asked him, What is that thou hast to tell me? 
And he said, The Jews have agreed to desire thee that thou wouldest bring down Paul to morrow into the council, as though they would enquire somewhat of him more perfectly. 
But do not thou yield unto them: for there lie in wait for him of them more than forty men, which have bound themselves with an oath, that they
836,, is sin. 
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of every one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to and fro of them that seek death. 
The robbery of the wicked shall destroy them; because they refuse to do judgment. 
The way of man is froward and strange: but as for the pure, his work is right. 
It is better to dwell in a corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman in a wide house. 
The soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no favour in his eyes. 
When the scorner is punished, the simple is made wise: and when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he
866, the coast which belongeth to Judah, and upon the south of Caleb; and we burned Ziklag with fire. 
And David said to him, Canst thou bring me down to this company? And he said, Swear unto me by God, that thou wilt neither kill me, nor deliver me into the hands of my master, and I will bring thee down to this company. 
And when he had brought him down, behold, they were spread abroad upon all the earth, eating and drinking, and dancing, because of all the great spoil that they had taken out of the land of the Philistines, and out of the land of Judah. 
And David smote them from the twilight even unto the evening of the next day: and there escaped not a man of them, save four hundred young men, which rode upon camels, and fled. 
And David recovered all that the Amalekites had carried away: and David rescued his two wives. 
And there was nothing lacking to 
754,f you shall pine away in their iniquity in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away with them. 
If they shall confess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their fathers, with their trespass which they trespassed against me, and that also they have walked contrary unto me; 
And that I also have walked contrary unto them, and have brought them into the land of their enemies; if then their uncircumcised hearts be humbled, and they then accept of the punishment of their iniquity: 
Then will I remember my covenant with Jacob, and also my covenant with Isaac, and also my covenant with Abraham will I remember; and I will remember the land. 
The land also shall be left of them, and shall enjoy her sabbaths, w
839,from them that have few ye shall give few: every one shall give of his cities unto the Levites according to his inheritance which he inheriteth. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye be come over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall appoint you cities to be cities of refuge for you; that the slayer may flee thither, which killeth any person at unawares. 
And they shall be unto you cities for refuge from the avenger; that the manslayer die not, until he stand before the congregation in judgment. 
And of these cities which ye shall give six cities shall ye have for refuge. 
Ye shall give three cities on this side Jordan, and three cities shall ye give in the land of Canaan, which shall be cities of refuge. 
These six cities shall be a refuge, both for the 
894, shall not live; they are deceased, they shall not rise: therefore hast thou visited and destroyed them, and made all their memory to perish. 
Thou hast increased the nation, O LORD, thou hast increased the nation: thou art glorified: thou hadst removed it far unto all the ends of the earth. 
LORD, in trouble have they visited thee, they poured out a prayer when thy chastening was upon them. 
Like as a woman with child, that draweth near the time of her delivery, is in pain, and crieth out in her pangs; so have we been in thy sight, O LORD. 
We have been with child, we have been in pain, we have as it were brought forth wind; we have not wrought any deliverance in the earth; neither have the inhabitants of the world fallen. 
Thy dead men shall live, together with my dead body shall they arise. Awake and sing, ye that dwell in dust: for thy dew is as the dew of herbs, and the earth 
816,gave up their cattle also to the hail, and their flocks to hot thunderbolts. 
He cast upon them the fierceness of his anger, wrath, and indignation, and trouble, by sending evil angels among them. 
He made a way to his anger; he spared not their soul from death, but gave their life over to the pestilence; 
And smote all the firstborn in Egypt; the chief of their strength in the tabernacles of Ham: 
But made his own people to go forth like sheep, and guided them in the wilderness like a flock. 
And he led them on safely, so that they feared not: but the sea overwhelmed their enemies. 
And he brought them to the border of his sanctuary, even to this mountain, which his right hand had purchased. 
He cast out the heathen also before them, and divided them an inheritance by line, and made the tribes of Israel 
921,whoring after them, I will even set my face against that soul, and will cut him off from among his people. 
Sanctify yourselves therefore, and be ye holy: for I am the LORD your God. 
And ye shall keep my statutes, and do them: I am the LORD which sanctify you. 
For every one that curseth his father or his mother shall be surely put to death: he hath cursed his father or his mother; his blood shall be upon him. 
And the man that committeth adultery with another man's wife, even he that committeth adultery with his neighbour's wife, the adulterer and the adulteress shall surely be put to death. 
And the man that lieth with his father's wife hath uncovered his father's nakedness: both of them shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them. 
And if a man lie with his daughter in law, both of them shall surely be put to death: they have wrought confusion; their blood shall be upon them. 
If a man a
960,ed nothing but what Hegai the king's chamberlain, the keeper of the women, appointed. And Esther obtained favour in the sight of all them that looked upon her. 
So Esther was taken unto king Ahasuerus into his house royal in the tenth month, which is the month Tebeth, in the seventh year of his reign. 
And the king loved Esther above all the women, and she obtained grace and favour in his sight more than all the virgins; so that he set the royal crown upon her head, and made her queen instead of Vashti. 
Then the king made a great feast unto all his princes and his servants, even Esther's feast; and he made a release to the provinces, and gave gifts, according to the state of the king. 
And when the virgins were gathered together the second time, then Mordecai sat in the king's gate. 
Esther had not yet shewed her kindred nor her people; as Mordecai had charged her: for Esther did the commandment of Mordecai, like as when she was brought up with 
756,r. 
And thou, Solomon my son, know thou the God of thy father, and serve him with a perfect heart and with a willing mind: for the LORD searcheth all hearts, and understandeth all the imaginations of the thoughts: if thou seek him, he will be found of thee; but if thou forsake him, he will cast thee off for ever. 
Take heed now; for the LORD hath chosen thee to build an house for the sanctuary: be strong, and do it. 
Then David gave to Solomon his son the pattern of the porch, and of the houses thereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper chambers thereof, and of the inner parlours thereof, and of the place of the mercy seat, 
And the pattern of all that he had by the spirit, of the courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the cham
919,k Kidron. 
Then they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the second month: and the priests and the Levites were ashamed, and sanctified themselves, and brought in the burnt offerings into the house of the LORD. 
And they stood in their place after their manner, according to the law of Moses the man of God: the priests sprinkled the blood, which they received of the hand of the Levites. 
For there were many in the congregation that were not sanctified: therefore the Levites had the charge of the killing of the passovers for every one that was not clean, to sanctify them unto the LORD. 
For a multitude of the people, even many of Ephraim, and Manasseh, Issachar, and Zebulun, had not cleansed themselves, yet did they eat the passover otherwise than it was written. But Hezekiah prayed for them, saying, The good LORD pardon every one 
That prepareth his heart to seek God, the LORD God of his fathers, t
681, herself. 
Neither left she her whoredoms brought from Egypt: for in her youth they lay with her, and they bruised the breasts of her virginity, and poured their whoredom upon her. 
Wherefore I have delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into the hand of the Assyrians, upon whom she doted. 
These discovered her nakedness: they took her sons and her daughters, and slew her with the sword: and she became famous among women; for they had executed judgment upon her. 
And when her sister Aholibah saw this, she was more corrupt in her inordinate love than she, and in her whoredoms more than her sister in her whoredoms. 
She doted upon the Assyrians her neighbours, captains a
856,hall not hearken unto you, that I may lay my hand upon Egypt, and bring forth mine armies, and my people the children of Israel, out of the land of Egypt by great judgments. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I stretch forth mine hand upon Egypt, and bring out the children of Israel from among them. 
And Moses and Aaron did as the LORD commanded them, so did they. 
And Moses was fourscore years old, and Aaron fourscore and three years old, when they spake unto Pharaoh. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When Pharaoh shall speak unto you, saying, Shew a miracle for you: then thou shalt say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and cast it before Pharaoh, and it shall become a serpent. 
And Moses and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the LORD had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and 
758, shall overflow and pass over. 
He shall enter also into the glorious land, and many countries shall be overthrown: but these shall escape out of his hand, even Edom, and Moab, and the chief of the children of Ammon. 
He shall stretch forth his hand also upon the countries: and the land of Egypt shall not escape. 
But he shall have power over the treasures of gold and of silver, and over all the precious things of Egypt: and the Libyans and the Ethiopians shall be at his steps. 
But tidings out of the east and out of the north shall trouble him: therefore he shall go forth with great fury to destroy, and utterly to make away many. 
And he shall plant the tabernacles of his palace between the seas in the glorious holy mountain; yet he shall come to 
836,multitude, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year, in the twelfth month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, take up a lamentation for Pharaoh king of Egypt, and say unto him, Thou art like a young lion of the nations, and thou art as a whale in the seas: and thou camest forth with thy rivers, and troubledst the waters with thy feet, and fouledst their rivers. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will therefore spread out my net over thee with a company of many people; and they shall bring thee up in my net. 
Then will I leave thee upon the land, I will cast thee forth upon the open field, and will cause all the fowls of the heaven to remain upon thee, and I will fill the beasts of the whole earth with thee. 
And I will lay thy flesh upon the mountains, and
943,, whereto might the strength of their hands profit me, in whom old age was perished? 
For want and famine they were solitary; fleeing into the wilderness in former time desolate and waste. 
Who cut up mallows by the bushes, and juniper roots for their meat. 
They were driven forth from among men, (they cried after them as after a thief;) 
To dwell in the cliffs of the valleys, in caves of the earth, and in the rocks. 
Among the bushes they brayed; under the nettles they were gathered together. 
They were children of fools, yea, children of base men: they were viler than the earth. 
And now am I their song, yea, I am their byword. 
They abhor me, they flee far from me, and spare not to spit in my face. 
Because he hath loosed my cord, and afflicted me, they have also let loose the bridle before me. 
Upon my right hand rise the youth; they push away my feet, and they raise up against me the ways of their destruction. 
They mar my p
930,ht up Israel out of the land of Egypt? and the Philistines from Caphtor, and the Syrians from Kir? 
Behold, the eyes of the Lord GOD are upon the sinful kingdom, and I will destroy it from off the face of the earth; saving that I will not utterly destroy the house of Jacob, saith the LORD. 
For, lo, I will command, and I will sift the house of Israel among all nations, like as corn is sifted in a sieve, yet shall not the least grain fall upon the earth. 
All the sinners of my people shall die by the sword, which say, The evil shall not overtake nor prevent us. 
In that day will I raise up the tabernacle of David that is fallen, and close up the breaches thereof; and I will raise up his ruins, and I will build it as in the days of old: 
That they may possess the remnant of Edom, and of all the heathen, which are called by my name, saith the LORD that doeth this. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that the plowman
695,s which must shortly be done. 
Behold, I come quickly: blessed is he that keepeth the sayings of the prophecy of this book. 
And I John saw these things, and heard them. And when I had heard and seen, I fell down to worship before the feet of the angel which shewed me these things. 
Then saith he unto me, See thou do it not: for I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren the prophets, and of them which keep the sayings of this book: worship God. 
And he saith unto me, Seal not the sayings of the prophecy of this book: for the time is at hand. 
He that is unjust, let him be unjust still: and he which is filthy, let him be filthy still: and he that is righteous, let him be righteous stil
746,of God had commanded. 
And these are the sons of Aaron; Eleazar his son, Phinehas his son, Abishua his son, 
Bukki his son, Uzzi his son, Zerahiah his son, 
Meraioth his son, Amariah his son, Ahitub his son, 
Zadok his son, Ahimaaz his son. 
Now these are their dwelling places throughout their castles in their coasts, of the sons of Aaron, of the families of the Kohathites: for theirs was the lot. 
And they gave them Hebron in the land of Judah, and the suburbs thereof round about it. 
But the fields of the city, and the villages thereof, they gave to Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
And to the sons of Aaron they gave the cities of Judah, namely, Hebron, the city of refuge, and Libnah with her suburbs, and Jattir, and Eshtemoa, with their s
875, and made them white in the blood of the Lamb. 
Therefore are they before the throne of God, and serve him day and night in his temple: and he that sitteth on the throne shall dwell among them. 
They shall hunger no more, neither thirst any more; neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. 
For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them, and shall lead them unto living fountains of waters: and God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes. 
And when he had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour. 
And I saw the seven angels which stood before God; and to them were given seven trumpets. 
And another angel came and stood at the altar, having a golden censer; and there was given unto him much incense, that he should offer it with the prayers of all saints upon the golden altar which was before the
671, poor the gospel is preached. 
And blessed is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me. 
And when the messengers of John were departed, he began to speak unto the people concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness for to see? A reed shaken with the wind? 
But what went ye out for to see? A man clothed in soft raiment? Behold, they which are gorgeously apparelled, and live delicately, are in kings' courts. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? Yea, I say unto you, and much more than a prophet. 
This is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
For I say unto you, Among those 
942, will utterly destroy them, and make them an astonishment, and an hissing, and perpetual desolations. 
Moreover I will take from them the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the sound of the millstones, and the light of the candle. 
And this whole land shall be a desolation, and an astonishment; and these nations shall serve the king of Babylon seventy years. 
And it shall come to pass, when seventy years are accomplished, that I will punish the king of Babylon, and that nation, saith the LORD, for their iniquity, and the land of the Chaldeans, and will make it perpetual desolations. 
And I will bring upon that land all my words which I have pronounced against it, even all that is written in this book, which Jeremiah hath prophesied against all the nations. 
For many nations and great kings shall serve themselves of them also: and I will recompense them according to
923,s against it: 
Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom delivered the city; yet no man remembered that same poor man. 
Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the poor man's wisdom is despised, and his words are not heard. 
The words of wise men are heard in quiet more than the cry of him that ruleth among fools. 
Wisdom is better than weapons of war: but one sinner destroyeth much good. 
Dead flies cause the ointment of the apothecary to send forth a stinking savour: so doth a little folly him that is in reputation for wisdom and honour. 
A wise man's heart is at his right hand; but a fool's heart at his left. 
Yea also, when he that is a fool walketh by the way, his wisdom faileth him, and he saith to every one that he is a fool. 
If the spirit of the ruler rise up against thee, leave not thy place; for yielding pacifieth great offences. 
There is an evil which I have
946, to any of his words. 
Give heed to me, O LORD, and hearken to the voice of them that contend with me. 
Shall evil be recompensed for good? for they have digged a pit for my soul. Remember that I stood before thee to speak good for them, and to turn away thy wrath from them. 
Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out their blood by the force of the sword; and let their wives be bereaved of their children, and be widows; and let their men be put to death; let their young men be slain by the sword in battle. 
Let a cry be heard from their houses, when thou shalt bring a troop suddenly upon them: for they have digged a pit to take me, and hid snares for my feet. 
Yet, LORD, thou knowest all their counsel against me to slay me: forgive not their iniquity, neither blot out their sin from thy sight, but let them be overthrown before thee; deal thus with them in the time of thine anger. 
Thus saith the LORD, Go and ge
707,hem the Arabian, and the rest of our enemies, heard that I had builded the wall, and that there was no breach left therein; (though at that time I had not set up the doors upon the gates;) 
That Sanballat and Geshem sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of the villages in the plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief. 
And I sent messengers unto them, saying, I am doing a great work, so that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave it, and come down to you? 
Yet they sent unto me four times after this sort; and I answered them after the same manner. 
Then sent Sanballat his servant unto me in like manner the fifth time with an open letter in his ha
815,eside the king. 
Now the king sat in the winterhouse in the ninth month: and there was a fire on the hearth burning before him. 
And it came to pass, that when Jehudi had read three or four leaves, he cut it with the penknife, and cast it into the fire that was on the hearth, until all the roll was consumed in the fire that was on the hearth. 
Yet they were not afraid, nor rent their garments, neither the king, nor any of his servants that heard all these words. 
Nevertheless Elnathan and Delaiah and Gemariah had made intercession to the king that he would not burn the roll: but he would not hear them. 
But the king commanded Jerahmeel the son of Hammelech, and Seraiah the son of Azriel, and Shelemiah the son of Abdeel, to take Baruch the scribe and Jeremiah the prophet: but the LORD hid them. 
Then the 
729,tell I you by what authority I do these things. 
But what think ye? A certain man had two sons; and he came to the first, and said, Son, go work to day in my vineyard. 
He answered and said, I will not: but afterward he repented, and went. 
And he came to the second, and said likewise. And he answered and said, I go, sir: and went not. 
Whether of them twain did the will of his father? They say unto him, The first. Jesus saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That the publicans and the harlots go into the kingdom of God before you. 
For John came unto you in the way of righteousness, and ye believed him not: but the publicans and the harlots believed him: and ye, when ye had seen it, repented not afterward, that ye mig
857,lite. 
And David was greatly distressed; for the people spake of stoning him, because the soul of all the people was grieved, every man for his sons and for his daughters: but David encouraged himself in the LORD his God. 
And David said to Abiathar the priest, Ahimelech's son, I pray thee, bring me hither the ephod. And Abiathar brought thither the ephod to David. 
And David enquired at the LORD, saying, Shall I pursue after this troop? shall I overtake them? And he answered him, Pursue: for thou shalt surely overtake them, and without fail recover all. 
So David went, he and the six hundred men that were with him, and came to the brook Besor, where those that were left behind stayed. 
But David pursued, he and four hundred men: for two hundred abode behind, which were so faint that they could not go over the brook Besor. 
And they found an Egy
717,but the night shineth as the day: the darkness and the light are both alike to thee. 
For thou hast possessed my reins: thou hast covered me in my mother's womb. 
I will praise thee; for I am fearfully and wonderfully made: marvellous are thy works; and that my soul knoweth right well. 
My substance was not hid from thee, when I was made in secret, and curiously wrought in the lowest parts of the earth. 
Thine eyes did see my substance, yet being unperfect; and in thy book all my members were written, which in continuance were fashioned, when as yet there was none of them. 
How precious also are thy thoughts unto me, O God! how great is the sum of them! 
If I should count them, they are more in number than t
870,re doeth the LORD our God all these things unto us? then shalt thou answer them, Like as ye have forsaken me, and served strange gods in your land, so shall ye serve strangers in a land that is not your's. 
Declare this in the house of Jacob, and publish it in Judah, saying, 
Hear now this, O foolish people, and without understanding; which have eyes, and see not; which have ears, and hear not: 
Fear ye not me? saith the LORD: will ye not tremble at my presence, which have placed the sand for the bound of the sea by a perpetual decree, that it cannot pass it: and though the waves thereof toss themselves, yet can they not prevail; though they roar, yet can they not pass over it? 
But this people hath a revolting and a rebellious heart; they are revolted and gone. 
Neither say they in their heart, Let us now fear the LORD our God, that giveth rain, both the fo
824,rs, and took old sacks upon their asses, and wine bottles, old, and rent, and bound up; 
And old shoes and clouted upon their feet, and old garments upon them; and all the bread of their provision was dry and mouldy. 
And they went to Joshua unto the camp at Gilgal, and said unto him, and to the men of Israel, We be come from a far country: now therefore make ye a league with us. 
And the men of Israel said unto the Hivites, Peradventure ye dwell among us; and how shall we make a league with you? 
And they said unto Joshua, We are thy servants. And Joshua said unto them, Who are ye? and from whence come ye? 
And they said unto him, From a very far country thy servants are come because of the name of the LORD thy God: for we have heard the fame of him, and all that he did in Egypt, 
And all that he did to the two 
694,nour in abundance. 
And his heart was lifted up in the ways of the LORD: moreover he took away the high places and groves out of Judah. 
Also in the third year of his reign he sent to his princes, even to Benhail, and to Obadiah, and to Zechariah, and to Nethaneel, and to Michaiah, to teach in the cities of Judah. 
And with them he sent Levites, even Shemaiah, and Nethaniah, and Zebadiah, and Asahel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehonathan, and Adonijah, and Tobijah, and Tobadonijah, Levites; and with them Elishama and Jehoram, priests. 
And they taught in Judah, and had the book of the law of the LORD with them, and went about throughout all the cities of Judah, and taught the people. 
And th
642,een unto this day. 
And king Solomon gave unto the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which Solomon gave her of his royal bounty. So she turned and went to her own country, she and her servants. 
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred threescore and six talents of gold, 
Beside that he had of the merchantmen, and of the traffick of the spice merchants, and of all the kings of Arabia, and of the governors of the country. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of gold went to one target. 
And he made three hundred shields of beaten gol
920,a great spoil divided; the lame take the prey. 
And the inhabitant shall not say, I am sick: the people that dwell therein shall be forgiven their iniquity. 
Come near, ye nations, to hear; and hearken, ye people: let the earth hear, and all that is therein; the world, and all things that come forth of it. 
For the indignation of the LORD is upon all nations, and his fury upon all their armies: he hath utterly destroyed them, he hath delivered them to the slaughter. 
Their slain also shall be cast out, and their stink shall come up out of their carcases, and the mountains shall be melted with their blood. 
And all the host of heaven shall be dissolved, and the heavens shall be rolled together as a scroll: and all their host shall fall down, as the leaf falleth off from the vine, and as a falling fig from the fig tree. 
For my sword shall be bathed in heaven: behold, it shall come down upon Idumea, and upon 
782,nd answered them, saying, Which of you shall have an ass or an ox fallen into a pit, and will not straightway pull him out on the sabbath day? 
And they could not answer him again to these things. 
And he put forth a parable to those which were bidden, when he marked how they chose out the chief rooms; saying unto them. 
When thou art bidden of any man to a wedding, sit not down in the highest room; lest a more honourable man than thou be bidden of him; 
And he that bade thee and him come and say to thee, Give this man place; and thou begin with shame to take the lowest room. 
But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest room; that when he that bade thee cometh, he may say unto thee, Friend, go up higher: then shalt thou have worship in the presence of them tha
734, midst thereof. 
For there they that carried us away captive required of us a song; and they that wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion. 
How shall we sing the LORD's song in a strange land? 
If I forget thee, O Jerusalem, let my right hand forget her cunning. 
If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave to the roof of my mouth; if I prefer not Jerusalem above my chief joy. 
Remember, O LORD, the children of Edom in the day of Jerusalem; who said, Rase it, rase it, even to the foundation thereof. 
O daughter of Babylon, who art to be destroyed; happy shall he be, that rewardeth thee as thou hast served us. 
Happy shall he be, that taketh and dasheth thy little ones against the stones. 

867,ter belongeth unto thee: we also will be with thee: be of good courage, and do it. 
Then arose Ezra, and made the chief priests, the Levites, and all Israel, to swear that they should do according to this word. And they sware. 
Then Ezra rose up from before the house of God, and went into the chamber of Johanan the son of Eliashib: and when he came thither, he did eat no bread, nor drink water: for he mourned because of the transgression of them that had been carried away. 
And they made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem unto all the children of the captivity, that they should gather themselves together unto Jerusalem; 
And that whosoever would not come within three days, according to the counsel of the princes and the elders, all his substance should be forfeited, and himself separated from the congregation of those that had been carried away. 
885,guiled Eve through his subtilty, so your minds should be corrupted from the simplicity that is in Christ. 
For if he that cometh preacheth another Jesus, whom we have not preached, or if ye receive another spirit, which ye have not received, or another gospel, which ye have not accepted, ye might well bear with him. 
For I suppose I was not a whit behind the very chiefest apostles. 
But though I be rude in speech, yet not in knowledge; but we have been throughly made manifest among you in all things. 
Have I committed an offence in abasing myself that ye might be exalted, because I have preached to you the gospel of God freely? 
I robbed other churches, taking wages of them, to do you service. 
And when I was present with you, and wanted, I was chargeable to no man: for that which was lacking to me the brethren which came from Macedonia supplied: and in all things I have k
841,at thou puttest thine hands unto. 
Take heed to thyself that thou forsake not the Levite as long as thou livest upon the earth. 
When the LORD thy God shall enlarge thy border, as he hath promised thee, and thou shalt say, I will eat flesh, because thy soul longeth to eat flesh; thou mayest eat flesh, whatsoever thy soul lusteth after. 
If the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to put his name there be too far from thee, then thou shalt kill of thy herd and of thy flock, which the LORD hath given thee, as I have commanded thee, and thou shalt eat in thy gates whatsoever thy soul lusteth after. 
Even as the roebuck and the hart is eaten, so thou shalt eat them: the unclean and the clean shall eat of them alike. 
Only be sure that thou eat not the blood: for the blood is the life; and thou mayest not eat the life with the fle
655,oward mouth, and perverse lips put far from thee. 
Let thine eyes look right on, and let thine eyelids look straight before thee. 
Ponder the path of thy feet, and let all thy ways be established. 
Turn not to the right hand nor to the left: remove thy foot from evil. 
My son, attend unto my wisdom, and bow thine ear to my understanding: 
That thou mayest regard discretion, and that thy lips may keep knowledge. 
For the lips of a strange woman drop as an honeycomb, and her mouth is smoother than oil: 
But her end is bitter as wormwood, sharp as a two-edged sword. 
Her feet go down to death; her steps take hold on hell. 
Lest thou shouldest ponder 
904,reat signs shall there be from heaven. 
But before all these, they shall lay their hands on you, and persecute you, delivering you up to the synagogues, and into prisons, being brought before kings and rulers for my name's sake. 
And it shall turn to you for a testimony. 
Settle it therefore in your hearts, not to meditate before what ye shall answer: 
For I will give you a mouth and wisdom, which all your adversaries shall not be able to gainsay nor resist. 
And ye shall be betrayed both by parents, and brethren, and kinsfolks, and friends; and some of you shall they cause to be put to death. 
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake. 
But there shall not an hair of your head perish. 
In your patience possess ye your souls. 
And when ye shall see Jerusalem compassed with armies, then know that the desolation thereof is nigh. 
Then let them which are in Judaea flee to the mountain
866,the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven. 
Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah? 
And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base. 
And I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came four chariots out from between two mountains; and the mountains were mountains of brass. 
In the first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot black horses; 
And in the third chariot white horses; and in the fourth chariot grisled and bay horses. 
Then I answered and said unto the angel that talked with me, What are these, my lord? 
And the angel answered and said unto me, These are the four spirits of the heavens, which go forth
657, me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will give you rest. 
Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I am meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest unto your souls. 
For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. 
At that time Jesus went on the sabbath day through the corn; and his disciples were an hungred, and began to pluck the ears of corn and to eat. 
But when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy disciples do that which is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day. 
But he said unto them, Have ye not read what David did, when he was an hungred, and they that were with him; 
How he entered into the house of God, a
842,aron have, one as much as another. 
And this is the law of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he shall offer unto the LORD. 
If he offer it for a thanksgiving, then he shall offer with the sacrifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and unleavened wafers anointed with oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of fine flour, fried. 
Besides the cakes, he shall offer for his offering leavened bread with the sacrifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an heave offering unto the LORD, and it shall be the priest's that sprinkleth the blood of the peace offerings. 
And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten the same day that it is offered; he shall not leave any of it until the morning. 
But if the sacrifice of his o
641, the Zareathites, and the Eshtaulites, 
The sons of Salma; Bethlehem, and the Netophathites, Ataroth, the house of Joab, and half of the Manahethites, the Zorites. 
And the families of the scribes which dwelt at Jabez; the Tirathites, the Shimeathites, and Suchathites. These are the Kenites that came of Hemath, the father of the house of Rechab. 
Now these were the sons of David, which were born unto him in Hebron; the firstborn Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; the second Daniel, of Abigail the Carmelitess: 
The third, Absalom the son of Maachah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur: the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith: 
The f
940,ies were ashamed: and all the people rejoiced for all the glorious things that were done by him. 
Then said he, Unto what is the kingdom of God like? and whereunto shall I resemble it? 
It is like a grain of mustard seed, which a man took, and cast into his garden; and it grew, and waxed a great tree; and the fowls of the air lodged in the branches of it. 
And again he said, Whereunto shall I liken the kingdom of God? 
It is like leaven, which a woman took and hid in three measures of meal, till the whole was leavened. 
And he went through the cities and villages, teaching, and journeying toward Jerusalem. 
Then said one unto him, Lord, are there few that be saved? And he said unto them, 
Strive to enter in at the strait gate: for many, I say unto you, will seek to enter in, and shall not be able. 
When once the master of the house is risen up, and hath shut to the door, and ye begin to stand without, and to knock at the door,
895,en. 
And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array before the gate of the city: and the kings that were come were by themselves in the field. 
Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, he chose out of all the choice of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians. 
And the rest of the people he delivered unto the hand of Abishai his brother, and they set themselves in array against the children of Ammon. 
And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou shalt help me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee, then I will help thee. 
Be of good courage, and let us behave ourselves valiantly for our people, and for the cities of our God: and let the LORD do that which is good in his sight. 
So Joab and the people that were with him drew nigh before the Syrians unto the battle; and they fled before him. 
And wh
910, thee. 
And he answered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it. 
Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth. 
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they were filled with water, and were in jeopardy. 
And they came to him, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we perish. Then he arose, and rebuked the wind and the raging of the water: and they ceased, and there was a calm. 
And he said unto them, Where is your faith? And they being afraid wondered, saying one to another, What manner of man is this! for he commandeth even the winds and water, and they obey him. 
And they arrived at the country of the Gadarenes, which is over against Galilee. 
And when he went for
647,thward; and the border descended to Atarothadar, near the hill that lieth on the south side of the nether Bethhoron. 
And the border was drawn thence, and compassed the corner of the sea southward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter. 
And the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the border went out on the west, and went out to the well of waters of Nephtoah: 
And the border came down to the end of the mountain that lieth before the valley of the son of Hinnom, and which is in t
939, 
Now when they shall fall, they shall be holpen with a little help: but many shall cleave to them with flatteries. 
And some of them of understanding shall fall, to try them, and to purge, and to make them white, even to the time of the end: because it is yet for a time appointed. 
And the king shall do according to his will; and he shall exalt himself, and magnify himself above every god, and shall speak marvellous things against the God of gods, and shall prosper till the indignation be accomplished: for that that is determined shall be done. 
Neither shall he regard the God of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all. 
But in his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honour with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things. 
Thus shall he do in the most strong holds with a strange god, whom he shall 
861,y. 
And the children of Benjamin did so, and took them wives, according to their number, of them that danced, whom they caught: and they went and returned unto their inheritance, and repaired the cities, and dwelt in them. 
And the children of Israel departed thence at that time, every man to his tribe and to his family, and they went out from thence every man to his inheritance. 
In those days there was no king in Israel: every man did that which was right in his own eyes. 
Now it came to pass in the days when the judges ruled, that there was a famine in the land. And a certain man of Bethlehemjudah went to sojourn in the country of Moab, he, and his wife, and his two sons. 
And the name of the man was Elimelech, and the name of his wife Naomi, and the name of his two sons Mahlon and Chilion, Ephrathites of Bethlehemjudah. And they came into the co
759,en, to minister before the ark continually, as every day's work required: 
And Obededom with their brethren, threescore and eight; Obededom also the son of Jeduthun and Hosah to be porters: 
And Zadok the priest, and his brethren the priests, before the tabernacle of the LORD in the high place that was at Gibeon, 
To offer burnt offerings unto the LORD upon the altar of the burnt offering continually morning and evening, and to do according to all that is written in the law of the LORD, which he commanded Israel; 
And with them Heman and Jeduthun, and the rest that were chosen, who were expressed by name, to give thanks to the LORD, because his mercy endureth for ever; 
And with them Heman and Jeduthun with trumpets and cymbals for those that should
719,at things sacrificed unto idols. 
And I gave her space to repent of her fornication; and she repented not. 
Behold, I will cast her into a bed, and them that commit adultery with her into great tribulation, except they repent of their deeds. 
And I will kill her children with death; and all the churches shall know that I am he which searcheth the reins and hearts: and I will give unto every one of you according to your works. 
But unto you I say, and unto the rest in Thyatira, as many as have not this doctrine, and which have not known the depths of Satan, as they speak; I will put upon you none other burden. 
But that which ye have already hold fast till I come. 
And he that overcometh, and keepeth my works u
889,h not grieved me, but in part: that I may not overcharge you all. 
Sufficient to such a man is this punishment, which was inflicted of many. 
So that contrariwise ye ought rather to forgive him, and comfort him, lest perhaps such a one should be swallowed up with overmuch sorrow. 
Wherefore I beseech you that ye would confirm your love toward him. 
For to this end also did I write, that I might know the proof of you, whether ye be obedient in all things. 
To whom ye forgive any thing, I forgive also: for if I forgave any thing, to whom I forgave it, for your sakes forgave I it in the person of Christ; 
Lest Satan should get an advantage of us: for we are not ignorant of his devices. 
Furthermore, when I came to Troas to preach Christ's gospel, and a door was opened unto me of the Lord, 
I had no rest in my spirit, because I found not Titus my brother: but taking my leave of th
779,ed against my word at the water of Meribah. 
Take Aaron and Eleazar his son, and bring them up unto mount Hor: 
And strip Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar his son: and Aaron shall be gathered unto his people, and shall die there. 
And Moses did as the LORD commanded: and they went up into mount Hor in the sight of all the congregation. 
And Moses stripped Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar his son; and Aaron died there in the top of the mount: and Moses and Eleazar came down from the mount. 
And when all the congregation saw that Aaron was dead, they mourned for Aaron thirty days, even all the house of Israel. 
And when king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south, heard tell that Israel came by the way of the spies; then he fought ag
731,cover withal, of pure gold. 
And he made the candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work made he the candlestick; his shaft, and his branch, his bowls, his knops, and his flowers, were of the same: 
And six branches going out of the sides thereof; three branches of the candlestick out of the one side thereof, and three branches of the candlestick out of the other side thereof: 
Three bowls made after the fashion of almonds in one branch, a knop and a flower; and three bowls made like almonds in another branch, a knop and a flower: so throughout the six branches going out of the candlestick. 
And in the candlestick were four bowls made like almonds, his knops, and his flowers: 
And a knop under two branches of the same, and a
706,e work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written, God hath given them the spirit of slumber, eyes that they should not see, and ears that they should not hear;) unto this day. 
And David saith, Let their table be made a snare, and a trap, and a stumblingblock, and a recompence unto them: 
Let their eyes be darkened, that they may not see, and bow down their back alway. 
I say then, Have they stumbled that they should fall? God forbid: but rather through their fall salvation is come unto the Gentiles, for to provoke them to jealousy. 
Now if the fall of them be the riche
872,And when he had turned in unto her into the tent, she covered him with a mantle. 
And he said unto her, Give me, I pray thee, a little water to drink; for I am thirsty. And she opened a bottle of milk, and gave him drink, and covered him. 
Again he said unto her, Stand in the door of the tent, and it shall be, when any man doth come and enquire of thee, and say, Is there any man here? that thou shalt say, No. 
Then Jael Heber's wife took a nail of the tent, and took an hammer in her hand, and went softly unto him, and smote the nail into his temples, and fastened it into the ground: for he was fast asleep and weary. So he died. 
And, behold, as Barak pursued Sisera, Jael came out to meet him, and said unto him, Come, and I will shew thee the man whom thou seekest. And when he came into her tent, behold, Sisera lay dead, and the nail was in his temples. 
So God
945, Moses were ended. 
And Joshua the son of Nun was full of the spirit of wisdom; for Moses had laid his hands upon him: and the children of Israel hearkened unto him, and did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And there arose not a prophet since in Israel like unto Moses, whom the LORD knew face to face, 
In all the signs and the wonders, which the LORD sent him to do in the land of Egypt to Pharaoh, and to all his servants, and to all his land, 
And in all that mighty hand, and in all the great terror which Moses shewed in the sight of all Israel. 
Now after the death of Moses the servant of the LORD it came to pass, that the LORD spake unto Joshua the son of Nun, Moses' minister, saying, 
Moses my servant is dead; now therefore arise, go over this Jordan, thou, and all this people, unto the land which I do give to them, even to the children of Israel. 
Every place that the sole of your foot shall tread upon, that have I given unto you,
682,o him, and said, Of what city art thou? And he said, Thy servant is of one of the tribes of Israel. 
And Absalom said unto him, See, thy matters are good and right; but there is no man deputed of the king to hear thee. 
Absalom said moreover, Oh that I were made judge in the land, that every man which hath any suit or cause might come unto me, and I would do him justice! 
And it was so, that when any man came nigh to him to do him obeisance, he put forth his hand, and took him, and kissed him. 
And on this manner did Absalom to all Israel that came to the king for judgment: so Absalom stole the hearts of the men of Israel. 
And it came to pass after forty years, that Absalo
728, perfection. 
Therefore I write these things being absent, lest being present I should use sharpness, according to the power which the Lord hath given me to edification, and not to destruction. 
Finally, brethren, farewell. Be perfect, be of good comfort, be of one mind, live in peace; and the God of love and peace shall be with you. 
Greet one another with an holy kiss. 
All the saints salute you. 
The grace of the Lord Jesus Christ, and the love of God, and the communion of the Holy Ghost, be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead;) 
And all the brethren which are with me, unto the churches of Galatia: 
Grace be to you 
675,ion is for many days. 
And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb. 
And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that stood before me, O my lord, by the vision my sorrows are turned upon me, and I have retained no strength. 
For how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord? for as for me, straightway there remained no strength in me, neither is there breath left in me. 
Then there came again and touched me one like the appearance of a man, and he strengthened me, 
And said, O man greatly beloved, fear not: peace be unto the
880, and Jonathan my son. And Jonathan was taken. 
Then Saul said to Jonathan, Tell me what thou hast done. And Jonathan told him, and said, I did but taste a little honey with the end of the rod that was in mine hand, and, lo, I must die. 
And Saul answered, God do so and more also: for thou shalt surely die, Jonathan. 
And the people said unto Saul, Shall Jonathan die, who hath wrought this great salvation in Israel? God forbid: as the LORD liveth, there shall not one hair of his head fall to the ground; for he hath wrought with God this day. So the people rescued Jonathan, that he died not. 
Then Saul went up from following the Philistines: and the Philistines went to their own place. 
So Saul took the kingdom over Israel, and fought against all his enemies on every side, against Moab, and against the children of Ammon, and against Edom, and against the kings of Zobah,
784,er him only, and I will depart from the city. And the woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee over the wall. 
Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab. And he blew a trumpet, and they retired from the city, every man to his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king. 
Now Joab was over all the host of Israel: and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and over the Pelethites: 
And Adoram was over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder: 
And Sheva was scribe: and Zadok and Abiathar were the priests: 
And Ira also the Jairite was a chief ruler about David. 
Then there was a famine in the days of David three years, year a
718, as the rivers of water: he turneth it whithersoever he will. 
Every way of a man is right in his own eyes: but the LORD pondereth the hearts. 
To do justice and judgment is more acceptable to the LORD than sacrifice. 
An high look, and a proud heart, and the plowing of the wicked, is sin. 
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of every one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to and fro of them that seek death. 
The robbery of the wicked shall destroy them; because they refuse to do judgment. 
The way of man is froward and strange: but as for the pure, his work is right. 
It is better to dwell in a corner of the housetop, than with 
832,th power: who went about doing good, and healing all that were oppressed of the devil; for God was with him. 
And we are witnesses of all things which he did both in the land of the Jews, and in Jerusalem; whom they slew and hanged on a tree: 
Him God raised up the third day, and shewed him openly; 
Not to all the people, but unto witnesses chosen before God, even to us, who did eat and drink with him after he rose from the dead. 
And he commanded us to preach unto the people, and to testify that it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and dead. 
To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins. 
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word. 
And they of the circumcision which believed were
766,veth whomsoever I send receiveth me; and he that receiveth me receiveth him that sent me. 
When Jesus had thus said, he was troubled in spirit, and testified, and said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me. 
Then the disciples looked one on another, doubting of whom he spake. 
Now there was leaning on Jesus' bosom one of his disciples, whom Jesus loved. 
Simon Peter therefore beckoned to him, that he should ask who it should be of whom he spake. 
He then lying on Jesus' breast saith unto him, Lord, who is it? 
Jesus answered, He it is, to whom I shall give a sop, when I have dipped it. And when he had dipped the sop, he gave it to Judas Iscariot, the son of Simon. 
And after the sop Satan entered into him. Then said Jesus unto hi
678,dest thou have delivered up those of his that did remain in the day of distress. 
For the day of the LORD is near upon all the heathen: as thou hast done, it shall be done unto thee: thy reward shall return upon thine own head. 
For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the heathen drink continually, yea, they shall drink, and they shall swallow down, and they shall be as though they had not been. 
But upon mount Zion shall be deliverance, and there shall be holiness; and the house of Jacob shall possess their possessions. 
And the house of Jacob shall be a fire, and the house of Joseph a flame, and the house of Esau for stubble, and they shall kindle in 
860, Now we know that thou hast a devil. Abraham is dead, and the prophets; and thou sayest, If a man keep my saying, he shall never taste of death. 
Art thou greater than our father Abraham, which is dead? and the prophets are dead: whom makest thou thyself? 
Jesus answered, If I honour myself, my honour is nothing: it is my Father that honoureth me; of whom ye say, that he is your God: 
Yet ye have not known him; but I know him: and if I should say, I know him not, I shall be a liar like unto you: but I know him, and keep his saying. 
Your father Abraham rejoiced to see my day: and he saw it, and was glad. 
Then said the Jews unto him, Thou art not yet fifty years old, and hast thou seen Abraham? 
Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Before Abraham was, I am. 
Then took they up stones to cast at him: but Jesus hid himself, and went o
668,, and blessed all the congregation of Israel with a loud voice, saying, 
Blessed be the LORD, that hath given rest unto his people Israel, according to all that he promised: there hath not failed one word of all his good promise, which he promised by the hand of Moses his servant. 
The LORD our God be with us, as he was with our fathers: let him not leave us, nor forsake us: 
That he may incline our hearts unto him, to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and his statutes, and his judgments, which he commanded our fathers. 
And let these my words, wherewith I have made supplication before the LORD, be nigh unto the LORD our God day and night, th
803, against the Jews to destroy them, and had cast Pur, that is, the lot, to consume them, and to destroy them; 
But when Esther came before the king, he commanded by letters that his wicked device, which he devised against the Jews, should return upon his own head, and that he and his sons should be hanged on the gallows. 
Wherefore they called these days Purim after the name of Pur. Therefore for all the words of this letter, and of that which they had seen concerning this matter, and which had come unto them, 
The Jews ordained, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves unto them, so as it should not fail, that they would keep these two days according to their writing, and according to their appointed time every year; 
And that these days should be rememb
945,alom spake unto him, saying, Ahithophel hath spoken after this manner: shall we do after his saying? if not; speak thou. 
And Hushai said unto Absalom, The counsel that Ahithophel hath given is not good at this time. 
For, said Hushai, thou knowest thy father and his men, that they be mighty men, and they be chafed in their minds, as a bear robbed of her whelps in the field: and thy father is a man of war, and will not lodge with the people. 
Behold, he is hid now in some pit, or in some other place: and it will come to pass, when some of them be overthrown at the first, that whosoever heareth it will say, There is a slaughter among the people that follow Absalom. 
And he also that is valiant, whose heart is as the heart of a lion, shall utterly melt: for all Israel knoweth that thy father is a mighty man, and they which be with him are valiant men. 
Therefore I counsel that all Israel be generally gathered unto thee, from Dan even
942,: 
Which was well reported of by the brethren that were at Lystra and Iconium. 
Him would Paul have to go forth with him; and took and circumcised him because of the Jews which were in those quarters: for they knew all that his father was a Greek. 
And as they went through the cities, they delivered them the decrees for to keep, that were ordained of the apostles and elders which were at Jerusalem. 
And so were the churches established in the faith, and increased in number daily. 
Now when they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of Galatia, and were forbidden of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in Asia, 
After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia: but the Spirit suffered them not. 
And they passing by Mysia came down to Troas. 
And a vision appeared to Paul in the night; There stood a man of Macedonia, and prayed him, saying, Come over into Macedonia, and help us. 
And after he had seen the vision, 
750,mighty men, helpers of the war. 
They were armed with bows, and could use both the right hand and the left in hurling stones and shooting arrows out of a bow, even of Saul's brethren of Benjamin. 
The chief was Ahiezer, then Joash, the sons of Shemaah the Gibeathite; and Jeziel, and Pelet, the sons of Azmaveth; and Berachah, and Jehu the Antothite. 
And Ismaiah the Gibeonite, a mighty man among the thirty, and over the thirty; and Jeremiah, and Jahaziel, and Johanan, and Josabad the Gederathite, 
Eluzai, and Jerimoth, and Bealiah, and Shemariah, and Shephatiah the Haruphite, 
Elkanah, and Jesiah, and Azareel, and Joezer, and Jashobeam, the Korhites, 
And Joelah, and Zebadiah, the sons of Jeroham of Gedor. 
And of the Gadites there separated
901,age. 
I will bless the LORD, who hath given me counsel: my reins also instruct me in the night seasons. 
I have set the LORD always before me: because he is at my right hand, I shall not be moved. 
Therefore my heart is glad, and my glory rejoiceth: my flesh also shall rest in hope. 
For thou wilt not leave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou wilt shew me the path of life: in thy presence is fulness of joy; at thy right hand there are pleasures for evermore. 
Hear the right, O LORD, attend unto my cry, give ear unto my prayer, that goeth not out of feigned lips. 
Let my sentence come forth from thy presence; let thine eyes behold the things that are equal. 
Thou hast proved mine heart; thou hast visited me in the night; thou hast tried me, and shalt find nothing; I am purposed that my mouth shall not transgress. 
Concerning the works of men, b
775, of iron; and twenty years he mightily oppressed the children of Israel. 
And Deborah, a prophetess, the wife of Lapidoth, she judged Israel at that time. 
And she dwelt under the palm tree of Deborah between Ramah and Bethel in mount Ephraim: and the children of Israel came up to her for judgment. 
And she sent and called Barak the son of Abinoam out of Kedeshnaphtali, and said unto him, Hath not the LORD God of Israel commanded, saying, Go and draw toward mount Tabor, and take with thee ten thousand men of the children of Naphtali and of the children of Zebulun? 
And I will draw unto thee to the river Kishon Sisera, the captain of Jabin's army, with his chariots and his multitude; and I will deliver him into thine hand. 
And Barak said unto her, If thou wilt go w
746,abel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and began to build the house of God which is at Jerusalem: and with them were the prophets of God helping them. 
At the same time came to them Tatnai, governor on this side the river, and Shetharboznai and their companions, and said thus unto them, Who hath commanded you to build this house, and to make up this wall? 
Then said we unto them after this manner, What are the names of the men that make this building? 
But the eye of their God was upon the elders of the Jews, that they could not cause them to cease, till the matter came to Darius: and then they returned answer by letter concerning this matter. 
The copy of the letter that Tatnai, governor on this side the river, and S
944,their nations: and by these were the nations divided in the earth after the flood. 
And the whole earth was of one language, and of one speech. 
And it came to pass, as they journeyed from the east, that they found a plain in the land of Shinar; and they dwelt there. 
And they said one to another, Go to, let us make brick, and burn them thoroughly. And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for morter. 
And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a tower, whose top may reach unto heaven; and let us make us a name, lest we be scattered abroad upon the face of the whole earth. 
And the LORD came down to see the city and the tower, which the children of men builded. 
And the LORD said, Behold, the people is one, and they have all one language; and this they begin to do: and now nothing will be restrained from them, which they have imagined to do. 
Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they may not 
727,lsy lay. 
When Jesus saw their faith, he said unto the sick of the palsy, Son, thy sins be forgiven thee. 
But there was certain of the scribes sitting there, and reasoning in their hearts, 
Why doth this man thus speak blasphemies? who can forgive sins but God only? 
And immediately when Jesus perceived in his spirit that they so reasoned within themselves, he said unto them, Why reason ye these things in your hearts? 
Whether is it easier to say to the sick of the palsy, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Arise, and take up thy bed, and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power on earth to forgive sins, (he saith to the sick of the palsy,) 
I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy bed, and go thy 
776,of Kison: 
Which perished at Endor: they became as dung for the earth. 
Make their nobles like Oreb, and like Zeeb: yea, all their princes as Zebah, and as Zalmunna: 
Who said, Let us take to ourselves the houses of God in possession. 
O my God, make them like a wheel; as the stubble before the wind. 
As the fire burneth a wood, and as the flame setteth the mountains on fire; 
So persecute them with thy tempest, and make them afraid with thy storm. 
Fill their faces with shame; that they may seek thy name, O LORD. 
Let them be confounded and troubled for ever; yea, let them be put to shame, and perish: 
That men may know that thou, whose name alone is JEHOVAH, art the most high over all the earth. 
How amiable are thy tabernacles, O LORD of hosts! 
My soul longeth, 
890,f the LORD shall be performed against Babylon, to make the land of Babylon a desolation without an inhabitant. 
The mighty men of Babylon have forborn to fight, they have remained in their holds: their might hath failed; they became as women: they have burned her dwellingplaces; her bars are broken. 
One post shall run to meet another, and one messenger to meet another, to shew the king of Babylon that his city is taken at one end, 
And that the passages are stopped, and the reeds they have burned with fire, and the men of war are affrighted. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; The daughter of Babylon is like a threshingfloor, it is time to thresh her: yet a little while, and the time of her harvest shall come. 
Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon hath devoured me, he hath crushed me, he hath made me an empty vessel, he hath swallowed me up like a dragon, he ha
648,hildren of the priests: the children of Habaiah, the children of Koz, the children of Barzillai; which took a wife of the daughters of Barzillai the Gileadite, and was called after their name: 
These sought their register among those that were reckoned by genealogy, but they were not found: therefore were they, as polluted, put from the priesthood. 
And the Tirshatha said unto them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and with Thummim. 
The whole congregation together was forty and two thousand three hundred and threescore, 
Beside their servants and their maids, of whom there were seven 
891, were men lying in wait, abiding with her in the chamber. And she said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he brake the withs, as a thread of tow is broken when it toucheth the fire. So his strength was not known. 
And Delilah said unto Samson, Behold, thou hast mocked me, and told me lies: now tell me, I pray thee, wherewith thou mightest be bound. 
And he said unto her, If they bind me fast with new ropes that never were occupied, then shall I be weak, and be as another man. 
Delilah therefore took new ropes, and bound him therewith, and said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And there were liers in wait abiding in the chamber. And he brake them from off his arms like a thread. 
And Delilah said unto Samson, Hitherto thou hast mocked me, and told me lies: tell me wherewith thou mightest be bound. And he said unto her, If thou weavest the seven loc
833,nd there fell a great star from heaven, burning as it were a lamp, and it fell upon the third part of the rivers, and upon the fountains of waters; 
And the name of the star is called Wormwood: and the third part of the waters became wormwood; and many men died of the waters, because they were made bitter. 
And the fourth angel sounded, and the third part of the sun was smitten, and the third part of the moon, and the third part of the stars; so as the third part of them was darkened, and the day shone not for a third part of it, and the night likewise. 
And I beheld, and heard an angel flying through the midst of heaven, saying with a loud voice, Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of the earth by reason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three angels, which are yet to sound! 
And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a
905,him, Follow me. And he arose and followed him. 
And it came to pass, that, as Jesus sat at meat in his house, many publicans and sinners sat also together with Jesus and his disciples: for there were many, and they followed him. 
And when the scribes and Pharisees saw him eat with publicans and sinners, they said unto his disciples, How is it that he eateth and drinketh with publicans and sinners? 
When Jesus heard it, he saith unto them, They that are whole have no need of the physician, but they that are sick: I came not to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance. 
And the disciples of John and of the Pharisees used to fast: and they come and say unto him, Why do the disciples of John and of the Pharisees fast, but thy disciples fast not? 
And Jesus said unto them, Can the children of the bridechamber fast, while the bridegroom is with them? as long as they have the bridegroom with th
760,ty men to stop the waters of the fountains which were without the city: and they did help him. 
So there was gathered much people together, who stopped all the fountains, and the brook that ran through the midst of the land, saying, Why should the kings of Assyria come, and find much water? 
Also he strengthened himself, and built up all the wall that was broken, and raised it up to the towers, and another wall without, and repaired Millo in the city of David, and made darts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the mu
845,other wing was five cubits also, joining to the wing of the other cherub. 
The wings of these cherubims spread themselves forth twenty cubits: and they stood on their feet, and their faces were inward. 
And he made the vail of blue, and purple, and crimson, and fine linen, and wrought cherubims thereon. 
Also he made before the house two pillars of thirty and five cubits high, and the chapiter that was on the top of each of them was five cubits. 
And he made chains, as in the oracle, and put them on the heads of the pillars; and made an hundred pomegranates, and put them on the chains. 
And he reared up the pillars before the temple, one on the right hand, and the other on the left; and called the name of that on the right hand Jachin, and the name of that on the left Boaz. 
Moreover he made an altar of brass, twenty cubits the lengt
842,ils a goodly Babylonish garment, and two hundred shekels of silver, and a wedge of gold of fifty shekels weight, then I coveted them, and took them; and, behold, they are hid in the earth in the midst of my tent, and the silver under it. 
So Joshua sent messengers, and they ran unto the tent; and, behold, it was hid in his tent, and the silver under it. 
And they took them out of the midst of the tent, and brought them unto Joshua, and unto all the children of Israel, and laid them out before the LORD. 
And Joshua, and all Israel with him, took Achan the son of Zerah, and the silver, and the garment, and the wedge of gold, and his sons, and his daughters, and his oxen, and his asses, and his sheep, and his tent, and all that he had: and they brought them unto the valley of Achor. 
And Joshua said, Why hast thou troubled us? the LO
640,a publican, named Levi, sitting at the receipt of custom: and he said unto him, Follow me. 
And he left all, rose up, and followed him. 
And Levi made him a great feast in his own house: and there was a great company of publicans and of others that sat down with them. 
But their scribes and Pharisees murmured against his disciples, saying, Why do ye eat and drink with publicans and sinners? 
And Jesus answering said unto them, They that are whole need not a physician; but they that are sick. 
I came not to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance. 
And they said unto him, Why do the disciples of John fast often, and make prayer
791,ophet against the Philistines, before that Pharaoh smote Gaza. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, waters rise up out of the north, and shall be an overflowing flood, and shall overflow the land, and all that is therein; the city, and them that dwell therein: then the men shall cry, and all the inhabitants of the land shall howl. 
At the noise of the stamping of the hoofs of his strong horses, at the rushing of his chariots, and at the rumbling of his wheels, the fathers shall not look back to their children for feebleness of hands; 
Because of the day that cometh to spoil all the Philistines, and to cut off from Tyrus and Zidon every helper that remaineth: for the LORD will spoil the Philistines, the remnant of the country of Caphtor. 
Baldness is come upon Gaza; Ashkelon is cut off wi
715,and called Mary her sister secretly, saying, The Master is come, and calleth for thee. 
As soon as she heard that, she arose quickly, and came unto him. 
Now Jesus was not yet come into the town, but was in that place where Martha met him. 
The Jews then which were with her in the house, and comforted her, when they saw Mary, that she rose up hastily and went out, followed her, saying, She goeth unto the grave to weep there. 
Then when Mary was come where Jesus was, and saw him, she fell down at his feet, saying unto him, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died. 
When Jesus therefore saw her weeping, and the Jews also weeping which came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and was troubled. 

930,shall sit upon my throne in my stead; even so will I certainly do this day. 
Then Bathsheba bowed with her face to the earth, and did reverence to the king, and said, Let my lord king David live for ever. 
And king David said, Call me Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada. And they came before the king. 
The king also said unto them, Take with you the servants of your lord, and cause Solomon my son to ride upon mine own mule, and bring him down to Gihon: 
And let Zadok the priest and Nathan the prophet anoint him there king over Israel: and blow ye with the trumpet, and say, God save king Solomon. 
Then ye shall come up after him, that he may come and sit upon my throne; for he shall be king in my stead: and I have appointed him to be ruler over Israel and over Judah. 
And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada answered the king, and said, Amen: the LORD God of my lord the king say so too. 
A
708,he people wept that night. 
And all the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron: and the whole congregation said unto them, Would God that we had died in the land of Egypt! or would God we had died in this wilderness! 
And wherefore hath the LORD brought us unto this land, to fall by the sword, that our wives and our children should be a prey? were it not better for us to return into Egypt? 
And they said one to another, Let us make a captain, and let us return into Egypt. 
Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before all the assembly of the congregation of the children of Israel. 
And Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of them that searched the 
710,gainst the children of Ammon, and against Edom, and against the kings of Zobah, and against the Philistines: and whithersoever he turned himself, he vexed them. 
And he gathered an host, and smote the Amalekites, and delivered Israel out of the hands of them that spoiled them. 
Now the sons of Saul were Jonathan, and Ishui, and Melchishua: and the names of his two daughters were these; the name of the firstborn Merab, and the name of the younger Michal: 
And the name of Saul's wife was Ahinoam, the daughter of Ahimaaz: and the name of the captain of his host was Abner, the son of Ner, Saul's uncle. 
And Kish was the father of Saul; and Ner the father of Abner was the son of Abiel. 
And there was sore 
652, is sin; and the strength of sin is the law. 
But thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ. 
Therefore, my beloved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmoveable, always abounding in the work of the Lord, forasmuch as ye know that your labour is not in vain in the Lord. 
Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so do ye. 
Upon the first day of the week let every one of you lay by him in store, as God hath prospered him, that there be no gatherings when I come. 
And when I come, whomsoever ye shall approve by your letters, them will I send to bring your liberali
825,is righteousness, it sustained him. 
For he put on righteousness as a breastplate, and an helmet of salvation upon his head; and he put on the garments of vengeance for clothing, and was clad with zeal as a cloak. 
According to their deeds, accordingly he will repay, fury to his adversaries, recompence to his enemies; to the islands he will repay recompence. 
So shall they fear the name of the LORD from the west, and his glory from the rising of the sun. When the enemy shall come in like a flood, the Spirit of the LORD shall lift up a standard against him. 
And the Redeemer shall come to Zion, and unto them that turn from transgression in Jacob, saith the LORD. 
As for me, this is my covenant with them, saith the LORD; My spirit that is upon thee, and my words which I have put in thy mouth, shall not depart out of
718,swer thee: thou wilt have a desire to the work of thine hands. 
For now thou numberest my steps: dost thou not watch over my sin? 
My transgression is sealed up in a bag, and thou sewest up mine iniquity. 
And surely the mountains falling cometh to nought, and the rock is removed out of his place. 
The waters wear the stones: thou washest away the things which grow out of the dust of the earth; and thou destroyest the hope of man. 
Thou prevailest for ever against him, and he passeth: thou changest his countenance, and sendest him away. 
His sons come to honour, and he knoweth it not; and they are brought low, but he perceiveth it not of them. 
But his flesh upon him shall have pain, and his soul within him s
821,and cubits, and he brought me through the waters; the waters were to the ankles. 
Again he measured a thousand, and brought me through the waters; the waters were to the knees. Again he measured a thousand, and brought me through; the waters were to the loins. 
Afterward he measured a thousand; and it was a river that I could not pass over: for the waters were risen, waters to swim in, a river that could not be passed over. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen this? Then he brought me, and caused me to return to the brink of the river. 
Now when I had returned, behold, at the bank of the river were very many trees on the one side and on the other. 
Then said he unto me, These waters issue out toward the east country, and go down into the desert, and go into the sea: which being brought forth into t
879,tali was Ahira the son of Enan. 
Thus were the journeyings of the children of Israel according to their armies, when they set forward. 
And Moses said unto Hobab, the son of Raguel the Midianite, Moses' father in law, We are journeying unto the place of which the LORD said, I will give it you: come thou with us, and we will do thee good: for the LORD hath spoken good concerning Israel. 
And he said unto him, I will not go; but I will depart to mine own land, and to my kindred. 
And he said, Leave us not, I pray thee; forasmuch as thou knowest how we are to encamp in the wilderness, and thou mayest be to us instead of eyes. 
And it shall be, if thou go with us, yea, it shall be, that what goodness the LORD shall do unto us, the same will we do unto thee. 
And they departed from the mount of the LORD three days' journey: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD went bef
731,of his own voluntary will at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD. 
And he shall put his hand upon the head of the burnt offering; and it shall be accepted for him to make atonement for him. 
And he shall kill the bullock before the LORD: and the priests, Aaron's sons, shall bring the blood, and sprinkle the blood round about upon the altar that is by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall flay the burnt offering, and cut it into his pieces. 
And the sons of Aaron the priest shall put fire upon the altar, and lay the wood in order upon the fire: 
And the priests, Aaron's sons, shall lay the parts, the head, and the fat, in order upon the wood that is on the fire which is up
779,t heard all these words. 
Nevertheless Elnathan and Delaiah and Gemariah had made intercession to the king that he would not burn the roll: but he would not hear them. 
But the king commanded Jerahmeel the son of Hammelech, and Seraiah the son of Azriel, and Shelemiah the son of Abdeel, to take Baruch the scribe and Jeremiah the prophet: but the LORD hid them. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah, after that the king had burned the roll, and the words which Baruch wrote at the mouth of Jeremiah, saying, 
Take thee again another roll, and write in it all the former words that were in the first roll, which Jehoiakim the king of Judah hath burned. 
And thou shalt say to Jehoiakim king of Judah, Thus saith the LORD; Thou hast burned this roll, saying, Why hast thou 
863,y cause, O LORD, with them that strive with me: fight against them that fight against me. 
Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand up for mine help. 
Draw out also the spear, and stop the way against them that persecute me: say unto my soul, I am thy salvation. 
Let them be confounded and put to shame that seek after my soul: let them be turned back and brought to confusion that devise my hurt. 
Let them be as chaff before the wind: and let the angel of the LORD chase them. 
Let their way be dark and slippery: and let the angel of the LORD persecute them. 
For without cause have they hid for me their net in a pit, which without cause they have digged for my soul. 
Let destruction come upon him at unawares; and let his net that he hath hid catch himself: into that very destruction let him fall. 
And my soul shall be joyful in the LORD: it shall rejo
888,offerings, and over the sacrifices of your peace offerings; that they may be to you for a memorial before your God: I am the LORD your God. 
And it came to pass on the twentieth day of the second month, in the second year, that the cloud was taken up from off the tabernacle of the testimony. 
And the children of Israel took their journeys out of the wilderness of Sinai; and the cloud rested in the wilderness of Paran. 
And they first took their journey according to the commandment of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
In the first place went the standard of the camp of the children of Judah according to their armies: and over his host was Nahshon the son of Amminadab. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Issachar was Nethaneel the son of Zuar. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Zebulun was Eliab the son of Helon. 
And the tabernacle was taken down; 
850,ms, and thy daughters shall be carried upon their shoulders. 
And kings shall be thy nursing fathers, and their queens thy nursing mothers: they shall bow down to thee with their face toward the earth, and lick up the dust of thy feet; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD: for they shall not be ashamed that wait for me. 
Shall the prey be taken from the mighty, or the lawful captive delivered? 
But thus saith the LORD, Even the captives of the mighty shall be taken away, and the prey of the terrible shall be delivered: for I will contend with him that contendeth with thee, and I will save thy children. 
And I will feed them that oppress thee with their own flesh; and they shall be drunken with their own blood, as with sweet wine: and all flesh shall know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob. 
Thus sai
667,rth; the time of the singing of birds is come, and the voice of the turtle is heard in our land; 
The fig tree putteth forth her green figs, and the vines with the tender grape give a good smell. Arise, my love, my fair one, and come away. 
O my dove, that art in the clefts of the rock, in the secret places of the stairs, let me see thy countenance, let me hear thy voice; for sweet is thy voice, and thy countenance is comely. 
Take us the foxes, the little foxes, that spoil the vines: for our vines have tender grapes. 
My beloved is mine, and I am his: he feedeth among the lilies. 
Until the day break, and the shadows flee away, turn, my beloved, and be thou 
762,ing, and shewing the coats and garments which Dorcas made, while she was with them. 
But Peter put them all forth, and kneeled down, and prayed; and turning him to the body said, Tabitha, arise. And she opened her eyes: and when she saw Peter, she sat up. 
And he gave her his hand, and lifted her up, and when he had called the saints and widows, presented her alive. 
And it was known throughout all Joppa; and many believed in the Lord. 
And it came to pass, that he tarried many days in Joppa with one Simon a tanner. 
There was a certain man in Caesarea called Cornelius, a centurion of the band called the Italian band, 
A devout man, and one that feared God with all his house, which gave much alms to the people, and prayed to God alway. 
He saw in a vis
831,e consumed with fire? 
Then the king said unto me, For what dost thou make request? So I prayed to the God of heaven. 
And I said unto the king, If it please the king, and if thy servant have found favour in thy sight, that thou wouldest send me unto Judah, unto the city of my fathers' sepulchres, that I may build it. 
And the king said unto me, (the queen also sitting by him,) For how long shall thy journey be? and when wilt thou return? So it pleased the king to send me; and I set him a time. 
Moreover I said unto the king, If it please the king, let letters be given me to the governors beyond the river, that they may convey me over till I come into Judah; 
And a letter unto Asaph the keeper of the king's forest, that he may give me timber to make beams for the gates of the palace which appertained to the house, and f
788, shall enlarge Japheth, and he shall dwell in the tents of Shem; and Canaan shall be his servant. 
And Noah lived after the flood three hundred and fifty years. 
And all the days of Noah were nine hundred and fifty years: and he died. 
Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth: and unto them were sons born after the flood. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
By these were the isles of the Gentiles divided in their lands; every one after his tongue, after their families, in their nations. 
And the sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, and Phut, and Canaan. 
And the 
869, was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Janna, which was the son of Joseph, 
Which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Amos, which was the son of Naum, which was the son of Esli, which was the son of Nagge, 
Which was the son of Maath, which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Semei, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was 
919,ere, which shall not taste of death, till they see the kingdom of God. 
And it came to pass about an eight days after these sayings, he took Peter and John and James, and went up into a mountain to pray. 
And as he prayed, the fashion of his countenance was altered, and his raiment was white and glistering. 
And, behold, there talked with him two men, which were Moses and Elias: 
Who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he should accomplish at Jerusalem. 
But Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and when they were awake, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood with him. 
And it came to pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not knowing what he said. 
While he thus spake, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them: and they feare
929,ok his people with him: 
And he took six hundred chosen chariots, and all the chariots of Egypt, and captains over every one of them. 
And the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went out with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon. 
And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of Israel cried out unto the LORD. 
And they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt, hast thou taken us away to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou dealt thus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt? 
Is not this the word that we did tell thee in Egypt, sayin
686,ual desolations. 
Moreover I will take from them the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the sound of the millstones, and the light of the candle. 
And this whole land shall be a desolation, and an astonishment; and these nations shall serve the king of Babylon seventy years. 
And it shall come to pass, when seventy years are accomplished, that I will punish the king of Babylon, and that nation, saith the LORD, for their iniquity, and the land of the Chaldeans, and will make it perpetual desolations. 
And I will bring upon that land all my words which I have pronounced against it, even all that is written in this b
908,the house of God, because the charge was upon them, and the opening thereof every morning pertained to them. 
And certain of them had the charge of the ministering vessels, that they should bring them in and out by tale. 
Some of them also were appointed to oversee the vessels, and all the instruments of the sanctuary, and the fine flour, and the wine, and the oil, and the frankincense, and the spices. 
And some of the sons of the priests made the ointment of the spices. 
And Mattithiah, one of the Levites, who was the firstborn of Shallum the Korahite, had the set office over the things that were made in the pans. 
And other of their brethren, of the sons of the Kohathites, were over the shewbread, to prepare it every sabbath. 
And these are the singers, chief of the fathers of the Levites, who remaining in the chambers were free: for they were employed in that work day and night. 
These chief 
948, and are choked with cares and riches and pleasures of this life, and bring no fruit to perfection. 
But that on the good ground are they, which in an honest and good heart, having heard the word, keep it, and bring forth fruit with patience. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, covereth it with a vessel, or putteth it under a bed; but setteth it on a candlestick, that they which enter in may see the light. 
For nothing is secret, that shall not be made manifest; neither any thing hid, that shall not be known and come abroad. 
Take heed therefore how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall be given; and whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he seemeth to have. 
Then came to him his mother and his brethren, and could not come at him for the press. 
And it was told him by certain which said, Thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to see thee. 
And he answered and said unto them, My mother and my b
785, Babylon. 
O thou that dwellest upon many waters, abundant in treasures, thine end is come, and the measure of thy covetousness. 
The LORD of hosts hath sworn by himself, saying, Surely I will fill thee with men, as with caterpillers; and they shall lift up a shout against thee. 
He hath made the earth by his power, he hath established the world by his wisdom, and hath stretched out the heaven by his understanding. 
When he uttereth his voice, there is a multitude of waters in the heavens; and he causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the earth: he maketh lightnings with rain, and bringeth forth the wind out of his treasures. 
Every man is brutish by his knowledge; every founder is confounded by the graven image: for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no bre
874,ernacles of his palace between the seas in the glorious holy mountain; yet he shall come to his end, and none shall help him. 
And at that time shall Michael stand up, the great prince which standeth for the children of thy people: and there shall be a time of trouble, such as never was since there was a nation even to that same time: and at that time thy people shall be delivered, every one that shall be found written in the book. 
And many of them that sleep in the dust of the earth shall awake, some to everlasting life, and some to shame and everlasting contempt. 
And they that be wise shall shine as the brightness of the firmament; and they that turn many to righteousness as the stars for ever and ever. 
But thou, O Daniel, shut up the words, and seal the book, even to the time of the end: many shall run to and fro, and knowledge shall be increased. 
Then I 
861,were, Addar, and Gera, and Abihud, 
And Abishua, and Naaman, and Ahoah, 
And Gera, and Shephuphan, and Huram. 
And these are the sons of Ehud: these are the heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Geba, and they removed them to Manahath: 
And Naaman, and Ahiah, and Gera, he removed them, and begat Uzza, and Ahihud. 
And Shaharaim begat children in the country of Moab, after he had sent them away; Hushim and Baara were his wives. 
And he begat of Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and Malcham, 
And Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirma. These were his sons, heads of the fathers. 
And of Hushim he begat Abitub, and Elpaal. 
The sons of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
A
879,ove strength, insomuch that we despaired even of life: 
But we had the sentence of death in ourselves, that we should not trust in ourselves, but in God which raiseth the dead: 
Who delivered us from so great a death, and doth deliver: in whom we trust that he will yet deliver us; 
Ye also helping together by prayer for us, that for the gift bestowed upon us by the means of many persons thanks may be given by many on our behalf. 
For our rejoicing is this, the testimony of our conscience, that in simplicity and godly sincerity, not with fleshly wisdom, but by the grace of God, we have had our conversation in the world, and more abundantly to you-ward. 
For we write none other things unto you, that what ye read or acknowledge; and I trust ye shall acknowledge even to the end; 
As also ye have acknowledged us in part, that we are your rejoicing, even as ye also are our
745,. 
Understand therefore, that the LORD thy God giveth thee not this good land to possess it for thy righteousness; for thou art a stiffnecked people. 
Remember, and forget not, how thou provokedst the LORD thy God to wrath in the wilderness: from the day that thou didst depart out of the land of Egypt, until ye came unto this place, ye have been rebellious against the LORD. 
Also in Horeb ye provoked the LORD to wrath, so that the LORD was angry with you to have destroyed you. 
When I was gone up into the mount to receive the tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant which the LORD made with you, then I abode in the mount forty days and forty nights, I neither did eat bread nor drink water: 
And the LORD delivered unto me two ta
649,n down, and cast into the fire. 
I indeed baptize you with water unto repentance. but he that cometh after me is mightier than I, whose shoes I am not worthy to bear: he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost, and with fire: 
Whose fan is in his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor, and gather his wheat into the garner; but he will burn up the chaff with unquenchable fire. 
Then cometh Jesus from Galilee to Jordan unto John, to be baptized of him. 
But John forbad him, saying, I have need to be baptized of thee, and comest thou to me? 
And Jesus answering said unto him, Suffer it to be so now: for thus it becometh us to fulfil all righ
926,
And he dealt to every one of Israel, both man and woman, to every one a loaf of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. 
And he appointed certain of the Levites to minister before the ark of the LORD, and to record, and to thank and praise the LORD God of Israel: 
Asaph the chief, and next to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and Obededom: and Jeiel with psalteries and with harps; but Asaph made a sound with cymbals; 
Benaiah also and Jahaziel the priests with trumpets continually before the ark of the covenant of God. 
Then on that day David delivered first this psalm to thank the LORD into the hand of Asaph and his brethren. 
Give thanks unto the LORD, call upon his name, make known his deeds among the people. 
Sing unto him, sing psalms unto him, talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice
739,th through snares. 
Canst thou draw out leviathan with an hook? or his tongue with a cord which thou lettest down? 
Canst thou put an hook into his nose? or bore his jaw through with a thorn? 
Will he make many supplications unto thee? will he speak soft words unto thee? 
Will he make a covenant with thee? wilt thou take him for a servant for ever? 
Wilt thou play with him as with a bird? or wilt thou bind him for thy maidens? 
Shall the companions make a banquet of him? shall they part him among the merchants? 
Canst thou fill his skin with barbed irons? or his head with fish spears? 
Lay thine hand upon him, remember the battle, do no more. 
Behold, the hope of him is in vain: shall not one be cast down even at the sight of him
794,ce unto his kinsman that is next to him of his family, and he shall possess it: and it shall be unto the children of Israel a statute of judgment, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Get thee up into this mount Abarim, and see the land which I have given unto the children of Israel. 
And when thou hast seen it, thou also shalt be gathered unto thy people, as Aaron thy brother was gathered. 
For ye rebelled against my commandment in the desert of Zin, in the strife of the congregation, to sanctify me at the water before their eyes: that is the water of Meribah in Kadesh in the wilderness of Zin. 
And Moses spake unto the LORD, saying, 
Let the LORD, the God of the spirits of all flesh, set a man over the congregation, 
Which may go out before them, and which ma
920,th all subjection. 
But I suffer not a woman to teach, nor to usurp authority over the man, but to be in silence. 
For Adam was first formed, then Eve. 
And Adam was not deceived, but the woman being deceived was in the transgression. 
Notwithstanding she shall be saved in childbearing, if they continue in faith and charity and holiness with sobriety. 
This is a true saying, if a man desire the office of a bishop, he desireth a good work. 
A bishop then must be blameless, the husband of one wife, vigilant, sober, of good behaviour, given to hospitality, apt to teach; 
Not given to wine, no striker, not greedy of filthy lucre; but patient, not a brawler, not covetous; 
One that ruleth well his own house, having his children in subjection with all gravity; 
(For if a man know not how to rule his own house, how shall he take care of the church of God?) 
Not a novice, lest being lifted up with pride he fall int
650,dage. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Go in, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of Israel go out of his land. 
And Moses spake before the LORD, saying, Behold, the children of Israel have not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who am of uncircumcised lips? 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, and gave them a charge unto the children of Israel, and unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt. 
These be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the families of Re
875,d she was not given unto him to wife. 
When Judah saw her, he thought her to be an harlot; because she had covered her face. 
And he turned unto her by the way, and said, Go to, I pray thee, let me come in unto thee; (for he knew not that she was his daughter in law.) And she said, What wilt thou give me, that thou mayest come in unto me? 
And he said, I will send thee a kid from the flock. And she said, Wilt thou give me a pledge, till thou send it? 
And he said, What pledge shall I give thee? And she said, Thy signet, and thy bracelets, and thy staff that is in thine hand. And he gave it her, and came in unto her, and she conceived by him. 
And she arose, and went away, and laid by her vail from her, and put on the garments of her widowhood. 
And Judah sent the kid by the hand of his friend the Adullamite, to receive his pledge from the woman's hand: but he fou
954,ffering perpetual, half of it in the morning, and half thereof at night. 
In a pan it shall be made with oil; and when it is baken, thou shalt bring it in: and the baken pieces of the meat offering shalt thou offer for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the priest of his sons that is anointed in his stead shall offer it: it is a statute for ever unto the LORD; it shall be wholly burnt. 
For every meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it shall not be eaten. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and to his sons, saying, This is the law of the sin offering: In the place where the burnt offering is killed shall the sin offering be killed before the LORD: it is most holy. 
The priest that offereth it for sin shall eat it: in the holy place shall it be eaten, in the court of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Whatsoever shall touch the flesh thereof shall be holy: and when there is sprinkled of the blood thereo
850,arth: (for also there is that neither day nor night seeth sleep with his eyes:) 
Then I beheld all the work of God, that a man cannot find out the work that is done under the sun: because though a man labour to seek it out, yet he shall not find it; yea farther; though a wise man think to know it, yet shall he not be able to find it. 
For all this I considered in my heart even to declare all this, that the righteous, and the wise, and their works, are in the hand of God: no man knoweth either love or hatred by all that is before them. 
All things come alike to all: there is one event to the righteous, and to the wicked; to the good and to the clean, and to the unclean; to him that sacrificeth, and to him that sacrificeth not: as is the good, so is the sinner; and he that sweareth, as he that feareth an oath. 
This is an evil among all thi
692,ches of their liberality. 
For to their power, I bear record, yea, and beyond their power they were willing of themselves; 
Praying us with much intreaty that we would receive the gift, and take upon us the fellowship of the ministering to the saints. 
And this they did, not as we hoped, but first gave their own selves to the Lord, and unto us by the will of God. 
Insomuch that we desired Titus, that as he had begun, so he would also finish in you the same grace also. 
Therefore, as ye abound in every thing, in faith, and utterance, and knowledge, and in all diligence, and in your love to us, see that ye abound in this grace also. 
I speak not by commandment, but by occasion of the f
952,h in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints, 
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit. 
For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will in all wisdom and spiritual understanding; 
That ye might walk worthy of the Lord unto all pleasing, being fruitful in every good work, and increasing in the knowledge of God; 
Strengthened with all might, according to his glorious power, unto all patience and longsuffering with joyfulness; 
Givi
779,old, I go bound in the spirit unto Jerusalem, not knowing the things that shall befall me there: 
Save that the Holy Ghost witnesseth in every city, saying that bonds and afflictions abide me. 
But none of these things move me, neither count I my life dear unto myself, so that I might finish my course with joy, and the ministry, which I have received of the Lord Jesus, to testify the gospel of the grace of God. 
And now, behold, I know that ye all, among whom I have gone preaching the kingdom of God, shall see my face no more. 
Wherefore I take you to record this day, that I am pure from the blood of all men. 
For I have not shunned to declare unto you all the counsel of God. 
Take heed therefore unto yourselves, and to all the flock, over the which the Holy Ghost hath
732,er. 
He shall spare the poor and needy, and shall save the souls of the needy. 
He shall redeem their soul from deceit and violence: and precious shall their blood be in his sight. 
And he shall live, and to him shall be given of the gold of Sheba: prayer also shall be made for him continually; and daily shall he be praised. 
There shall be an handful of corn in the earth upon the top of the mountains; the fruit thereof shall shake like Lebanon: and they of the city shall flourish like grass of the earth. 
His name shall endure for ever: his name shall be continued as long as the sun: and men shall be blessed in him: all nations shall call him blessed. 
Blessed be the LORD God, the God of Israel, who only doeth wondrous th
866,ilderness of Etham, and pitched in Marah. 
And they removed from Marah, and came unto Elim: and in Elim were twelve fountains of water, and threescore and ten palm trees; and they pitched there. 
And they removed from Elim, and encamped by the Red sea. 
And they removed from the Red sea, and encamped in the wilderness of Sin. 
And they took their journey out of the wilderness of Sin, and encamped in Dophkah. 
And they departed from Dophkah, and encamped in Alush. 
And they removed from Alush, and encamped at Rephidim, where was no water for the people to drink. 
And they departed from Rephidim, and pitched in the wilderness of Sinai. 
And they removed from the desert of Sinai, and pitched at Kibrothhattaavah. 
And they departed from Kibrothhattaavah, and encamped at Hazeroth. 
And they departed from Hazeroth, and pitched in Rithmah. 
And they departed fr
760,e also now, saith the LORD, turn ye even to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning: 
And rend your heart, and not your garments, and turn unto the LORD your God: for he is gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and repenteth him of the evil. 
Who knoweth if he will return and repent, and leave a blessing behind him; even a meat offering and a drink offering unto the LORD your God? 
Blow the trumpet in Zion, sanctify a fast, call a solemn assembly: 
Gather the people, sanctify the congregation, assemble the elders, gather the children, and those that suck the breasts: let the bridegroom go forth of his chamber, and the bride out of her closet. 
Let the priests, the ministers of the LORD, wee
896,r about five thousand. 
And Jesus took the loaves; and when he had given thanks, he distributed to the disciples, and the disciples to them that were set down; and likewise of the fishes as much as they would. 
When they were filled, he said unto his disciples, Gather up the fragments that remain, that nothing be lost. 
Therefore they gathered them together, and filled twelve baskets with the fragments of the five barley loaves, which remained over and above unto them that had eaten. 
Then those men, when they had seen the miracle that Jesus did, said, This is of a truth that prophet that should come into the world. 
When Jesus therefore perceived that they would come and take him by force, to make him a king, he departed again into a mountain himself alone. 
And when even was now come, his disciples went down unto the sea, 
And entered into a ship, and went over the sea toward Caper
714,o me, saying, The city is smitten. 
Now the hand of the LORD was upon me in the evening, afore he that was escaped came; and had opened my mouth, until he came to me in the morning; and my mouth was opened, and I was no more dumb. 
Then the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, they that inhabit those wastes of the land of Israel speak, saying, Abraham was one, and he inherited the land: but we are many; the land is given us for inheritance. 
Wherefore say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Ye eat with the blood, and lift up your eyes toward your idols, and shed blood: and shall ye possess the land? 
Ye stand upon your sword, ye work abomination, and ye defile every one his neighbour's wife
832,have kept me from the paths of the destroyer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear unto me, and hear my speech. 
Shew thy marvellous lovingkindness, O thou that savest by thy right hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up against them. 
Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings, 
From the wicked that oppress me, from my deadly enemies, who compass me about. 
They are inclosed in their own fat: with their mouth they speak proudly. 
They have now compassed us in our steps: they have set their eyes bowing down to the earth; 
Like as a lion that is greedy of his prey, and as it were a young lion lurking in secret places. 
Arise, O LORD, disappoint him, cast him down: deliver my
949,me. 
And I will tread down the people in mine anger, and make them drunk in my fury, and I will bring down their strength to the earth. 
I will mention the lovingkindnesses of the LORD, and the praises of the LORD, according to all that the LORD hath bestowed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old. 
But they rebelled, and vexed his holy Spirit: therefore he was turned to be their enemy, and he fought against them. 
Then he remembered the days of old, Moses, and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea wit
926,hither. 
And he sent, and brought him in. Now he was ruddy, and withal of a beautiful countenance, and goodly to look to. And the LORD said, Arise, anoint him: for this is he. 
Then Samuel took the horn of oil, and anointed him in the midst of his brethren: and the Spirit of the LORD came upon David from that day forward. So Samuel rose up, and went to Ramah. 
But the Spirit of the LORD departed from Saul, and an evil spirit from the LORD troubled him. 
And Saul's servants said unto him, Behold now, an evil spirit from God troubleth thee. 
Let our lord now command thy servants, which are before thee, to seek out a man, who is a cunning player on an harp: and it shall come to pass, when the evil spirit from God is upon thee, that he shall play with his hand, and thou shalt be well. 
And Saul said unto his servants, Provide me now a man that can play well, and bring him to me. 
Then answered one of the servants, an
913,nt, wrought in me all manner of concupiscence. For without the law sin was dead. 
For I was alive without the law once: but when the commandment came, sin revived, and I died. 
And the commandment, which was ordained to life, I found to be unto death. 
For sin, taking occasion by the commandment, deceived me, and by it slew me. 
Wherefore the law is holy, and the commandment holy, and just, and good. 
Was then that which is good made death unto me? God forbid. But sin, that it might appear sin, working death in me by that which is good; that sin by the commandment might become exceeding sinful. 
For we know that the law is spiritual: but I am carnal, sold under sin. 
For that which I do I allow not: for what I would, that do I not; but what I hate, that do I. 
If then I do that which I would not, I consent unto the law that it is good. 
Now then it is no more I that do it, but sin that dwelleth in me
759,ighteousness might be imputed unto them also: 
And the father of circumcision to them who are not of the circumcision only, but who also walk in the steps of that faith of our father Abraham, which he had being yet uncircumcised. 
For the promise, that he should be the heir of the world, was not to Abraham, or to his seed, through the law, but through the righteousness of faith. 
For if they which are of the law be heirs, faith is made void, and the promise made of none effect: 
Because the law worketh wrath: for where no law is, there is no transgression. 
Therefore it is of faith, that it might be by grace; to the end the promise might be sure to all the seed; not to that only which is of the law, but to that also which is of the faith of Abraham;
710,l did see that they were in evil case, after it was said, Ye shall not minish ought from your bricks of your daily task. 
And they met Moses and Aaron, who stood in the way, as they came forth from Pharaoh: 
And they said unto them, The LORD look upon you, and judge; because ye have made our savour to be abhorred in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of his servants, to put a sword in their hand to slay us. 
And Moses returned unto the LORD, and said, LORD, wherefore hast thou so evil entreated this people? why is it that thou hast sent me? 
For since I came to Pharaoh to speak in thy name, he hath done evil to this people; neither hast thou delivered thy people at all. 
Then the LORD said unto Mose
720,end of slaying them with a very great slaughter, till they were consumed, that the rest which remained of them entered into fenced cities. 
And all the people returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in peace: none moved his tongue against any of the children of Israel. 
Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring out those five kings unto me out of the cave. 
And they did so, and brought forth those five kings unto him out of the cave, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, and the king of Eglon. 
And it came to pass, when they brought out those kings unto Joshua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said unto the captains of the men of w
946,and the day that cometh shall burn them up, saith the LORD of hosts, that it shall leave them neither root nor branch. 
But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness arise with healing in his wings; and ye shall go forth, and grow up as calves of the stall. 
And ye shall tread down the wicked; for they shall be ashes under the soles of your feet in the day that I shall do this, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Remember ye the law of Moses my servant, which I commanded unto him in Horeb for all Israel, with the statutes and judgments. 
Behold, I will send you Elijah the prophet before the coming of the great and dreadful day of the LORD: 
And he shall turn the heart of the fathers to the children, and the heart of the children to their fathers, lest I come and smite the earth with a curse. 
The book of the generation of Jesus Christ, the son of David, the son of Abraham. 
Abraham begat Isaac; and Isaac begat Jacob; and Jacob
728,m unto him. 
Samuel also said unto Saul, The LORD sent me to anoint thee to be king over his people, over Israel: now therefore hearken thou unto the voice of the words of the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I remember that which Amalek did to Israel, how he laid wait for him in the way, when he came up from Egypt. 
Now go and smite Amalek, and utterly destroy all that they have, and spare them not; but slay both man and woman, infant and suckling, ox and sheep, camel and ass. 
And Saul gathered the people together, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah. 
And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, g
833,est from their burdens. 
And Pharaoh commanded the same day the taskmasters of the people, and their officers, saying, 
Ye shall no more give the people straw to make brick, as heretofore: let them go and gather straw for themselves. 
And the tale of the bricks, which they did make heretofore, ye shall lay upon them; ye shall not diminish ought thereof: for they be idle; therefore they cry, saying, Let us go and sacrifice to our God. 
Let there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour therein; and let them not regard vain words. 
And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and they spake to the people, saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not give you straw. 
Go ye, get you straw where ye can find it: yet not ought of your work shall be diminished. 
So the people were scattered abroad through
706,es. 
Yea, brother, let me have joy of thee in the Lord: refresh my bowels in the Lord. 
Having confidence in thy obedience I wrote unto thee, knowing that thou wilt also do more than I say. 
But withal prepare me also a lodging: for I trust that through your prayers I shall be given unto you. 
There salute thee Epaphras, my fellowprisoner in Christ Jesus; 
Marcus, Aristarchus, Demas, Lucas, my fellowlabourers. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen. 
God, who at sundry times and in divers manners spake in time past unto the fathers by the prophets, 
Hath in these last days spoken unto us by his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom also he made the worlds; 
839,our houses. 
And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known unto us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other hand held a weapon. 
For the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and so builded. And he that sounded the trumpet was by me. 
And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large,
800,Timotheus; and of Asia, Tychicus and Trophimus. 
These going before tarried for us at Troas. 
And we sailed away from Philippi after the days of unleavened bread, and came unto them to Troas in five days; where we abode seven days. 
And upon the first day of the week, when the disciples came together to break bread, Paul preached unto them, ready to depart on the morrow; and continued his speech until midnight. 
And there were many lights in the upper chamber, where they were gathered together. 
And there sat in a window a certain young man named Eutychus, being fallen into a deep sleep: and as Paul was long preaching, he sunk down with sleep, and fell down from the third loft, and was taken up dead. 
And Paul went down, and fell on him, and embracing him said, Trouble not yourselves; for 
874,well among the children of Israel, and will be their God. 
And they shall know that I am the LORD their God, that brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, that I may dwell among them: I am the LORD their God. 
And thou shalt make an altar to burn incense upon: of shittim wood shalt thou make it. 
A cubit shall be the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof; foursquare shall it be: and two cubits shall be the height thereof: the horns thereof shall be of the same. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, the top thereof, and the sides thereof round about, and the horns thereof; and thou shalt make unto it a crown of gold round about. 
And two golden rings shalt thou make to it under the crown of it, by the two corners thereof, upon the two sides of it shalt thou make it; and they shall be for places for the staves to bear it withal. 
And thou shalt 
953,Jesus Christ. This is the true God, and eternal life. 
Little children, keep yourselves from idols. Amen. 
The elder unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in the truth; and not I only, but also all they that have known the truth; 
For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be with us for ever. 
Grace be with you, mercy, and peace, from God the Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love. 
I rejoiced greatly that I found of thy children walking in truth, as we have received a commandment from the Father. 
And now I beseech thee, lady, not as though I wrote a new commandment unto thee, but that which we had from the beginning, that we love one another. 
And this is love, that we walk after his commandments. This is the commandment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is com
888,ld of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
And he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had looked into the ark of the LORD, even he smote of the people fifty thousand and threescore and ten men: and the people lamented, because the LORD had smitten many of the people with a great slaughter. 
And the men of Bethshemesh said, Who is able to stand before this holy LORD God? and to whom shall he go up from us? 
And they sent messengers to the inhabitants of Kirjathjearim, saying, The Philistines have brought again the ark of the LORD; come ye down, and fetch it up to you. 
And the men of Kirjathjearim came, and fetched up the ark of the LORD, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanctified Eleazar his son to keep the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, while the ark abode in Kirjathjearim, that the time was long; for it was twenty years: and all the house of I
666,e the LORD. 
Speak, ye that ride on white asses, ye that sit in judgment, and walk by the way. 
They that are delivered from the noise of archers in the places of drawing water, there shall they rehearse the righteous acts of the LORD, even the righteous acts toward the inhabitants of his villages in Israel: then shall the people of the LORD go down to the gates. 
Awake, awake, Deborah: awake, awake, utter a song: arise, Barak, and lead thy captivity captive, thou son of Abinoam. 
Then he made him that remaineth have dominion over the nobles among the people: the LORD made me have dominion over the mighty. 
Out of Ephraim was there a root of them against Ama
714,d. 
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of cedars, with masons and carpenters, to build him an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had confirmed him king over Israel, for his kingdom was lifted up on high, because of his people Israel. 
And David took more wives at Jerusalem: and David begat more sons and daughters. 
Now these are the names of his children which he had in Jerusalem; Shammua, and Shobab, Nathan, and Solomon, 
And Ibhar, and Elishua, and Elpalet, 
And Nogah, and Nepheg, and Japhia, 
And Elishama, and Beeliada, and Eliphalet. 
And when the Philistines heard that David was anointed king over all Israel, all the Philistines went up to seek David. And David heard o
756,shall be astonished at thee: thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt thou be any more. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against Zidon, and prophesy against it, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of thee: and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be sanctified in her. 
For I will send into her pestilence, and blood into her streets; and the wounded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house of Israel, nor any grieving thorn of all that are round about th
859,th forgotten: he hideth his face; he will never see it. 
Arise, O LORD; O God, lift up thine hand: forget not the humble. 
Wherefore doth the wicked contemn God? he hath said in his heart, Thou wilt not require it. 
Thou hast seen it; for thou beholdest mischief and spite, to requite it with thy hand: the poor committeth himself unto thee; thou art the helper of the fatherless. 
Break thou the arm of the wicked and the evil man: seek out his wickedness till thou find none. 
The LORD is King for ever and ever: the heathen are perished out of his land. 
LORD, thou hast heard the desire of the humble: thou wilt prepare their heart, thou wilt cause thine ear to hear: 
To judge the fatherless and the oppressed, that the man of the earth may no more oppress. 
In the LORD put I my trust: how say ye to my soul, Flee as a bird to your mountain? 
For, lo, t
787,ecline from thy testimonies. 
I beheld the transgressors, and was grieved; because they kept not thy word. 
Consider how I love thy precepts: quicken me, O LORD, according to thy lovingkindness. 
Thy word is true from the beginning: and every one of thy righteous judgments endureth for ever. 
Princes have persecuted me without a cause: but my heart standeth in awe of thy word. 
I rejoice at thy word, as one that findeth great spoil. 
I hate and abhor lying: but thy law do I love. 
Seven times a day do I praise thee because of thy righteous judgments. 
Great peace have they which love thy law: and nothing shall offend them. 
LORD, I have hoped for thy salvation, and done thy commandments. 
My soul hath kept thy testimonies; and I love them exceedingly. 
I have kept thy precepts
920,not drive out the Jebusites that inhabited Jerusalem; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Benjamin in Jerusalem unto this day. 
And the house of Joseph, they also went up against Bethel: and the LORD was with them. 
And the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. (Now the name of the city before was Luz.) 
And the spies saw a man come forth out of the city, and they said unto him, Shew us, we pray thee, the entrance into the city, and we will shew thee mercy. 
And when he shewed them the entrance into the city, they smote the city with the edge of the sword; but they let go the man and all his family. 
And the man went into the land of the Hittites, and built a city, and called the name thereof Luz: which is the name thereof unto this day. 
Neither did Manasseh drive out the inhabitants of Bethshean and her towns, nor Taanach and her towns, nor the inhabitants of Dor and her towns, nor the inhabitan
821,eard, my belly trembled; my lips quivered at the voice: rottenness entered into my bones, and I trembled in myself, that I might rest in the day of trouble: when he cometh up unto the people, he will invade them with his troops. 
Although the fig tree shall not blossom, neither shall fruit be in the vines; the labour of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall yield no meat; the flock shall be cut off from the fold, and there shall be no herd in the stalls: 
Yet I will rejoice in the LORD, I will joy in the God of my salvation. 
The LORD God is my strength, and he will make my feet like hinds' feet, and he will make me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my stringed instruments. 
The word of the LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the so
864,bered with the LORD; and let not the sin of his mother be blotted out. 
Let them be before the LORD continually, that he may cut off the memory of them from the earth. 
Because that he remembered not to shew mercy, but persecuted the poor and needy man, that he might even slay the broken in heart. 
As he loved cursing, so let it come unto him: as he delighted not in blessing, so let it be far from him. 
As he clothed himself with cursing like as with his garment, so let it come into his bowels like water, and like oil into his bones. 
Let it be unto him as the garment which covereth him, and for a girdle wherewith he is girded continually. 
Let this be the reward of mine adversaries from the LORD, and of them that speak evil against my soul. 
But do thou for me, O GOD the Lord, for thy name's sake: because thy mercy is good, deliver thou me. 
For I am 
746, through the knowledge of God, and of Jesus our Lord, 
According as his divine power hath given unto us all things that pertain unto life and godliness, through the knowledge of him that hath called us to glory and virtue: 
Whereby are given unto us exceeding great and precious promises: that by these ye might be partakers of the divine nature, having escaped the corruption that is in the world through lust. 
And beside this, giving all diligence, add to your faith virtue; and to virtue knowledge; 
And to knowledge temperance; and to temperance patience; and to patience godliness; 
And to godliness brotherly kindness; and to brotherly kindness charity. 
For if these things be in you, and abound, they make you that ye shall neither be ba
748,oked down from the height of his sanctuary; from heaven did the LORD behold the earth; 
To hear the groaning of the prisoner; to loose those that are appointed to death; 
To declare the name of the LORD in Zion, and his praise in Jerusalem; 
When the people are gathered together, and the kingdoms, to serve the LORD. 
He weakened my strength in the way; he shortened my days. 
I said, O my God, take me not away in the midst of my days: thy years are throughout all generations. 
Of old hast thou laid the foundation of the earth: and the heavens are the work of thy hands. 
They shall perish, but thou shalt endure: yea, all of them shall wax old like a garment; as a vesture shalt thou change them, and they shall be changed: 
But thou art the s
954,people; Ephraim is a cake not turned. 
Strangers have devoured his strength, and he knoweth it not: yea, gray hairs are here and there upon him, yet he knoweth not. 
And the pride of Israel testifieth to his face: and they do not return to the LORD their God, nor seek him for all this. 
Ephraim also is like a silly dove without heart: they call to Egypt, they go to Assyria. 
When they shall go, I will spread my net upon them; I will bring them down as the fowls of the heaven; I will chastise them, as their congregation hath heard. 
Woe unto them! for they have fled from me: destruction unto them! because they have transgressed against me: though I have redeemed them, yet they have spoken lies against me. 
And they have not cried unto me with their heart, when they howled upon their beds: they assemble themselves for corn and wine, and they rebel against me. 
Though I have bound and strengthened their arms, yet do they imagine mischief again
648, his dominion by the river Euphrates. 
And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven thousand horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen: David also houghed all the chariot horses, but reserved of them an hundred chariots. 
And when the Syrians of Damascus came to help Hadarezer king of Zobah, David slew of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men. 
Then David put garrisons in Syriadamascus; and the Syrians became David's servants, and brought gifts. Thus the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadarezer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
Likewise from Tibhath, and fr
809,n you man and beast; and they shall increase and bring fruit: and I will settle you after your old estates, and will do better unto you than at your beginnings: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yea, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel; and they shall possess thee, and thou shalt be their inheritance, and thou shalt no more henceforth bereave them of men. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they say unto you, Thou land devourest up men, and hast bereaved thy nations: 
Therefore thou shalt devour men no more, neither bereave thy nations any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Neither will I cause men to hear in thee the shame of the heathen any more, neither shalt thou bear the reproach of the people any more, neither shalt thou cause thy nations to fall any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
752,nes encamped in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in the hold, and the Philistines' garrison was then at Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, that is at the gate! 
And the three brake through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but David would not drink of it, but poured it out to the LORD. 
And said, My God forbid it me, that I should do this thing: shall I drink the blood of these men that have put their lives in jeopardy? for with the jeopardy of their lives they brought it. Therefore he would not drink it. These things did these three mightiest. 
And Abishai th
803,ghters, crying, Give, give. There are three things that are never satisfied, yea, four things say not, It is enough: 
The grave; and the barren womb; the earth that is not filled with water; and the fire that saith not, It is enough. 
The eye that mocketh at his father, and despiseth to obey his mother, the ravens of the valley shall pick it out, and the young eagles shall eat it. 
There be three things which are too wonderful for me, yea, four which I know not: 
The way of an eagle in the air; the way of a serpent upon a rock; the way of a ship in the midst of the sea; and the way of a man with a maid. 
Such is the way of an adulterous woman; she eateth, and wipeth her mouth, and saith, I have done no wickedness. 
For three things the earth is disquieted, and for four which it cannot bear: 

850, my God, and in whom is the spirit of the holy gods: and before him I told the dream, saying, 
O Belteshazzar, master of the magicians, because I know that the spirit of the holy gods is in thee, and no secret troubleth thee, tell me the visions of my dream that I have seen, and the interpretation thereof. 
Thus were the visions of mine head in my bed; I saw, and behold a tree in the midst of the earth, and the height thereof was great. 
The tree grew, and was strong, and the height thereof reached unto heaven, and the sight thereof to the end of all the earth: 
The leaves thereof were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was meat for all: the beasts of the field had shadow under it, and the fowls of the heaven dwelt in the boughs thereof, and all flesh was fed of it. 
I saw in the visions of my head upon my bed, and, behold, a wat
779,ow they might destroy him. 
But when Jesus knew it, he withdrew himself from thence: and great multitudes followed him, and he healed them all; 
And charged them that they should not make him known: 
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying, 
Behold my servant, whom I have chosen; my beloved, in whom my soul is well pleased: I will put my spirit upon him, and he shall shew judgment to the Gentiles. 
He shall not strive, nor cry; neither shall any man hear his voice in the streets. 
A bruised reed shall he not break, and smoking flax shall he not quench, till he send forth judgment unto victory. 
And in his name shall the Gentiles trust. 
Then was brought unto him one possessed with a devil, blind, and dumb: and he healed him, insomuch t
820,eth for the things of the world, how she may please her husband. 
And this I speak for your own profit; not that I may cast a snare upon you, but for that which is comely, and that ye may attend upon the Lord without distraction. 
But if any man think that he behaveth himself uncomely toward his virgin, if she pass the flower of her age, and need so require, let him do what he will, he sinneth not: let them marry. 
Nevertheless he that standeth stedfast in his heart, having no necessity, but hath power over his own will, and hath so decreed in his heart that he will keep his virgin, doeth well. 
So then he that giveth her in marriage doeth well; but he that giveth her not in marriage doeth better. 
The wife is bound by the law as long as her husband liveth; but if her husband be dead, she is at liberty to be 
883,e heathen that are round about you. 
And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the son of Benaiah died. Then fell I down upon my face, and cried with a loud voice, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou make a full end of the remnant of Israel? 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, thy brethren, even thy brethren, the men of thy kindred, and all the house of Israel wholly, are they unto whom the inhabitants of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from the LORD: unto us is this land given in possession. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Although I have cast them far off among the heathen, and although I have scattered them among the countries, yet will I be to them as a little sanctuary in the countries where they shall come. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even gather you from the people, and assemble you out of the count
742,unto her, as they go in unto a woman that playeth the harlot: so went they in unto Aholah and unto Aholibah, the lewd women. 
And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of adulteresses, and after the manner of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will bring up a company upon them, and will give them to be removed and spoiled. 
And the company shall stone them with stones, and dispatch them with their swords; they shall slay their sons and their daughters, and burn up their houses with fire. 
Thus will I cause lewdness to cease out of the land, that all women may be taught not to do after your lewdness. 
And they shall recompense your lew
871,desire of the slothful killeth him; for his hands refuse to labour. 
He coveteth greedily all the day long: but the righteous giveth and spareth not. 
The sacrifice of the wicked is abomination: how much more, when he bringeth it with a wicked mind? 
A false witness shall perish: but the man that heareth speaketh constantly. 
A wicked man hardeneth his face: but as for the upright, he directeth his way. 
There is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the LORD. 
The horse is prepared against the day of battle: but safety is of the LORD. 
A GOOD name is rather to be chosen than great riches, and loving favour rather than silver and gold. 
The rich and poor meet together: the LORD is the maker of them all. 
A prudent man foreseeth the evil, and hideth himself: but the simple pass on, and are punished. 
By humility and the fear of the LORD are riches, a
801,o day, and to morrow, and the day following: for it cannot be that a prophet perish out of Jerusalem. 
O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, which killest the prophets, and stonest them that are sent unto thee; how often would I have gathered thy children together, as a hen doth gather her brood under her wings, and ye would not! 
Behold, your house is left unto you desolate: and verily I say unto you, Ye shall not see me, until the time come when ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord. 
And it came to pass, as he went into the house of one of the chief Pharisees to eat bread on the sabbath day, that they watched him. 
And, behold, there was a certain man before him which had the dropsy. 
And Jesus answering spake unto the lawyers and Pharisees, saying, Is it lawful to heal on th
899,cities thereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining, according to all that he had done to Eglon; but destroyed it utterly, and all the souls that were therein. 
And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to Debir; and fought against it: 
And he took it, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof; and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and utterly destroyed all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir, and to the king thereof; as he had done also to Libnah, and to her king. 
So Joshua smote all the country of the hills, and of the south, and of the vale, and of the springs, and all their kings: he left none remaining, but utterly destroyed all that breathed, as the LORD God of Israel commanded. 
And Joshua smote them from Kadeshbarnea even unto Gaza, and all the country of Goshen, even unto
865,onounced all this great evil against us? or what is our iniquity? or what is our sin that we have committed against the LORD our God? 
Then shalt thou say unto them, Because your fathers have forsaken me, saith the LORD, and have walked after other gods, and have served them, and have worshipped them, and have forsaken me, and have not kept my law; 
And ye have done worse than your fathers; for, behold, ye walk every one after the imagination of his evil heart, that they may not hearken unto me: 
Therefore will I cast you out of this land into a land that ye know not, neither ye nor your fathers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I will not shew you favour. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be said, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt; 
But, The LO
732,cho, saying, Behold, there came men in hither to night of the children of Israel to search out the country. 
And the king of Jericho sent unto Rahab, saying, Bring forth the men that are come to thee, which are entered into thine house: for they be come to search out all the country. 
And the woman took the two men, and hid them, and said thus, There came men unto me, but I wist not whence they were: 
And it came to pass about the time of shutting of the gate, when it was dark, that the men went out: whither the men went I wot not: pursue after them quickly; for ye shall overtake them. 
But she had brought them up to the roof of the house, and hid them with the stalks of flax, which she had laid in order upon the roof. 
An
721,e horns which have scattered Judah, Israel, and Jerusalem. 
And the LORD shewed me four carpenters. 
Then said I, What come these to do? And he spake, saying, These are the horns which have scattered Judah, so that no man did lift up his head: but these are come to fray them, to cast out the horns of the Gentiles, which lifted up their horn over the land of Judah to scatter it. 
I lifted up mine eyes again, and looked, and behold a man with a measuring line in his hand. 
Then said I, Whither goest thou? And he said unto me, To measure Jerusalem, to see what is the breadth thereof, and what is the length thereof. 
And, behold, the angel that talked with me went forth, and another angel went out to meet him, 
And 
823, and though she should fortify the height of her strength, yet from me shall spoilers come unto her, saith the LORD. 
A sound of a cry cometh from Babylon, and great destruction from the land of the Chaldeans: 
Because the LORD hath spoiled Babylon, and destroyed out of her the great voice; when her waves do roar like great waters, a noise of their voice is uttered: 
Because the spoiler is come upon her, even upon Babylon, and her mighty men are taken, every one of their bows is broken: for the LORD God of recompences shall surely requite. 
And I will make drunk her princes, and her wise men, her captains, and her rulers, and her mighty men: and they shall sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The broad walls of Babylon shall be utt
742,s. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be established for ever. 
The rod and reproof give wisdom: but a child left to himself bringeth his mother to shame. 
When the wicked are multiplied, transgression increaseth: but the righteous shall see their fall. 
Correct thy son, and he shall give thee rest; yea, he shall give delight unto thy soul. 
Where there is no vision, the people perish: but he that keepeth the law, happy is he. 
A servant will not be corrected by words: for though he understand he will not answer. 
Seest thou a man that is hasty in his words? there is 
905, of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping things. 
Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves: 
Who changed the truth of God into a lie, and worshipped and served the creature more than the Creator, who is blessed for ever. Amen. 
For this cause God gave them up unto vile affections: for even their women did change the natural use into that which is against nature: 
And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet. 
And even as they did not like to retain God in their knowledge, God gave them over to a reprobate mind, to do those things which are not co
765,ir captain: howbeit he attained not unto the first three. 
And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man, of Kabzeel, who had done many acts, he slew two lionlike men of Moab: he went down also and slew a lion in the midst of a pit in time of snow: 
And he slew an Egyptian, a goodly man: and the Egyptian had a spear in his hand; but he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name among three mighty men. 
He was more honourable than the thirty, but he attained not to the first three. And David set him over his guard. 
Asahel the brother of Joab was one of the thirty; Elhanan the son of Dodo of Bethlehem, 
Shammah 
689,and my lips shall utter knowledge clearly. 
The spirit of God hath made me, and the breath of the Almighty hath given me life. 
If thou canst answer me, set thy words in order before me, stand up. 
Behold, I am according to thy wish in God's stead: I also am formed out of the clay. 
Behold, my terror shall not make thee afraid, neither shall my hand be heavy upon thee. 
Surely thou hast spoken in mine hearing, and I have heard the voice of thy words, saying, 
I am clean without transgression, I am innocent; neither is there iniquity in me. 
Behold, he findeth occasions against me, he counteth me for his enemy, 
He putteth my feet in the stocks, he marketh all my paths. 
Behold, in
936,And upon this came his disciples, and marvelled that he talked with the woman: yet no man said, What seekest thou? or, Why talkest thou with her? 
The woman then left her waterpot, and went her way into the city, and saith to the men, 
Come, see a man, which told me all things that ever I did: is not this the Christ? 
Then they went out of the city, and came unto him. 
In the mean while his disciples prayed him, saying, Master, eat. 
But he said unto them, I have meat to eat that ye know not of. 
Therefore said the disciples one to another, Hath any man brought him ought to eat? 
Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the will of him that sent me, and to finish his work. 
Say not ye, There are yet four months, and then cometh harvest? behold, I say unto you, Lift up your eyes, and look on the fields; for they are white already to harvest. 
And he that reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal: that bo
870,, I beseech thee, let now thine ear be attentive to the prayer of thy servant, and to the prayer of thy servants, who desire to fear thy name: and prosper, I pray thee, thy servant this day, and grant him mercy in the sight of this man. For I was the king's cupbearer. 
And it came to pass in the month Nisan, in the twentieth year of Artaxerxes the king, that wine was before him: and I took up the wine, and gave it unto the king. Now I had not been beforetime sad in his presence. 
Wherefore the king said unto me, Why is thy countenance sad, seeing thou art not sick? this is nothing else but sorrow of heart. Then I was very sore afraid, 
And said unto the king, Let the king live for ever: why should not my countenance be sad, when the city, the place of my fathers' sepulchres, lieth waste, and the gates thereof are consumed with fire? 
Then the king said unto 
696,ng, and said, Amen: the LORD God of my lord the king say so too. 
As the LORD hath been with my lord the king, even so be he with Solomon, and make his throne greater than the throne of my lord king David. 
So Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites, and the Pelethites, went down, and caused Solomon to ride upon king David's mule, and brought him to Gihon. 
And Zadok the priest took an horn of oil out of the tabernacle, and anointed Solomon. And they blew the trumpet; and all the people said, God save king Solomon. 
And all the people came up after him, and the people piped with pipes, and rejoiced with great joy, so that the earth r
669,ieve, though it be told you. 
For, lo, I raise up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation, which shall march through the breadth of the land, to possess the dwellingplaces that are not their's. 
They are terrible and dreadful: their judgment and their dignity shall proceed of themselves. 
Their horses also are swifter than the leopards, and are more fierce than the evening wolves: and their horsemen shall spread themselves, and their horsemen shall come from far; they shall fly as the eagle that hasteth to eat. 
They shall come all for violence: their faces shall sup up as the east wind, and they shall gather the captivity as the sand. 
And they shall scoff
726, Ye shall be made free? 
Jesus answered them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whosoever committeth sin is the servant of sin. 
And the servant abideth not in the house for ever: but the Son abideth ever. 
If the Son therefore shall make you free, ye shall be free indeed. 
I know that ye are Abraham's seed; but ye seek to kill me, because my word hath no place in you. 
I speak that which I have seen with my Father: and ye do that which ye have seen with your father. 
They answered and said unto him, Abraham is our father. Jesus saith unto them, If ye were Abraham's children, ye would do the works of Abraham. 
But now ye seek to kill me, a man that hath told you the truth, which I have heard of God: this did not Abraha
792, dieth the other; yea, they have all one breath; so that a man hath no preeminence above a beast: for all is vanity. 
All go unto one place; all are of the dust, and all turn to dust again. 
Who knoweth the spirit of man that goeth upward, and the spirit of the beast that goeth downward to the earth? 
Wherefore I perceive that there is nothing better, than that a man should rejoice in his own works; for that is his portion: for who shall bring him to see what shall be after him? 
So I returned, and considered all the oppressions that are done under the sun: and behold the tears of such as were oppressed, and they had no comforter; and on the side of their oppressors there was power; but they had no comforter. 
Wherefore I praised the dead which are already dead more than the living
856,y a long time, in making war against it to take it, thou shalt not destroy the trees thereof by forcing an axe against them: for thou mayest eat of them, and thou shalt not cut them down (for the tree of the field is man's life) to employ them in the siege: 
Only the trees which thou knowest that they be not trees for meat, thou shalt destroy and cut them down; and thou shalt build bulwarks against the city that maketh war with thee, until it be subdued. 
If one be found slain in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it, lying in the field, and it be not known who hath slain him: 
Then thy elders and thy judges shall come forth, and they shall measure unto the cities which are round about him that is slain: 
And it shall be, that the city which is next unto the slain man, even the elders of that city shall take an heifer, which
883,ty and six. All these men were chief of the fathers in the house of their fathers. 
And of the priests; Jedaiah, and Jehoiarib, and Jachin, 
And Azariah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, the ruler of the house of God; 
And Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pashur, the son of Malchijah, and Maasiai the son of Adiel, the son of Jahzerah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Meshillemith, the son of Immer; 
And their brethren, heads of the house of their fathers, a thousand and seven hundred and threescore; very able men for the work of the service of the house of God. 
And of the Levites; Shemaiah the son of Hasshub, the son of Azrikam, the son of Hashabiah, of the sons of Merari; 
And Bakbakkar, Heresh, and Galal, and Mattaniah the son of Micah, the son of Zichri, the son of Asaph; 
And Obadiah the son of S
891,on the fruit of the womb; their eyes shall not spare children. 
And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees' excellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah. 
It shall never be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation: neither shall the Arabian pitch tent there; neither shall the shepherds make their fold there. 
But wild beasts of the desert shall lie there; and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures; and owls shall dwell there, and satyrs shall dance there. 
And the wild beasts of the islands shall cry in their desolate houses, and dragons in their pleasant palaces: and her time is near to come, and her days shall not be prolonged. 
For the LORD will have mercy on Jacob, and will yet choose Israel, and set them in their own land: and the strangers shall be joined with them, and they shall cleave to the hous
704,elves. Selah. 
As for the head of those that compass me about, let the mischief of their own lips cover them. 
Let burning coals fall upon them: let them be cast into the fire; into deep pits, that they rise not up again. 
Let not an evil speaker be established in the earth: evil shall hunt the violent man to overthrow him. 
I know that the LORD will maintain the cause of the afflicted, and the right of the poor. 
Surely the righteous shall give thanks unto thy name: the upright shall dwell in thy presence. 
Lord, I cry unto thee: make haste unto me; give ear unto my voice, when I cry unto thee. 
Let my prayer be set forth before thee as incense; and the lifting up of my hands as the evening sac
672,ty. 
He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret places doth he murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against the poor. 
He lieth in wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait to catch the poor: he doth catch the poor, when he draweth him into his net. 
He croucheth, and humbleth himself, that the poor may fall by his strong ones. 
He hath said in his heart, God hath forgotten: he hideth his face; he will never see it. 
Arise, O LORD; O God, lift up thine hand: forget not the humble. 
Wherefore doth the wicked contemn God? he hath said in his heart, Thou wilt not require it. 
Thou hast seen it; for thou beholdest mischief and 
927, shall sit and rule upon his throne; and he shall be a priest upon his throne: and the counsel of peace shall be between them both. 
And the crowns shall be to Helem, and to Tobijah, and to Jedaiah, and to Hen the son of Zephaniah, for a memorial in the temple of the LORD. 
And they that are far off shall come and build in the temple of the LORD, and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto you. And this shall come to pass, if ye will diligently obey the voice of the LORD your God. 
And it came to pass in the fourth year of king Darius, that the word of the LORD came unto Zechariah in the fourth day of the ninth month, even in Chisleu; 
When they had sent unto the house of God Sherezer and Regemmelech, and their men, to pray before the LORD, 
And to speak unto the priests which were in the house of the LORD of hosts, and to the prophets, saying, Should I weep in the fifth month, separating myself, as
850,d instruction, and my heart despised reproof; 
And have not obeyed the voice of my teachers, nor inclined mine ear to them that instructed me! 
I was almost in all evil in the midst of the congregation and assembly. 
Drink waters out of thine own cistern, and running waters out of thine own well. 
Let thy fountains be dispersed abroad, and rivers of waters in the streets. 
Let them be only thine own, and not strangers' with thee. 
Let thy fountain be blessed: and rejoice with the wife of thy youth. 
Let her be as the loving hind and pleasant roe; let her breasts satisfy thee at all times; and be thou ravished always with her love. 
And why wilt thou, my son, be ravished with a strange woman, and embrace the bosom of a stranger? 
For the ways of man are before the eyes of the LORD, and he pondereth all his goings. 
His own iniquities shall
853,o Peter, Put up thy sword into the sheath: the cup which my Father hath given me, shall I not drink it? 
Then the band and the captain and officers of the Jews took Jesus, and bound him, 
And led him away to Annas first; for he was father in law to Caiaphas, which was the high priest that same year. 
Now Caiaphas was he, which gave counsel to the Jews, that it was expedient that one man should die for the people. 
And Simon Peter followed Jesus, and so did another disciple: that disciple was known unto the high priest, and went in with Jesus into the palace of the high priest. 
But Peter stood at the door without. Then went out that other disciple, which was known unto the high priest, and spake unto her that kept the door, and brought in Peter. 
Then saith the damsel that kept the door unto Peter, Art not thou also one of this man's discipl
910,Levites, the sons of Zadok, that kept the charge of my sanctuary when the children of Israel went astray from me, they shall come near to me to minister unto me, and they shall stand before me to offer unto me the fat and the blood, saith the Lord GOD: 
They shall enter into my sanctuary, and they shall come near to my table, to minister unto me, and they shall keep my charge. 
And it shall come to pass, that when they enter in at the gates of the inner court, they shall be clothed with linen garments; and no wool shall come upon them, whiles they minister in the gates of the inner court, and within. 
They shall have linen bonnets upon their heads, and shall have linen breeches upon their loins; they shall not gird themselves with any thing that causeth sweat. 
And when they go forth into the utter court, even into the utter court to the people, they shall put off their garments wherein they minis
853,ments, which I command thee, thou, and thy son, and thy son's son, all the days of thy life; and that thy days may be prolonged. 
Hear therefore, O Israel, and observe to do it; that it may be well with thee, and that ye may increase mightily, as the LORD God of thy fathers hath promised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. 
And these words, which I command thee this day, shall be in thine heart: 
And thou shalt teach them diligently unto thy children, and shalt talk of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt bind them for a sign upon thine hand, and they shall be as frontlets 
703,Jesus answered, Neither hath this man sinned, nor his parents: but that the works of God should be made manifest in him. 
I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is day: the night cometh, when no man can work. 
As long as I am in the world, I am the light of the world. 
When he had thus spoken, he spat on the ground, and made clay of the spittle, and he anointed the eyes of the blind man with the clay, 
And said unto him, Go, wash in the pool of Siloam, (which is by interpretation, Sent.) He went his way therefore, and washed, and came seeing. 
The neighbours therefore, and they which before had seen him that he was blind, said, Is not this he that sat and begged? 
Some said, This i
651,itters, and upon mules, and upon swift beasts, to my holy mountain Jerusalem, saith the LORD, as the children of Israel bring an offering in a clean vessel into the house of the LORD. 
And I will also take of them for priests and for Levites, saith the LORD. 
For as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will make, shall remain before me, saith the LORD, so shall your seed and your name remain. 
And it shall come to pass, that from one new moon to another, and from one sabbath to another, shall all flesh come to worship before me, saith the LORD. 
And they shall go forth, and look upon the carcases of the men that have transgressed against
712,The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom thou slewest in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a cloth behind the ephod: if thou wilt take that, take it: for there is no other save that here. And David said, There is none like that; give it me. 
And David arose and fled that day for fear of Saul, and went to Achish the king of Gath. 
And the servants of Achish said unto him, Is not this David the king of the land? did they not sing one to another of him in dances, saying, Saul hath slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands? 
And David laid up these words in his heart, and was sore afraid of Achish the king of Gath. 
And he changed his behaviour before them, and feigned himself mad in
849,son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of Eliakim, 
Which was the son of Melea, which was the son of Menan, which was the son of Mattatha, which was the son of Nathan, which was the son of David, 
Which was the son of Jesse, which was the son of Obed, which was the son of Booz, which was the son of Salmon, which was the son of Naasson, 
Which was the son of Aminadab, which was the son of Aram, which was the son of Esrom, which was the son of Phares, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Jacob, which was the son of Isaac, which was the son of Abraham, which was the son of Thara, which was the son of Nachor, 
Which was the son of Saruch, which was the son of Ragau, which was the son of Phalec, which was the son of Heber, which was the son of Sala, 
Which was the son of Cainan, which was the son of Arphaxad,
872, doings; if ye throughly execute judgment between a man and his neighbour; 
If ye oppress not the stranger, the fatherless, and the widow, and shed not innocent blood in this place, neither walk after other gods to your hurt: 
Then will I cause you to dwell in this place, in the land that I gave to your fathers, for ever and ever. 
Behold, ye trust in lying words, that cannot profit. 
Will ye steal, murder, and commit adultery, and swear falsely, and burn incense unto Baal, and walk after other gods whom ye know not; 
And come and stand before me in this house, which is called by my name, and say, We are delivered to do all these abominations? 
Is this house, which is called by my name, become a den of robbers in your eyes? Behold, even I have seen it, saith the LORD. 
But go ye now unto my place which was in Shiloh, where I set my name at the first, and see w
725,thy father, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctuary and the altar, that neither they, nor ye also, die. 
And they shall be joined unto thee, and keep the charge of the tabernacle of the congregation, for all the service of the tabernacle: and a stranger shall not come nigh unto you. 
And ye shall keep the charge of the sanctuary, and the charge of the altar: that there be no wrath any more upon the children of Israel. 
And I, behold, I have taken your brethren the Levi
887, of the men of the people of Israel was this; 
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Arah, six hundred fifty and two. 
The children of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, two thousand and eight hundred and eighteen. 
The children of Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Zattu, eight hundred forty and five. 
The children of Zaccai, seven hundred and threescore. 
The children of Binnui, six hundred forty and eight. 
The children of Bebai, six hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of Azgad, two thousand three hundred twenty and two. 
The children of Adonikam, six hundred threescore and seven. 
The children of Bigvai, two thousand threescore and seven. 
The children of Adin, six hundred fifty and five. 
The children of Ater of Hezekiah, ni
819,ome on thee, and overtake thee, if thou shalt hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God. 
Blessed shalt thou be in the city, and blessed shalt thou be in the field. 
Blessed shall be the fruit of thy body, and the fruit of thy ground, and the fruit of thy cattle, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep. 
Blessed shall be thy basket and thy store. 
Blessed shalt thou be when thou comest in, and blessed shalt thou be when thou goest out. 
The LORD shall cause thine enemies that rise up against thee to be smitten before thy face: they shall come out against thee one way, and flee before thee seven ways. 
The LORD shall command the blessing upon thee in thy storehouses, and in all that thou settest thine hand unto; and he shall bless thee in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
The LORD s
662,ighty men of valour; and were reckoned by their genealogies twenty and two thousand and thirty and four. 
And the sons of Becher; Zemira, and Joash, and Eliezer, and Elioenai, and Omri, and Jerimoth, and Abiah, and Anathoth, and Alameth. All these are the sons of Becher. 
And the number of them, after their genealogy by their generations, heads of the house of their fathers, mighty men of valour, was twenty thousand and two hundred. 
The sons also of Jediael; Bilhan: and the sons of Bilhan; Jeush, and Benjamin, and Ehud, and Chenaanah, and Zethan, and Tharshish, and Ahishahar. 
All these the sons of Jediael, by the heads of their fathers, mighty men of v
694,u shalt surely clothe thee with them all, as with an ornament, and bind them on thee, as a bride doeth. 
For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy destruction, shall even now be too narrow by reason of the inhabitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these, seeing I have lost my children, and am desolate, a captive, and removing to and fro? and who hath brought up these? Behold, I was left alone; these, where had they been? 
Thus
741,saying, Keep all the commandments which I command you this day. 
And it shall be on the day when ye shall pass over Jordan unto the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee, that thou shalt set thee up great stones, and plaister them with plaister: 
And thou shalt write upon them all the words of this law, when thou art passed over, that thou mayest go in unto the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee, a land that floweth with milk and honey; as the LORD God of thy fathers hath promised thee. 
Therefore it shall be when ye be gone over Jordan, that ye shall set up these stones, which I command you this day, in mount Ebal, and thou shalt plaister them with plaister. 
And there shalt thou build an altar unto the LORD thy God, an alt
694,ut without a parable spake he not unto them: and when they were alone, he expounded all things to his disciples. 
And the same day, when the even was come, he saith unto them, Let us pass over unto the other side. 
And when they had sent away the multitude, they took him even as he was in the ship. And there were also with him other little ships. 
And there arose a great storm of wind, and the waves beat into the ship, so that it was now full. 
And he was in the hinder part of the ship, asleep on a pillow: and they awake him, and say unto him, Master, carest thou not that we perish? 
And he arose, and rebuked the wind, and said unto the sea, Peace, be still. And the wind ceased, and th
823,he river, until there be not one small stone found there. 
And Absalom and all the men of Israel said, The counsel of Hushai the Archite is better than the counsel of Ahithophel. For the LORD had appointed to defeat the good counsel of Ahithophel, to the intent that the LORD might bring evil upon Absalom. 
Then said Hushai unto Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, Thus and thus did Ahithophel counsel Absalom and the elders of Israel; and thus and thus have I counselled. 
Now therefore send quickly, and tell David, saying, Lodge not this night in the plains of the wilderness, but speedily pass over; lest the king be swallowed up, and all the people that are with him. 
Now Jonathan and Ahimaaz stayed by Enrogel; for they might not be seen to come into the city: and a wench went and told them; and they went and told 
762,
Defile not therefore the land which ye shall inhabit, wherein I dwell: for I the LORD dwell among the children of Israel. 
And the chief fathers of the families of the children of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, of the families of the sons of Joseph, came near, and spake before Moses, and before the princes, the chief fathers of the children of Israel: 
And they said, The LORD commanded my lord to give the land for an inheritance by lot to the children of Israel: and my lord was commanded by the LORD to give the inheritance of Zelophehad our brother unto his daughters. 
And if they be married to any of the sons of the other tribes of the children of Israel, then shall their inheritance be taken from the inheritance of our fathers, and 
713,le things. 
O LORD, my strength, and my fortress, and my refuge in the day of affliction, the Gentiles shall come unto thee from the ends of the earth, and shall say, Surely our fathers have inherited lies, vanity, and things wherein there is no profit. 
Shall a man make gods unto himself, and they are no gods? 
Therefore, behold, I will this once cause them to know, I will cause them to know mine hand and my might; and they shall know that my name is The LORD. 
The sin of Judah is written with a pen of iron, and with the point of a diamond: it is graven upon the table of their heart, and upon the horns of your altars; 
Whilst their children remember their altars and their groves by the green trees upon 
696,n Martha, as soon as she heard that Jesus was coming, went and met him: but Mary sat still in the house. 
Then said Martha unto Jesus, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died. 
But I know, that even now, whatsoever thou wilt ask of God, God will give it thee. 
Jesus saith unto her, Thy brother shall rise again. 
Martha saith unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the resurrection at the last day. 
Jesus said unto her, I am the resurrection, and the life: he that believeth in me, though he were dead, yet shall he live: 
And whosoever liveth and believeth in me shall never die. Believest thou this? 
She saith unto him, Yea, Lord: I believe that thou art the Christ, the
642,of Dor in the coast of Dor, one; the king of the nations of Gilgal, one; 
The king of Tirzah, one: all the kings thirty and one. 
Now Joshua was old and stricken in years; and the LORD said unto him, Thou art old and stricken in years, and there remaineth yet very much land to be possessed. 
This is the land that yet remaineth: all the borders of the Philistines, and all Geshuri, 
From Sihor, which is before Egypt, even unto the borders of Ekron northward, which is counted to the Canaanite: five lords of the Philistines; the Gazathites, and the Ashdothites, the Eshkalonites, the Gittites, and the Ekronites; also the Avites: 
From the 
759, of glory: 
Receiving the end of your faith, even the salvation of your souls. 
Of which salvation the prophets have enquired and searched diligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you: 
Searching what, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which was in them did signify, when it testified beforehand the sufferings of Christ, and the glory that should follow. 
Unto whom it was revealed, that not unto themselves, but unto us they did minister the things, which are now reported unto you by them that have preached the gospel unto you with the Holy Ghost sent down from heaven; which things the angels desire to look into. 
Wherefore gird up the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to the end for the grace that is to be brought 
932,e? or to thy faithfulness round about thee? 
Thou rulest the raging of the sea: when the waves thereof arise, thou stillest them. 
Thou hast broken Rahab in pieces, as one that is slain; thou hast scattered thine enemies with thy strong arm. 
The heavens are thine, the earth also is thine: as for the world and the fulness thereof, thou hast founded them. 
The north and the south thou hast created them: Tabor and Hermon shall rejoice in thy name. 
Thou hast a mighty arm: strong is thy hand, and high is thy right hand. 
Justice and judgment are the habitation of thy throne: mercy and truth shall go before thy face. 
Blessed is the people that know the joyful sound: they shall walk, O LORD, in the light of thy countenance. 
In thy name shall they rejoice all the day: and in thy righteousness shall they be exalted. 
For thou art the glory of their strength: and in thy favour our horn shall be exalted. 
For the LORD is our 
804,that he himself also is compassed with infirmity. 
And by reason hereof he ought, as for the people, so also for himself, to offer for sins. 
And no man taketh this honour unto himself, but he that is called of God, as was Aaron. 
So also Christ glorified not himself to be made an high priest; but he that said unto him, Thou art my Son, to day have I begotten thee. 
As he saith also in another place, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec. 
Who in the days of his flesh, when he had offered up prayers and supplications with strong crying and tears unto him that was able to save him from death, and was heard in that he feared; 
Though he were a Son, yet learned he obedience by the things which he suffered; 
And being made perfect, he became the author of eternal salvation unto
873, shall choose. 
His soul shall dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the earth. 
The secret of the LORD is with them that fear him; and he will shew them his covenant. 
Mine eyes are ever toward the LORD; for he shall pluck my feet out of the net. 
Turn thee unto me, and have mercy upon me; for I am desolate and afflicted. 
The troubles of my heart are enlarged: O bring thou me out of my distresses. 
Look upon mine affliction and my pain; and forgive all my sins. 
Consider mine enemies; for they are many; and they hate me with cruel hatred. 
O keep my soul, and deliver me: let me not be ashamed; for I put my trust in thee. 
Let integrity and uprightness preserve me; for I wait on thee. 
Redeem Israel, O God, out of all his troubles. 
Judge me, O LORD; for I have walked in mine integrity: I have trusted also in the LORD; therefore I shall not slide. 
Examine
835,the sword: they shall be a portion for foxes. 
But the king shall rejoice in God; every one that sweareth by him shall glory: but the mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped. 
Hear my voice, O God, in my prayer: preserve my life from fear of the enemy. 
Hide me from the secret counsel of the wicked; from the insurrection of the workers of iniquity: 
Who whet their tongue like a sword, and bend their bows to shoot their arrows, even bitter words: 
That they may shoot in secret at the perfect: suddenly do they shoot at him, and fear not. 
They encourage themselves in an evil matter: they commune of laying snares privily; they say, Who shall see them? 
They search out iniquities; they accomplish a diligent search: both the inward thought of every one of them, and the heart, is deep. 
But God shall shoot at them with an 
829,ft in the land. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall even be for briers and thorns. 
With arrows and with bows shall men come thither; because all the land shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there shall not come thither the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading of lesser cattle. 
Moreover the LORD said unto me, Take thee a great roll, and write in it with a man's pen concerning Mahershalalhashbaz. 
And I took unto me faithful witnesses to record, Uriah the priest, and Zechariah the son of Jeberechiah. 
And I went unto the prophetess; and she conceived, and bare a son. Then said the LORD to me, Call his name Mah
910,ned: burnt offering and sin offering hast thou not required. 
Then said I, Lo, I come: in the volume of the book it is written of me, 
I delight to do thy will, O my God: yea, thy law is within my heart. 
I have preached righteousness in the great congregation: lo, I have not refrained my lips, O LORD, thou knowest. 
I have not hid thy righteousness within my heart; I have declared thy faithfulness and thy salvation: I have not concealed thy lovingkindness and thy truth from the great congregation. 
Withhold not thou thy tender mercies from me, O LORD: let thy lovingkindness and thy truth continually preserve me. 
For innumerable evils have compassed me about: mine iniquities have taken hold upon me, so that I am not able to look up; they are more than the hairs of mine head: therefore my heart faileth me. 
Be pleased, O LORD, to deliver me: O LORD, make haste to help me. 
Let them be ashamed and 
801,o. 
Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they may not understand one another's speech. 
So the LORD scattered them abroad from thence upon the face of all the earth: and they left off to build the city. 
Therefore is the name of it called Babel; because the LORD did there confound the language of all the earth: and from thence did the LORD scatter them abroad upon the face of all the earth. 
These are the generations of Shem: Shem was an hundred years old, and begat Arphaxad two years after the flood: 
And Shem lived after he begat Arphaxad five hundred years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Arphaxad lived five and thirty years, and begat Salah: 
And Arphaxad lived after he begat Salah four hundred and three years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Salah lived 
770,ers at the gates of the house of the LORD, that none which was unclean in any thing should enter in. 
And he took the captains of hundreds, and the nobles, and the governors of the people, and all the people of the land, and brought down the king from the house of the LORD: and they came through the high gate into the king's house, and set the king upon the throne of the kingdom. 
And all the people of the land rejoiced: and the city was quiet, after that they had slain Athaliah with the sword. 
Joash was seven years old when he began to reign, and he reigned forty years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Zibiah of Beersheba. 
And Joash did that which was right in the sight of the LORD all the days of Jehoiada the priest. 
And Jehoiada took for him two w
663,ants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation. 
The king answered and said to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone from me: if ye will not make known unto me the dream, with the interpretation thereof, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses shall be made a dunghill. 
But if ye shew the dream, and the interpretation thereof, ye shall receive of me gifts and rewards and great honour: therefore shew me the dream, and the interpretation thereof. 
They answered again and said, Let the king tell his servants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation of it. 
The king answered and said, I know of certainty that ye would gain the time, because ye see th
757, suburbs, and Eshtemoa with her suburbs, 
And Holon with her suburbs, and Debir with her suburbs, 
And Ain with her suburbs, and Juttah with her suburbs, and Bethshemesh with her suburbs; nine cities out of those two tribes. 
And out of the tribe of Benjamin, Gibeon with her suburbs, Geba with her suburbs, 
Anathoth with her suburbs, and Almon with her suburbs; four cities. 
All the cities of the children of Aaron, the priests, were thirteen cities with their suburbs. 
And the families of the children of Kohath, the Levites which remained of the children of Kohath, even they had the cities of their lot out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
For they gave them Shechem with her suburbs in mount Ephraim, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Gezer with h
956,. 
And they brought it. And he saith unto them, Whose is this image and superscription? And they said unto him, Caesar's. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Render to Caesar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's. And they marvelled at him. 
Then come unto him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and dying left no seed. 
And the second took her, and died, neither left he any seed: and the third likewise. 
And the seven had her, and left no seed: last of all the woman died also. 
In the resurrection therefore, when they shall rise, whose wife shall she be of them? for the seven had her to wife. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Do y
657,merchants received the linen yarn at a price. 
And a chariot came up and went out of Egypt for six hundred shekels of silver, and an horse for an hundred and fifty: and so for all the kings of the Hittites, and for the kings of Syria, did they bring them out by their means. 
But king Solomon loved many strange women, together with the daughter of Pharaoh, women of the Moabites, Ammonites, Edomites, Zidonians, and Hittites: 
Of the nations concerning which the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall not go in to them, neither shall they come in unto you: for surely they will turn away your heart after their gods: Solomon clave unto these in l
759,eph's hand; and he knew not ought he had, save the bread which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly person, and well favoured. 
And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me. 
But he refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my master wotteth not what is with me in the house, and he hath committed all that he hath to my hand; 
There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then can I do this great wickedness, and sin against God? 
And it came to pass, as she spake to Joseph day by day, that he hearkened not unto her, to lie by her, or to be with her. 
And it came to pass about this time, that 
709,eased, Paul called unto him the disciples, and embraced them, and departed for to go into Macedonia. 
And when he had gone over those parts, and had given them much exhortation, he came into Greece, 
And there abode three months. And when the Jews laid wait for him, as he was about to sail into Syria, he purposed to return through Macedonia. 
And there accompanied him into Asia Sopater of Berea; and of the Thessalonians, Aristarchus and Secundus; and Gaius of Derbe, and Timotheus; and of Asia, Tychicus and Trophimus. 
These going before tarried for us at Troas. 
And we sailed away from Philippi after the days of unleavened bread, and came unto them to Troas in five days; where we abode seven days. 
A
897, with Christ a thousand years. 
But the rest of the dead lived not again until the thousand years were finished. This is the first resurrection. 
Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection: on such the second death hath no power, but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years. 
And when the thousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed out of his prison, 
And shall go out to deceive the nations which are in the four quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea. 
And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down from God out of heaven, and devoured them. 
And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prop
767,and all the congregation in Jerusalem, to keep the passover in the second month. 
For they could not keep it at that time, because the priests had not sanctified themselves sufficiently, neither had the people gathered themselves together to Jerusalem. 
And the thing pleased the king and all the congregation. 
So they established a decree to make proclamation throughout all Israel, from Beersheba even to Dan, that they should come to keep the passover unto the LORD God of Israel at Jerusalem: for they had not done it of a long time in such sort as it was written. 
So the posts went with the letters from the king and his princes throughout all Israel and Judah, and according to the commandment of the king, saying, Ye children of Israel, turn again unto the L
768,salem. 
And when the Syrians saw that they were smitten before Israel, they gathered themselves together. 
And Hadarezer sent, and brought out the Syrians that were beyond the river: and they came to Helam; and Shobach the captain of the host of Hadarezer went before them. 
And when it was told David, he gathered all Israel together, and passed over Jordan, and came to Helam. And the Syrians set themselves in array against David, and fought with him. 
And the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew the men of seven hundred chariots of the Syrians, and forty thousand horsemen, and smote Shobach the captain of their host, who died there. 
And when all the kings that were servants to Hadarezer saw that they were smitten before Israel, they made peace with Is
935,rd, and divide their tongues: for I have seen violence and strife in the city. 
Day and night they go about it upon the walls thereof: mischief also and sorrow are in the midst of it. 
Wickedness is in the midst thereof: deceit and guile depart not from her streets. 
For it was not an enemy that reproached me; then I could have borne it: neither was it he that hated me that did magnify himself against me; then I would have hid myself from him: 
But it was thou, a man mine equal, my guide, and mine acquaintance. 
We took sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God in company. 
Let death seize upon them, and let them go down quick into hell: for wickedness is in their dwellings, and among them. 
As for me, I will call upon God; and the LORD shall save me. 
Evening, and morning, and at noon, will I pray, and cry aloud: and he shall hear my voice. 
He hath delivered my soul in peace from the battle that was again
792,is all turned white: he is clean. 
But when raw flesh appeareth in him, he shall be unclean. 
And the priest shall see the raw flesh, and pronounce him to be unclean: for the raw flesh is unclean: it is a leprosy. 
Or if the raw flesh turn again, and be changed unto white, he shall come unto the priest; 
And the priest shall see him: and, behold, if the plague be turned into white; then the priest shall pronounce him clean that hath the plague: he is clean. 
The flesh also, in which, even in the skin thereof, was a boil, and is healed, 
And in the place of the boil there be a white rising, or a bright spot, white, and somewhat reddish, and it be shewed to the priest; 
And if, when the priest seeth it, behold, it be in sight lower than the skin, and the hair thereof be turned white;
773,th all your hearts, then put away the strange gods and Ashtaroth from among you, and prepare your hearts unto the LORD, and serve him only: and he will deliver you out of the hand of the Philistines. 
Then the children of Israel did put away Baalim and Ashtaroth, and served the LORD only. 
And Samuel said, Gather all Israel to Mizpeh, and I will pray for you unto the LORD. 
And they gathered together to Mizpeh, and drew water, and poured it out before the LORD, and fasted on that day, and said there, We have sinned against the LORD. And Samuel judged the children of Israel in Mizpeh. 
And when the Philistines heard that the children of Israel were gathered together to Mizpeh, the lords of the Philistines went up against Israel. And when the children of Israel hea
727,em, and rebuke her not. 
So she gleaned in the field until even, and beat out that she had gleaned: and it was about an ephah of barley. 
And she took it up, and went into the city: and her mother in law saw what she had gleaned: and she brought forth, and gave to her that she had reserved after she was sufficed. 
And her mother in law said unto her, Where hast thou gleaned to day? and where wroughtest thou? blessed be he that did take knowledge of thee. And she shewed her mother in law with whom she had wrought, and said, The man's name with whom I wrought to day is Boaz. 
And Naomi said unto her daughter in law, Blessed be he of the LORD, who hath not left off his kindness to the living and to the dead. And Naomi sa
735,and a darkness; and he went about seeking some to lead him by the hand. 
Then the deputy, when he saw what was done, believed, being astonished at the doctrine of the Lord. 
Now when Paul and his company loosed from Paphos, they came to Perga in Pamphylia: and John departing from them returned to Jerusalem. 
But when they departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in Pisidia, and went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down. 
And after the reading of the law and the prophets the rulers of the synagogue sent unto them, saying, Ye men and brethren, if ye have any word of exhortation for the people, say on. 
Then Paul stood up, and beckoning with his hand said, Men of Israel, and ye that fear God, give audience. 
The 
657,meat offering baken in the fryingpan, it shall be made of fine flour with oil. 
And thou shalt bring the meat offering that is made of these things unto the LORD: and when it is presented unto the priest, he shall bring it unto the altar. 
And the priest shall take from the meat offering a memorial thereof, and shall burn it upon the altar: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And that which is left of the meat offering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a thing most holy of the offerings of the LORD made by fire. 
No meat offering, which ye shall bring unto the LORD, shall be made with leaven: for ye shall burn no le
761,emy that sowed them is the devil; the harvest is the end of the world; and the reapers are the angels. 
As therefore the tares are gathered and burned in the fire; so shall it be in the end of this world. 
The Son of man shall send forth his angels, and they shall gather out of his kingdom all things that offend, and them which do iniquity; 
And shall cast them into a furnace of fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom of their Father. Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto treasure hid in a field; the which when a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof goeth and selleth all that he hath, and buyeth that field. 
Again, the kingdo
914,ad made them rejoice with great joy: the wives also and the children rejoiced: so that the joy of Jerusalem was heard even afar off. 
And at that time were some appointed over the chambers for the treasures, for the offerings, for the firstfruits, and for the tithes, to gather into them out of the fields of the cities the portions of the law for the priests and Levites: for Judah rejoiced for the priests and for the Levites that waited. 
And both the singers and the porters kept the ward of their God, and the ward of the purification, according to the commandment of David, and of Solomon his son. 
For in the days of David and Asaph of old there were chief of the singers, and songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God. 
And all Israel in the days of Zerubbabel, and in the days of Nehemiah, gave the portions of the singers and the porters, every day his portion: and they sanctified holy things unto the L
750, children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, and seek God. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed the counsel of the poor, because the LORD is his refuge. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! when the LORD bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and Israel shall be glad. 
Lord, who shall abide in thy tabernacle? who shall dwell in thy holy hill? 
He that walketh uprightly, and worketh righteousness, and sp
662,n saving my life; and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest some evil take me, and I die: 
Behold now, this city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one: Oh, let me escape thither, (is it not a little one?) and my soul shall live. 
And he said unto him, See, I have accepted thee concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou hast spoken. 
Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou be come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar. 
The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered into Zoar. 
Then the LORD rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the LORD out o
842,t I say unto thee; Be not thou rebellious like that rebellious house: open thy mouth, and eat that I give thee. 
And when I looked, behold, an hand was sent unto me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein; 
And he spread it before me; and it was written within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat this roll, and go speak unto the house of Israel. 
So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, cause thy belly to eat, and fill thy bowels with this roll that I give thee. Then did I eat it; and it was in my mouth as honey for sweetness. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, go, get thee unto the house of Israel, and speak with my words unto them. 
For thou art not sent to a people of a str
957,d they were not seen without: and there they are unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables of stone, which Moses put there at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of the land of Egypt. 
And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place, that the cloud filled the house of the LORD, 
So that the priests could not stand to minister because of the cloud: for the glory of the LORD had filled the house of the LORD. 
Then spake Solomon, The LORD said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. 
I have surely built thee an house to dwell in, a settled place for thee to abide in for ever. 
And the king turned his face about, and blessed all the congregation of Israel: (and all the congregation of Israel stood;) 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which spake with his mouth unto David my father, and hath with his hand fulfilled it, saying, 
Since the d
834,s with pure conscience, that without ceasing I have remembrance of thee in my prayers night and day; 
Greatly desiring to see thee, being mindful of thy tears, that I may be filled with joy; 
When I call to remembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in thee by the putting on of my hands. 
For God hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of love, and of a sound mind. 
Be not thou therefore ashamed of the testimony of our Lord, nor of me his prisoner: but be thou partaker of the afflictions of the gospel according to the power of God; 
Who hath saved us, and called us with an holy calling, not according to our works, but a
710,r; and say unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Let my people go, that they may serve me. 
Else, if thou wilt not let my people go, behold, I will send swarms of flies upon thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people, and into thy houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are. 
And I will sever in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou mayest know that I am the LORD in the midst of the earth. 
And I will put a division between my people and thy people: to morrow shall this sign be. 
And the LORD did so; and there came a grievous swarm of flies into the house of Pharao
732,iest had commanded, and took every man his men that were to come in on the sabbath, with them that were to go out on the sabbath: for Jehoiada the priest dismissed not the courses. 
Moreover Jehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of hundreds spears, and bucklers, and shields, that had been king David's, which were in the house of God. 
And he set all the people, every man having his weapon in his hand, from the right side of the temple to the left side of the temple, along by the altar and the temple, by the king round about. 
Then they brought out the king's son, and put upon him the crown, and gave him the testimony, and made him king. And Jehoiada and his sons anointed him, and said, God save the king. 
Now when 
863,pt; and the famine shall consume the land; 
And the plenty shall not be known in the land by reason of that famine following; for it shall be very grievous. 
And for that the dream was doubled unto Pharaoh twice; it is because the thing is established by God, and God will shortly bring it to pass. 
Now therefore let Pharaoh look out a man discreet and wise, and set him over the land of Egypt. 
Let Pharaoh do this, and let him appoint officers over the land, and take up the fifth part of the land of Egypt in the seven plenteous years. 
And let them gather all the food of those good years that come, and lay up corn under the hand of Pharaoh, and let them keep food in the cities. 
And that food shall be for store to the land against the seven years of famine, which shall be in the land of Egypt; that the land perish not through the famine. 
And the thing
744,ugh the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them. 
And I said, Hear, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment? 
Who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones; 
Who also eat the flesh of my people, and flay their skin from off them; and they break their bones, and chop them in pieces, as for the pot, and as flesh within the caldron. 
Then shall they cry unto the LORD, but he will not hear them: he will even hide his face from them at that time, as they have behaved themselves ill in their doings. 
Thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that 
672, where Ahiman, Sheshai, and Talmai, the children of Anak, were. (Now Hebron was built seven years before Zoan in Egypt.) 
And they came unto the brook of Eshcol, and cut down from thence a branch with one cluster of grapes, and they bare it between two upon a staff; and they brought of the pomegranates, and of the figs. 
The place was called the brook Eshcol, because of the cluster of grapes which the children of Israel cut down from thence. 
And they returned from searching of the land after forty days. 
And they went and came to Moses, and to Aaron, and to all the congregation of the children of Israel, unto the wilderness of Paran, to Kadesh; and brought back w
646,rings five thousand small cattle, and five hundred oxen. 
So the service was prepared, and the priests stood in their place, and the Levites in their courses, according to the king's commandment. 
And they killed the passover, and the priests sprinkled the blood from their hands, and the Levites flayed them. 
And they removed the burnt offerings, that they might give according to the divisions of the families of the people, to offer unto the LORD, as it is written in the book of Moses. And so did they with the oxen. 
And they roasted the passover with fire according to the ordinance: but the other holy offerings sod they in pots, and in c
823,omith, and Haziel, and Haran, three. These were the chief of the fathers of Laadan. 
And the sons of Shimei were, Jahath, Zina, and Jeush, and Beriah. These four were the sons of Shimei. 
And Jahath was the chief, and Zizah the second: but Jeush and Beriah had not many sons; therefore they were in one reckoning, according to their father's house. 
The sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel, four. 
The sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separated, that he should sanctify the most holy things, he and his sons for ever, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to bless in his name for ever. 
Now concerning Moses the man of God, his sons were named of the tribe of Levi. 
The sons of Moses were, Gershom, and Eliezer. 
Of the sons of Gershom, Shebuel was the chief. 
And the sons 
871,be of Gad were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Aser were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Nephthalim were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Manasses were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Simeon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Levi were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Issachar were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Zabulon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Joseph were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Benjamin were sealed twelve thousand. 
After this I beheld, and, lo, a great multitude, which no man could number, of all nations, and kindreds, and people, and tongues, stood before the throne, and before the Lamb, clothed with white robes, and palms in their hands; 
And cried with a loud voice, saying, Salvation to our God which sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb. 
And all the an
900,n of Dan into the mountain: for they would not suffer them to come down to the valley: 
But the Amorites would dwell in mount Heres in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim: yet the hand of the house of Joseph prevailed, so that they became tributaries. 
And the coast of the Amorites was from the going up to Akrabbim, from the rock, and upward. 
And an angel of the LORD came up from Gilgal to Bochim, and said, I made you to go up out of Egypt, and have brought you unto the land which I sware unto your fathers; and I said, I will never break my covenant with you. 
And ye shall make no league with the inhabitants of this land; ye shall throw down their altars: but ye have not obeyed my voice: why have ye done this? 
Wherefore I also said, I will not drive them out from before you; but they shall be as thorns in your sides, and their gods shall be a snare unto you. 
And it came to pass, when the angel o
676,in his own mind. 
He that regardeth the day, regardeth it unto the Lord; and he that regardeth not the day, to the Lord he doth not regard it. He that eateth, eateth to the Lord, for he giveth God thanks; and he that eateth not, to the Lord he eateth not, and giveth God thanks. 
For none of us liveth to himself, and no man dieth to himself. 
For whether we live, we live unto the Lord; and whether we die, we die unto the Lord: whether we live therefore, or die, we are the Lord's. 
For to this end Christ both died, and rose, and revived, that he might be Lord both of the dead and living. 
But why dost thou judge thy brother? or why dost thou set at nought thy brother? f
774,d the LORD said, These have no master; let them return therefore every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would not prophesy good unto me, but evil? 
Again he said, Therefore hear the word of the LORD; I saw the LORD sitting upon his throne, and all the host of heaven standing on his right hand and on his left. 
And the LORD said, Who shall entice Ahab king of Israel, that he may go up and fall at Ramothgilead? And one spake saying after this manner, and another saying after that manner. 
Then there came out a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and said, I will entice him. And the LORD said unto him, Wherewith? 
And he said, I will go out, and be a lying spirit in the mouth of all his prophets. And t
734,h his ear unto the door, and he shall be thy servant for ever. And also unto thy maidservant thou shalt do likewise. 
It shall not seem hard unto thee, when thou sendest him away free from thee; for he hath been worth a double hired servant to thee, in serving thee six years: and the LORD thy God shall bless thee in all that thou doest. 
All the firstling males that come of thy herd and of thy flock thou shalt sanctify unto the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work with the firstling of thy bullock, nor shear the firstling of thy sheep. 
Thou shalt eat it before the LORD thy God year by year in the place which the LORD shall choose, thou and thy household. 
And if there be any blemish therein, as if it be lame, or blind, or ha
777,rks of the LORD are great, sought out of all them that have pleasure therein. 
His work is honourable and glorious: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
He hath made his wonderful works to be remembered: the LORD is gracious and full of compassion. 
He hath given meat unto them that fear him: he will ever be mindful of his covenant. 
He hath shewed his people the power of his works, that he may give them the heritage of the heathen. 
The works of his hands are verity and judgment; all his commandments are sure. 
They stand fast for ever and ever, and are done in truth and uprightness. 
He sent redemption unto his people: he hath commanded his covenant for ever: holy and reverend is his name. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: a good understanding 
937,prosy; it is unclean. 
He shall therefore burn that garment, whether warp or woof, in woollen or in linen, or any thing of skin, wherein the plague is: for it is a fretting leprosy; it shall be burnt in the fire. 
And if the priest shall look, and, behold, the plague be not spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin; 
Then the priest shall command that they wash the thing wherein the plague is, and he shall shut it up seven days more: 
And the priest shall look on the plague, after that it is washed: and, behold, if the plague have not changed his colour, and the plague be not spread; it is unclean; thou shalt burn it in the fire; it is fret inward, whether it be bare within or without. 
And if the priest look, and, behold, the plague be somewhat dark after the washing of it; then he shall rend it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warp, or out of the woof: 
And if 
750,Jacob said unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are fulfilled, that I may go in unto her. 
And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a feast. 
And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter, and brought her to him; and he went in unto her. 
And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an handmaid. 
And it came to pass, that in the morning, behold, it was Leah: and he said to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I serve with thee for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me? 
And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the younger before the firstborn. 
Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service which thou shalt serve with me
958,dly wings unto the peacocks? or wings and feathers unto the ostrich? 
Which leaveth her eggs in the earth, and warmeth them in dust, 
And forgetteth that the foot may crush them, or that the wild beast may break them. 
She is hardened against her young ones, as though they were not her's: her labour is in vain without fear; 
Because God hath deprived her of wisdom, neither hath he imparted to her understanding. 
What time she lifteth up herself on high, she scorneth the horse and his rider. 
Hast thou given the horse strength? hast thou clothed his neck with thunder? 
Canst thou make him afraid as a grasshopper? the glory of his nostrils is terrible. 
He paweth in the valley, and rejoiceth in his strength: he goeth on to meet the armed men. 
He mocketh at fear, and is not affrighted; neither turneth he back from the sword. 
The quiver rattleth against him, the glittering spear and the shield. 
He swalloweth the ground with fierceness and rage: 
742,the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he searched but found not the images. 
And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so hotly pursued after me? 
Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, what hast thou found of all thy household stuff? set it here before my brethren and thy brethren, that they may judge betwixt us both. 
This twenty years have I been with thee; thy ewes and thy she goats have not cast their young, and the rams of thy flock have I not eaten. 
That which was torn of beasts I brought not unto thee; I bare 
815, for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six boards. 
And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they shall be coupled together beneath, and they shall be coupled together above the head of it unto one ring: thus shall it be for them both; they shall be for the two corners. 
And they shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen sockets; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And thou shalt make bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle, 
And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the side of the tabernacle, for the two sides westward. 
And the middle bar in the midst of the boards shall reach from end to end. 
And
912,habitants in his city, did as Jezebel had sent unto them, and as it was written in the letters which she had sent unto them. 
They proclaimed a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people. 
And there came in two men, children of Belial, and sat before him: and the men of Belial witnessed against him, even against Naboth, in the presence of the people, saying, Naboth did blaspheme God and the king. Then they carried him forth out of the city, and stoned him with stones, that he died. 
Then they sent to Jezebel, saying, Naboth is stoned, and is dead. 
And it came to pass, when Jezebel heard that Naboth was stoned, and was dead, that Jezebel said to Ahab, Arise, take possession of the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give thee for money: for Naboth is not alive, but dead. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab heard that Naboth was dead, that Ahab rose up to go down to the vineyard of 
952,ead. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go thou and preach the kingdom of God. 
And another also said, Lord, I will follow thee; but let me first go bid them farewell, which are at home at my house. 
And Jesus said unto him, No man, having put his hand to the plough, and looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God. 
After these things the LORD appointed other seventy also, and sent them two and two before his face into every city and place, whither he himself would come. 
Therefore said he unto them, The harvest truly is great, but the labourers are few: pray ye therefore the Lord of the harvest, that he would send forth labourers into his harvest. 
Go your ways: behold, I send you forth as lambs among wolves. 
Carry neither purse, nor scrip, nor shoes: and salute no man by the way. 
And into whatsoever house ye enter, f
699, seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them were full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One spoon of ten shekels of gold, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Nahshon the son of Amminadab. 
On the second day Nethaneel the son of Zuar, prince of Issachar, did offer: 
He offered for his offering one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of 
927,n of Nun among them: 
According to the word of the LORD they gave him the city which he asked, even Timnathserah in mount Ephraim: and he built the city, and dwelt therein. 
These are the inheritances, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel, divided for an inheritance by lot in Shiloh before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. So they made an end of dividing the country. 
The LORD also spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Speak to the children of Israel, saying, Appoint out for you cities of refuge, whereof I spake unto you by the hand of Moses: 
That the slayer that killeth any person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and they shall be your refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause i
740,eazar the priest, and before the princes and all the congregation, by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, saying, 
Our father died in the wilderness, and he was not in the company of them that gathered themselves together against the LORD in the company of Korah; but died in his own sin, and had no sons. 
Why should the name of our father be done away from among his family, because he hath no son? Give unto us therefore a possession among the brethren of our father. 
And Moses brought their cause before the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the inheritance 
878,the LORD: will ye not tremble at my presence, which have placed the sand for the bound of the sea by a perpetual decree, that it cannot pass it: and though the waves thereof toss themselves, yet can they not prevail; though they roar, yet can they not pass over it? 
But this people hath a revolting and a rebellious heart; they are revolted and gone. 
Neither say they in their heart, Let us now fear the LORD our God, that giveth rain, both the former and the latter, in his season: he reserveth unto us the appointed weeks of the harvest. 
Your iniquities have turned away these things, and your sins have withholden good things from you. 
For among my people are found wicked men: they lay wait, as he that setteth snares; they set a trap, they catch men. 
As a cage is full of birds, so are their houses full of deceit: therefore they are become great, and waxen rich. 
The
801, of recompences for the controversy of Zion. 
And the streams thereof shall be turned into pitch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch. 
It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever: from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever. 
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her princes shall be nothing. 
And thorns shall come up in her palaces, nettles and brambles in the fortresses thereof: and it shall be an habitation of dragons, and a cou
824,according to all things for the which the LORD thy God shall send thee to us. 
Whether it be good, or whether it be evil, we will obey the voice of the LORD our God, to whom we send thee; that it may be well with us, when we obey the voice of the LORD our God. 
And it came to pass after ten days, that the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah. 
Then called he Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces which were with him, and all the people from the least even to the greatest, 
And said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, unto whom ye sent me to present your supplication before him; 
If ye will still abide in this land, then will I build you, and not pull you down, and I will plant you, and not pluck you up: for I repent me of the evil that I have done unto you. 
Be not afraid of t
671,beforetime. 
And he shall dwell in that city, until he stand before the congregation for judgment, and until the death of the high priest that shall be in those days: then shall the slayer return, and come unto his own city, and unto his own house, unto the city from whence he fled. 
And they appointed Kedesh in Galilee in mount Naphtali, and Shechem in mount Ephraim, and Kirjatharba, which is Hebron, in the mountain of Judah. 
And on the other side Jordan by Jericho eastward, they assigned Bezer in the wilderness upon the plain out of the tribe of Reuben, and Ramoth in Gilead out of the tribe of Gad, and Golan in Bashan out of the tribe of Manasseh. 
These were 
771,u King of saints. 
Who shall not fear thee, O Lord, and glorify thy name? for thou only art holy: for all nations shall come and worship before thee; for thy judgments are made manifest. 
And after that I looked, and, behold, the temple of the tabernacle of the testimony in heaven was opened: 
And the seven angels came out of the temple, having the seven plagues, clothed in pure and white linen, and having their breasts girded with golden girdles. 
And one of the four beasts gave unto the seven angels seven golden vials full of the wrath of God, who liveth for ever and ever. 
And the temple was filled with smoke from the glory of God, and from his power; and no man was able to enter into the temple, till the seven plagues of the seven angels were fulfilled. 
An
757,. 
Simon Peter, a servant and an apostle of Jesus Christ, to them that have obtained like precious faith with us through the righteousness of God and our Saviour Jesus Christ: 
Grace and peace be multiplied unto you through the knowledge of God, and of Jesus our Lord, 
According as his divine power hath given unto us all things that pertain unto life and godliness, through the knowledge of him that hath called us to glory and virtue: 
Whereby are given unto us exceeding great and precious promises: that by these ye might be partakers of the divine nature, having escaped the corruption that is in the world through lust. 
And beside this, giving all diligence, add to your faith virtue; and to virtue knowledge; 
And to knowledge temperance; and to te
873,and intend to bring this man's blood upon us. 
Then Peter and the other apostles answered and said, We ought to obey God rather than men. 
The God of our fathers raised up Jesus, whom ye slew and hanged on a tree. 
Him hath God exalted with his right hand to be a Prince and a Saviour, for to give repentance to Israel, and forgiveness of sins. 
And we are his witnesses of these things; and so is also the Holy Ghost, whom God hath given to them that obey him. 
When they heard that, they were cut to the heart, and took counsel to slay them. 
Then stood there up one in the council, a Pharisee, named Gamaliel, a doctor of the law, had in reputation among all the people, and commanded to put the apostles forth a little space; 
And said unto them, Ye men of Israel, take heed to yourselves what ye intend to do as touching these men. 
For before these days rose up Theud
782,l. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth: 
But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. 
Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, and hate thine enemy. 
But I say unto you, Love your enemies, bless them that curse you, do good to them that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully use you, and persecute you; 
That ye may be the children of your Father which is in heaven: f
844,sons of Bebai; Zechariah the son of Bebai, and with him twenty and eight males. 
And of the sons of Azgad; Johanan the son of Hakkatan, and with him an hundred and ten males. 
And of the last sons of Adonikam, whose names are these, Eliphelet, Jeiel, and Shemaiah, and with them threescore males. 
Of the sons also of Bigvai; Uthai, and Zabbud, and with them seventy males. 
And I gathered them together to the river that runneth to Ahava; and there abode we in tents three days: and I viewed the people, and the priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi. 
Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for Elnathan, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief a
891,lars of shittim wood, and overlaid them with gold: their hooks were of gold; and he cast for them four sockets of silver. 
And he made an hanging for the tabernacle door of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, of needlework; 
And the five pillars of it with their hooks: and he overlaid their chapiters and their fillets with gold: but their five sockets were of brass. 
And Bezaleel made the ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half was the length of it, and a cubit and a half the breadth of it, and a cubit and a half the height of it: 
And he overlaid it with pure gold within and without, and made a crown of gold to it round about. 
And he cast for it four rings of gold, to be set by the four corners of it; even two rings upon the one side of it, and two rings upon the other side of it. 
And he made staves of shittim wood, and overlaid them with gold. 
And he pu
753, the children of Israel: from them that have many ye shall give many; but from them that have few ye shall give few: every one shall give of his cities unto the Levites according to his inheritance which he inheriteth. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye be come over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall appoint you cities to be cities of refuge for you; that the slayer may flee thither, which killeth any person at unawares. 
And they shall be unto you cities for refuge from the avenger; that the manslayer die not, until he stand before the congregation in judgment. 
And of these cities which ye shall give six cities shall ye have for refuge. 
Ye shall give three citie
842, fire. 
And touching the house of the king of Judah, say, Hear ye the word of the LORD; 
O house of David, thus saith the LORD; Execute judgment in the morning, and deliver him that is spoiled out of the hand of the oppressor, lest my fury go out like fire, and burn that none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings. 
Behold, I am against thee, O inhabitant of the valley, and rock of the plain, saith the LORD; which say, Who shall come down against us? or who shall enter into our habitations? 
But I will punish you according to the fruit of your doings, saith the LORD: and I will kindle a fire in the forest thereof, and it shall devour all things round about it. 
Thus saith the LORD; Go down to the house of the king of Judah, and speak there this word, 
And say, Hear the word of the LORD, O king of Judah, that sittest upo
758,d the princes of the congregation and heads of the thousands of Israel which were with him, heard the words that the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the children of Manasseh spake, it pleased them. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest said unto the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the children of Manasseh, This day we perceive that the LORD is among us, because ye have not committed this trespass against the LORD: now ye have delivered the children of Israel out of the hand of the LORD. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest, and the princes, returned from the children of Reuben, and from the children of Gad, out of the land of Gilead, unto the land of Canaan, to the children of Israel, and brought t
928,worship in the presence of them that sit at meat with thee. 
For whosoever exalteth himself shall be abased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted. 
Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, neither thy kinsmen, nor thy rich neighbours; lest they also bid thee again, and a recompence be made thee. 
But when thou makest a feast, call the poor, the maimed, the lame, the blind: 
And thou shalt be blessed; for they cannot recompense thee: for thou shalt be recompensed at the resurrection of the just. 
And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these things, he said unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the kingdom of God. 
Then said he unto him, A certain man made a great supper, and bade many: 
And sent his servant at supper time to say to them that were bidden, Come; for all things are now ready. 
And they all wit
940,oul; then shall thy light rise in obscurity, and thy darkness be as the noon day: 
And the LORD shall guide thee continually, and satisfy thy soul in drought, and make fat thy bones: and thou shalt be like a watered garden, and like a spring of water, whose waters fail not. 
And they that shall be of thee shall build the old waste places: thou shalt raise up the foundations of many generations; and thou shalt be called, The repairer of the breach, The restorer of paths to dwell in. 
If thou turn away thy foot from the sabbath, from doing thy pleasure on my holy day; and call the sabbath a delight, the holy of the LORD, honourable; and shalt honour him, not doing thine own ways, nor finding thine own pleasure, nor speaking thine own words: 
Then shalt thou delight thyself in the LORD; and I will cause thee to ride upon the high places of the earth, and feed thee with the heritage of Jacob thy father: for the mouth of the LORD h
922,he matter will fall: for the man will not be in rest, until he have finished the thing this day. 
Then went Boaz up to the gate, and sat him down there: and, behold, the kinsman of whom Boaz spake came by; unto whom he said, Ho, such a one! turn aside, sit down here. And he turned aside, and sat down. 
And he took ten men of the elders of the city, and said, Sit ye down here. And they sat down. 
And he said unto the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, selleth a parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it before the inhabitants, and before the elders of my people. If thou wilt redeem it, redeem it: but if thou wilt not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know: for there is none to redeem it beside thee; and I am after thee. And he said, I will redeem it. 
Then said Boaz, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of Naomi, thou 
931, the sea, she and her inhabitants, which cause their terror to be on all that haunt it! 
Now shall the isles tremble in the day of thy fall; yea, the isles that are in the sea shall be troubled at thy departure. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall make thee a desolate city, like the cities that are not inhabited; when I shall bring up the deep upon thee, and great waters shall cover thee; 
When I shall bring thee down with them that descend into the pit, with the people of old time, and shall set thee in the low parts of the earth, in places desolate of old, with them that go down to the pit, that thou be not inhabited; and I shall set glory in the land of the living; 
I will make thee a terror, and thou shalt be no more: though thou be sought for, yet shalt thou never be found again, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Now, thou son of man, take up a lamentation for Tyrus; 
A
743,ck for stone, and slime had they for morter. 
And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a tower, whose top may reach unto heaven; and let us make us a name, lest we be scattered abroad upon the face of the whole earth. 
And the LORD came down to see the city and the tower, which the children of men builded. 
And the LORD said, Behold, the people is one, and they have all one language; and this they begin to do: and now nothing will be restrained from them, which they have imagined to do. 
Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they may not understand one another's speech. 
So the LORD scattered them abroad from thence upon the face of all the earth: and they left off to build the city. 
Therefore is the
737,e furnace one seven times more than it was wont to be heated. 
And he commanded the most mighty men that were in his army to bind Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, and to cast them into the burning fiery furnace. 
Then these men were bound in their coats, their hosen, and their hats, and their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Therefore because the king's commandment was urgent, and the furnace exceeding hot, the flames of the fire slew those men that took up Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego. 
And these three men, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, fell down bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonied, and rose up in haste, and spake, and sa
684, again, my righteousness is in it. 
Is there iniquity in my tongue? cannot my taste discern perverse things? 
Is there not an appointed time to man upon earth? are not his days also like the days of an hireling? 
As a servant earnestly desireth the shadow, and as an hireling looketh for the reward of his work: 
So am I made to possess months of vanity, and wearisome nights are appointed to me. 
When I lie down, I say, When shall I arise, and the night be gone? and I am full of tossings to and fro unto the dawning of the day. 
My flesh is clothed with worms and clods of dust; my skin is broken, and become loathsome. 
My days are swifter than a weaver's shuttle, and are spent w
875,y took up Asahel, and buried him in the sepulchre of his father, which was in Bethlehem. And Joab and his men went all night, and they came to Hebron at break of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; 
And his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; 
And the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith; and the fifth, Shephatiah the son of Abital; 
And the sixth, Ithream, by Eglah David's wife. These were born to David in Hebron. 
And it came to pass, while there was war between the house of Saul and the house of David, that Abner made himself strong 
771,ore them, so that they went through the midst of the sea on the dry land; and their persecutors thou threwest into the deeps, as a stone into the mighty waters. 
Moreover thou leddest them in the day by a cloudy pillar; and in the night by a pillar of fire, to give them light in the way wherein they should go. 
Thou camest down also upon mount Sinai, and spakest with them from heaven, and gavest them right judgments, and true laws, good statutes and commandments: 
And madest known unto them thy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes, and laws, by the hand of Moses thy servant: 
And gavest them bread from heaven for their hunger, and broughtest forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and promisedst them that they should go in to pos
825, mount of God: 
And he said unto Moses, I thy father in law Jethro am come unto thee, and thy wife, and her two sons with her. 
And Moses went out to meet his father in law, and did obeisance, and kissed him; and they asked each other of their welfare; and they came into the tent. 
And Moses told his father in law all that the LORD had done unto Pharaoh and to the Egyptians for Israel's sake, and all the travail that had come upon them by the way, and how the LORD delivered them. 
And Jethro rejoiced for all the goodness which the LORD had done to Israel, whom he had delivered out of the hand of the Egyptians. 
And Jethro said, Blessed be the LORD, who hath delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of Pharaoh, who hath delivered the people from under the hand of the Egyptians. 
Now I know
950,th his finger seven times before the LORD: 
And of the rest of the oil that is in his hand shall the priest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the blood of the trespass offering: 
And the remnant of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall pour upon the head of him that is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And the priest shall offer the sin offering, and make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed from his uncleanness; and afterward he shall kill the burnt offering: 
And the priest shall offer the burnt offering and the meat offering upon the altar: and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and he shall be clean. 
And if he be poor, and cannot get so much; then he shall take one lamb for a trespass offering to be waved, to make an atonement for him, and one tent
954,was come near to enter into Egypt, that he said unto Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that thou art a fair woman to look upon: 
Therefore it shall come to pass, when the Egyptians shall see thee, that they shall say, This is his wife: and they will kill me, but they will save thee alive. 
Say, I pray thee, thou art my sister: that it may be well with me for thy sake; and my soul shall live because of thee. 
And it came to pass, that, when Abram was come into Egypt, the Egyptians beheld the woman that she was very fair. 
The princes also of Pharaoh saw her, and commended her before Pharaoh: and the woman was taken into Pharaoh's house. 
And he entreated Abram well for her sake: and he had sheep, and oxen, and he asses, and menservants, and maidservants, and she asses, and camels. 
And the LORD plagued Pharaoh and his house with great plagues because of Sarai Abram's wife. 
And Pharaoh called Abram and said, What is this that thou hast done
698,rael hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they be, that we may consider them, and know the latter end of them; or declare us things for to come. 
Shew the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know that ye are gods: yea, do good, or do evil, that we may be dismayed, and behold it together. 
Behold, ye are of nothing, and your work of nought: an abomination is he that chooseth you. 
I have raised up one from the north, and he shall come: from the rising of the sun shall he call upon my name: and he shall come upo
694,ngs to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 
Whose are the fathers, and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ came, who is over all, God blessed for ever. Amen. 
Not 
715,of the house of David apart, and their wives apart; the family of the house of Nathan apart, and their wives apart; 
The family of the house of Levi apart, and their wives apart; the family of Shimei apart, and their wives apart; 
All the families that remain, every family apart, and their wives apart. 
In that day there shall be a fountain opened to the house of David and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem for sin and for uncleanness. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts, that I will cut off the names of the idols out of the land, and they shall no more be remembered: and also I will cause the prophets and the unclean spirit to pass out of the land. 
And it shall come to pass, that
705,man of Ramathaimzophim, of mount Ephraim, and his name was Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Elihu, the son of Tohu, the son of Zuph, an Ephrathite: 
And he had two wives; the name of the one was Hannah, and the name of the other Peninnah: and Peninnah had children, but Hannah had no children. 
And this man went up out of his city yearly to worship and to sacrifice unto the LORD of hosts in Shiloh. And the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, the priests of the LORD, were there. 
And when the time was that Elkanah offered, he gave to Peninnah his wife, and to all her sons and her daughters, portions: 
But unto Hannah he gave a worthy portion; for he loved Hannah: but the LORD had shut up h
898, mine own heart, which shall fulfil all my will. 
Of this man's seed hath God according to his promise raised unto Israel a Saviour, Jesus: 
When John had first preached before his coming the baptism of repentance to all the people of Israel. 
And as John fulfilled his course, he said, Whom think ye that I am? I am not he. But, behold, there cometh one after me, whose shoes of his feet I am not worthy to loose. 
Men and brethren, children of the stock of Abraham, and whosoever among you feareth God, to you is the word of this salvation sent. 
For they that dwell at Jerusalem, and their rulers, because they knew him not, nor yet the voices of the prophets which are read every sabbath day, they have fulfilled them in condemning him. 
And though they found no cause of death in him, yet desired they Pilate that he should be slain. 
And when they had fulfilled all that was written of him, t
681,D, and spread it before the LORD. 
And Hezekiah prayed unto the LORD, saying, 
O LORD of hosts, God of Israel, that dwellest between the cherubims, thou art the God, even thou alone, of all the kingdoms of the earth: thou hast made heaven and earth. 
Incline thine ear, O LORD, and hear; open thine eyes, O LORD, and see: and hear all the words of Sennacherib, which hath sent to reproach the living God. 
Of a truth, LORD, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the nations, and their countries, 
And have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone: therefore they have destroyed them. 
Now therefore, O LORD our God, save 
901,say, Go not into Egypt to sojourn there: 
But Baruch the son of Neriah setteth thee on against us, for to deliver us into the hand of the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Jeremiah the prophet, and Baruch the son of Neriah. 
So they came into the land of Egypt: for they obeyed not the voice of the LORD: thus came 
914,ne eyes shall see the king in his beauty: they shall behold the land that is very far off. 
Thine heart shall meditate terror. Where is the scribe? where is the receiver? where is he that counted the towers? 
Thou shalt not see a fierce people, a people of a deeper speech than thou canst perceive; of a stammering tongue, that thou canst not understand. 
Look upon Zion, the city of our solemnities: thine eyes shall see Jerusalem a quiet habitation, a tabernacle that shall not be taken down; not one of the stakes thereof shall ever be removed, neither shall any of the cords thereof be broken. 
But there the glorious LORD will be unto us a place of broad rivers and streams; wherein shall go no galley with oars, neither shall gallant ship pass thereby. 
For the LORD is our judge, the LORD is our lawgiver, the LORD is our king; he will save us. 
Thy tacklings are loosed; they could not well strengthen thei
738,uity. 
Then answered Simon, and said, Pray ye to the LORD for me, that none of these things which ye have spoken come upon me. 
And they, when they had testified and preached the word of the Lord, returned to Jerusalem, and preached the gospel in many villages of the Samaritans. 
And the angel of the Lord spake unto Philip, saying, Arise, and go toward the south unto the way that goeth down from Jerusalem unto Gaza, which is desert. 
And he arose and went: and, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the charge of all her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship, 
Was returning, and sitting in his chariot read Esaias the prophet. 
Then the Spirit said unto 
682,e unto their gods; for even their sons and their daughters they have burnt in the fire to their gods. 
What thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt not add thereto, nor diminish from it. 
If there arise among you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and giveth thee a sign or a wonder, 
And the sign or the wonder come to pass, whereof he spake unto thee, saying, Let us go after other gods, which thou hast not known, and let us serve them; 
Thou shalt not hearken unto the words of that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams: for the LORD your God proveth you, to know whether ye love the LORD your God with all your heart and with all your soul. 
Ye shall walk after 
782,y man which hath any suit or cause might come unto me, and I would do him justice! 
And it was so, that when any man came nigh to him to do him obeisance, he put forth his hand, and took him, and kissed him. 
And on this manner did Absalom to all Israel that came to the king for judgment: so Absalom stole the hearts of the men of Israel. 
And it came to pass after forty years, that Absalom said unto the king, I pray thee, let me go and pay my vow, which I have vowed unto the LORD, in Hebron. 
For thy servant vowed a vow while I abode at Geshur in Syria, saying, If the LORD shall bring me again indeed to Jerusalem, then I will serve the LORD. 
And the king said unto him, Go in peace. So he arose, and went to Hebron. 
But Absalom sent spies throughout all the tribes of Isra
807,lgathpilneser king of Assyria came unto him, and distressed him, but strengthened him not. 
For Ahaz took away a portion out of the house of the LORD, and out of the house of the king, and of the princes, and gave it unto the king of Assyria: but he helped him not. 
And in the time of his distress did he trespass yet more against the LORD: this is that king Ahaz. 
For he sacrificed unto the gods of Damascus, which smote him: and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria help them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jeru
928,Samuel called unto the LORD; and the LORD sent thunder and rain that day: and all the people greatly feared the LORD and Samuel. 
And all the people said unto Samuel, Pray for thy servants unto the LORD thy God, that we die not: for we have added unto all our sins this evil, to ask us a king. 
And Samuel said unto the people, Fear not: ye have done all this wickedness: yet turn not aside from following the LORD, but serve the LORD with all your heart; 
And turn ye not aside: for then should ye go after vain things, which cannot profit nor deliver; for they are vain. 
For the LORD will not forsake his people for his great name's sake: because it hath pleased the LORD to make you his people. 
Moreover as for me, God forbid that I should sin against the LORD in ceasing to pray for you: but I will teach you the good and the right way: 
Only fear the LORD, and serve him in truth with all your heart: for consider how gre
730,should build upon another man's foundation: 
But as it is written, To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see: and they that have not heard shall understand. 
For which cause also I have been much hindered from coming to you. 
But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great desire these many years to come unto you; 
Whensoever I take my journey into Spain, I will come to you: for I trust to see you in my journey, and to be brought on my way thitherward by you, if first I be somewhat filled with your company. 
But now I go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints. 
For it hath pleased them of Macedonia and Achaia to make a certain contribution for the poor saints which are at Jerusalem. 
It hath please
671, top of Shenir and Hermon, from the lions' dens, from the mountains of the leopards. 
Thou hast ravished my heart, my sister, my spouse; thou hast ravished my heart with one of thine eyes, with one chain of thy neck. 
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a fountain sealed. 
Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Sp
769,, for all the signs which I have shewed among them? 
I will smite them with the pestilence, and disinherit them, and will make of thee a greater nation and mightier than they. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, Then the Egyptians shall hear it, (for thou broughtest up this people in thy might from among them;) 
And they will tell it to the inhabitants of this land: for they have heard that thou LORD art among this people, that thou LORD art seen face to face, and that thy cloud standeth over them, and that thou goest before them, by day time in a pillar of a cloud, and in a pillar of fire by night. 
Now if thou shalt kill all this people as one man, then the nations which have heard the fame of thee will speak, saying, 
Because the LORD was not able to bring this
761,mselves, and fed not my flock; 
Therefore, O ye shepherds, hear the word of the LORD; 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against the shepherds; and I will require my flock at their hand, and cause them to cease from feeding the flock; neither shall the shepherds feed themselves any more; for I will deliver my flock from their mouth, that they may not be meat for them. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, will both search my sheep, and seek them out. 
As a shepherd seeketh out his flock in the day that he is among his sheep that are scattered; so will I seek out my sheep, and will deliver them out of all places where they have been scattered in the cloudy and dark day. 
And I will bring them out from the people, and gather them from the
854,unto him wanderers, that shall cause him to wander, and shall empty his vessels, and break their bottles. 
And Moab shall be ashamed of Chemosh, as the house of Israel was ashamed of Bethel their confidence. 
How say ye, We are mighty and strong men for the war? 
Moab is spoiled, and gone up out of her cities, and his chosen young men are gone down to the slaughter, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts. 
The calamity of Moab is near to come, and his affliction hasteth fast. 
All ye that are about him, bemoan him; and all ye that know his name, say, How is the strong staff broken, and the beautiful rod! 
Thou daughter that dost inhabit Dibon, come down from thy glory, and sit in thirst; for the spoiler of Moab shall come upon thee, and he shall destroy thy strong holds. 
O inhabitant of Aroer, stand by the way, and espy; ask him tha
928,hold, when we come into the land, thou shalt bind this line of scarlet thread in the window which thou didst let us down by: and thou shalt bring thy father, and thy mother, and thy brethren, and all thy father's household, home unto thee. 
And it shall be, that whosoever shall go out of the doors of thy house into the street, his blood shall be upon his head, and we will be guiltless: and whosoever shall be with thee in the house, his blood shall be on our head, if any hand be upon him. 
And if thou utter this our business, then we will be quit of thine oath which thou hast made us to swear. 
And she said, According unto your words, so be it. And she sent them away, and they departed: and she bound the scarlet line in the window. 
And they went, and came unto the mountain, and abode there three days, until the pursuers were returned: and the pursuers sought them throughout all the way, but found them not. 
So the 
811,for the service thereof. 
For by the last words of David the Levites were numbered from twenty years old and above: 
Because their office was to wait on the sons of Aaron for the service of the house of the LORD, in the courts, and in the chambers, and in the purifying of all holy things, and the work of the service of the house of God; 
Both for the shewbread, and for the fine flour for meat offering, and for the unleavened cakes, and for that which is baked in the pan, and for that which is fried, and for all manner of measure and size; 
And to stand every morning to thank and praise the LORD, and likewise at even: 
And to offer all burnt sacrifices unto the LORD in the sabbaths, in the new moons, and on the set feasts, by number, according to the order commanded unto them, continually before the L
642,pert in war twenty and eight thousand and six hundred. 
And of Asher, such as went forth to battle, expert in war, forty thousand. 
And on the other side of Jordan, of the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and of the half tribe of Manasseh, with all manner of instruments of war for the battle, an hundred and twenty thousand. 
All these men of war, that could keep rank, came with a perfect heart to Hebron, to make David king over all Israel: and all the rest also of Israel were of one heart to make David king. 
And there they were with David three days, eating and drinking: for their brethren had prepared for them. 
Moreover they that were 
696,en, and learned their works. 
And they served their idols: which were a snare unto them. 
Yea, they sacrificed their sons and their daughters unto devils, 
And shed innocent blood, even the blood of their sons and of their daughters, whom they sacrificed unto the idols of Canaan: and the land was polluted with blood. 
Thus were they defiled with their own works, and went a whoring with their own inventions. 
Therefore was the wrath of the LORD kindled against his people, insomuch that he abhorred his own inheritance. 
And he gave them into the hand of the heathen; and they that hated them ruled over them. 
Their enemies also oppressed them, and they were brought into subjection under the
796,t when he was yet a great way off, his father saw him, and had compassion, and ran, and fell on his neck, and kissed him. 
And the son said unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and in thy sight, and am no more worthy to be called thy son. 
But the father said to his servants, Bring forth the best robe, and put it on him; and put a ring on his hand, and shoes on his feet: 
And bring hither the fatted calf, and kill it; and let us eat, and be merry: 
For this my son was dead, and is alive again; he was lost, and is found. And they began to be merry. 
Now his elder son was in the field: and as he came and drew nigh to the house, he heard musick and dancing. 
And he called one of the servants, and asked what these things meant. 
And he said unto him, Thy brother is come; and thy
743, speak the word without fear. 
Some indeed preach Christ even of envy and strife; and some also of good will: 
The one preach Christ of contention, not sincerely, supposing to add affliction to my bonds: 
But the other of love, knowing that I am set for the defence of the gospel. 
What then? notwithstanding, every way, whether in pretence, or in truth, Christ is preached; and I therein do rejoice, yea, and will rejoice. 
For I know that this shall turn to my salvation through your prayer, and the supply of the Spirit of Jesus Christ, 
According to my earnest expectation and my hope, that in nothing I shall be ashamed, but that with all boldness, as always, so now also Christ shall be magnified in my body, whether it be by life, or by
952,ery precious stone was thy covering, the sardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that thou wast created. 
Thou art the anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set thee so: thou wast upon the holy mountain of God; thou hast walked up and down in the midst of the stones of fire. 
Thou wast perfect in thy ways from the day that thou wast created, till iniquity was found in thee. 
By the multitude of thy merchandise they have filled the midst of thee with violence, and thou hast sinned: therefore I will cast thee as profane out of the mountain of God: and I will destroy thee, O covering cherub, from the midst of the stones of fire. 
Thine heart was lifted up because of thy beauty, thou hast corrupted thy wisdom by reason of thy brightness: I will cast thee to the ground, I will
647, in your days, O rebellious house, will I say the word, and will perform it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came to me, saying. 
Son of man, behold, they of the house of Israel say, The vision that he seeth is for many days to come, and he prophesieth of the times that are far off. 
Therefore say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; There shall none of my words be prolonged any more, but the word which I have spoken shall be done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the prophets of Israel that prophesy, and say thou unto them that prophesy out of their own hearts
673,en done more to my vineyard, that I have not done in it? wherefore, when I looked that it should bring forth grapes, brought it forth wild grapes? 
And now go to; I will tell you what I will do to my vineyard: I will take away the hedge thereof, and it shall be eaten up; and break down the wall thereof, and it shall be trodden down: 
And I will lay it waste: it shall not be pruned, nor digged; but there shall come up briers and thorns: I will also command the clouds that they rain no rain upon it. 
For the vineyard of the LORD of hosts is the house of Israel, and the men of Judah his pleasant plant: and he looked for judgment, but behold oppression; for righteousne
657,nto God, O that Ishmael might live before thee! 
And God said, Sarah thy wife shall bear thee a son indeed; and thou shalt call his name Isaac: and I will establish my covenant with him for an everlasting covenant, and with his seed after him. 
And as for Ishmael, I have heard thee: Behold, I have blessed him, and will make him fruitful, and will multiply him exceedingly; twelve princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation. 
But my covenant will I establish with Isaac, which Sarah shall bear unto thee at this set time in the next year. 
And he left off talking with him, and God went up from Abraham. 
And Abraham took Ishmael his son, a
778, are mine enemies wrongfully rejoice over me: neither let them wink with the eye that hate me without a cause. 
For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters against them that are quiet in the land. 
Yea, they opened their mouth wide against me, and said, Aha, aha, our eye hath seen it. 
This thou hast seen, O LORD: keep not silence: O Lord, be not far from me. 
Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause, my God and my Lord. 
Judge me, O LORD my God, according to thy righteousness; and let them not rejoice over me. 
Let them not say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let them not say, We have swallowed him up. 
Let them be ashamed and brought to confusion together that rejoice at mine hurt: let them be clothed with shame and dis
782, hundredfold, some sixtyfold, some thirtyfold. 
Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And the disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest thou unto them in parables? 
He answered and said unto them, Because it is given unto you to know the mysteries of the kingdom of heaven, but to them it is not given. 
For whosoever hath, to him shall be given, and he shall have more abundance: but whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken away even that he hath. 
Therefore speak I to them in parables: because they seeing see not; and hearing they hear not, neither do they understand. 
And in them is fulfilled the prophecy of Esaias, which saith, By hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and shall not perceive: 
For this people's heart is waxed g
762,ry. 
The face of the LORD is against them that do evil, to cut off the remembrance of them from the earth. 
The righteous cry, and the LORD heareth, and delivereth them out of all their troubles. 
The LORD is nigh unto them that are of a broken heart; and saveth such as be of a contrite spirit. 
Many are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD delivereth him out of them all. 
He keepeth all his bones: not one of them is broken. 
Evil shall slay the wicked: and they that hate the righteous shall be desolate. 
The LORD redeemeth the soul of his servants: and none of them that trust in him shall be desolate. 
Plead my cause, O LORD, with them that strive with me: fight against them that fight against me. 
Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand 
764,d all the day long; we are counted as sheep for the slaughter. 
Awake, why sleepest thou, O Lord? arise, cast us not off for ever. 
Wherefore hidest thou thy face, and forgettest our affliction and our oppression? 
For our soul is bowed down to the dust: our belly cleaveth unto the earth. 
Arise for our help, and redeem us for thy mercies' sake. 
My heart is inditing a good matter: I speak of the things which I have made touching the king: my tongue is the pen of a ready writer. 
Thou art fairer than the children of men: grace is poured into thy lips: therefore God hath blessed thee for ever. 
Gird thy sword upon thy thigh, O most mighty, with thy glory and thy majesty. 
And in thy majesty ride prosperously because of truth and meekness and righteousness
706,kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand against my lord; for he is the LORD's anointed. 
Moreover, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my hand: for in that I cut off the skirt of thy robe, and killed thee not, know thou and see that there is neither evil nor transgression in mine hand, and I have not sinned against thee; yet thou huntest my soul to take it. 
The LORD judge between me and thee, and the LORD avenge me of thee: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
As saith the proverb of the ancients, Wickedness proceedeth from the wicked: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
After whom is the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou purs
945,with death shall be disannulled, and your agreement with hell shall not stand; when the overflowing scourge shall pass through, then ye shall be trodden down by it. 
From the time that it goeth forth it shall take you: for morning by morning shall it pass over, by day and by night: and it shall be a vexation only to understand the report. 
For the bed is shorter than that a man can stretch himself on it: and the covering narrower than that he can wrap himself in it. 
For the LORD shall rise up as in mount Perazim, he shall be wroth as in the valley of Gibeon, that he may do his work, his strange work; and bring to pass his act, his strange act. 
Now therefore be ye not mockers, lest your bands be made strong: for I have heard from the Lord GOD of hosts a consumption, even determined upon the whole earth. 
Give ye ear, and hear my voice; hearken, and hear my speech. 
Doth the plowman plow all day to sow? doth he open and break the c
869,ked in the way of his father, and in the way of his mother, and in the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made Israel to sin: 
For he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of Israel, according to all that his father had done. 
Adam, Sheth, Enosh, 
Kenan, Mahalaleel, Jered, 
Henoch, Methuselah, Lamech, 
Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashchenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
The sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, Put, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raamah, and Sabtecha. And the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be mighty upon the earth. 
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, 
831,d you: continue ye in my love. 
If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kept my Father's commandments, and abide in his love. 
These things have I spoken unto you, that my joy might remain in you, and that your joy might be full. 
This is my commandment, That ye love one another, as I have loved you. 
Greater love hath no man than this, that a man lay down his life for his friends. 
Ye are my friends, if ye do whatsoever I command you. 
Henceforth I call you not servants; for the servant knoweth not what his lord doeth: but I have called you friends; for all things that I have heard of my Father I have made known unto you. 
Ye have not chosen me, but I have chosen you, and ordained you, that ye should go and bring forth fruit, and that your fruit should remain: that whatsoever ye shall ask 
872,or; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire of the wicked shall perish. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise, O ye servants of the LORD, praise the name of the LORD. 
Blessed be the name of the LORD from this time forth and for evermore. 
From the rising of the sun unto the going down of the same the LORD's name is to be praised. 
The LORD is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens. 
Who is like unto the LORD our God, who dwelleth on high, 
Who humbleth himself to behold the things that are in heaven, and in the earth! 
He raiseth up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth the needy out of the dunghill; 
That he may set him with princes, even with the princes of his people. 
He maketh the barren woman to keep house, and to
931,nd Tema, Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah: 
These are the sons of Ishmael, and these are their names, by their towns, and by their castles; twelve princes according to their nations. 
And these are the years of the life of Ishmael, an hundred and thirty and seven years: and he gave up the ghost and died; and was gathered unto his people. 
And they dwelt from Havilah unto Shur, that is before Egypt, as thou goest toward Assyria: and he died in the presence of all his brethren. 
And these are the generations of Isaac, Abraham's son: Abraham begat Isaac: 
And Isaac was forty years old when he took Rebekah to wife, the daughter of Bethuel the Syrian of Padanaram, the sister to Laban the Syrian. 
And Isaac intreated the LORD for his wife, because she was barren: and the LORD was intreated of him, and Rebekah his wife conceived. 
And the children struggled together within her; and she said, If it be so, why am I thus? And she we
828,And Moses gathered all the congregation of the children of Israel together, and said unto them, These are the words which the LORD hath commanded, that ye should do them. 
Six days shall work be done, but on the seventh day there shall be to you an holy day, a sabbath of rest to the LORD: whosoever doeth work therein shall be put to death. 
Ye shall kindle no fire throughout your habitations upon the sabbath day. 
And Moses spake unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which the LORD commanded, saying, 
Take ye from among you an offering unto the LORD: whosoever is of a willing heart, let him bring it, an offering of the LORD; gold, and silver, and brass, 
And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, 
And rams' skins dyed red, and badgers' skins, and shitt
826,made of the algum trees terraces to the house of the LORD, and to the king's palace, and harps and psalteries for singers: and there were none such seen before in the land of Judah. 
And king Solomon gave to the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the king. So she turned, and went away to her own land, she and her servants. 
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred and threescore and six talents of gold; 
Beside that which chapmen and merchants brought. And all the kings of Arabia and governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of beaten gold went to one target. 
And three hundred shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred shekels o
791, the sons of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob in Padanaram, with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his daughters were thirty and three. 
And the sons of Gad; Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri, and Arodi, and Areli. 
And the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah, and Serah their sister: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel. 
These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter, and these she bare unto Jacob, even sixteen souls. 
The sons of Rachel Jacob's wife; Joseph, and Benjamin. 
And unto Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and Ephraim, which Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On bare unto him. 
And the sons of Benjamin were Belah, and Becher, and Ashbel, Gera, and Naaman, Ehi, and Rosh, Muppim, 
884,ot of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom unto David the son of Jesse. 
Then all Israel gathered themselves to David unto Hebron, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
And moreover in time past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD thy God said unto thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my people Israel. 
Therefore came all the elders of Israel to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD by Samuel. 
And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where the Jebusites were, the inhabitants of the land. 
And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, Thou shalt not come hither. Nevertheless David took the castle of Zion, which is the 
873,ps made he in the edge of the curtain which was in the coupling of the second: the loops held one curtain to another. 
And he made fifty taches of gold, and coupled the curtains one unto another with the taches: so it became one tabernacle. 
And he made curtains of goats' hair for the tent over the tabernacle: eleven curtains he made them. 
The length of one curtain was thirty cubits, and four cubits was the breadth of one curtain: the eleven curtains were of one size. 
And he coupled five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves. 
And he made fifty loops upon the uttermost edge of the curtain in the coupling, and fifty loops made he upon the edge of the curtain which coupleth the second. 
And he made fifty taches of brass to couple the tent together, that it might be one. 
And he made a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a coverin
690,ore it; and it had ten horns. 
I considered the horns, and, behold, there came up among them another little horn, before whom there were three of the first horns plucked up by the roots: and, behold, in this horn were eyes like the eyes of man, and a mouth speaking great things. 
I beheld till the thrones were cast down, and the Ancient of days did sit, whose garment was white as snow, and the hair of his head like the pure wool: his throne was like the fiery flame, and his wheels as burning fire. 
A fiery stream issued and came forth from before him: thousand thousands ministered unto him, and ten thousand times ten thousand stood before him: the judgment was set, and the books we
805,h in the presence of the priests, and in the presence of all the people that stood in the house of the LORD, 
Even the prophet Jeremiah said, Amen: the LORD do so: the LORD perform thy words which thou hast prophesied, to bring again the vessels of the LORD's house, and all that is carried away captive, from Babylon into this place. 
Nevertheless hear thou now this word that I speak in thine ears, and in the ears of all the people; 
The prophets that have been before me and before thee of old prophesied both against many countries, and against great kingdoms, of war, and of evil, and of pestilence. 
The prophet which prophesieth of peace, when the word of the prophet shall come to pass, then shall the prophet be known, that the LORD hath truly sent him. 
Then Hananiah the prophet took the yoke 
724,etermined that Paul and Barnabas, and certain other of them, should go up to Jerusalem unto the apostles and elders about this question. 
And being brought on their way by the church, they passed through Phenice and Samaria, declaring the conversion of the Gentiles: and they caused great joy unto all the brethren. 
And when they were come to Jerusalem, they were received of the church, and of the apostles and elders, and they declared all things that God had done with them. 
But there rose up certain of the sect of the Pharisees which believed, saying, That it was needful to circumcise them, and to command them to keep the law of Moses. 
And the apostles and elders came together for to consider of this matter. 
And
715,, neither is there breath left in me. 
Then there came again and touched me one like the appearance of a man, and he strengthened me, 
And said, O man greatly beloved, fear not: peace be unto thee, be strong, yea, be strong. And when he had spoken unto me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak; for thou hast strengthened me. 
Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come. 
But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even 
714,nd the armed men went before the priests that blew with the trumpets, and the rereward came after the ark, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And Joshua had commanded the people, saying, Ye shall not shout, nor make any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the day I bid you shout; then shall ye shout. 
So the ark of the LORD compassed the city, going about it once: and they came into the camp, and lodged in the camp. 
And Joshua rose early in the morning, and the priests took up the ark of the LORD. 
And seven priests bearing seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of the LORD went on continually, and blew with the trumpets: and the armed m
730, Ephraim according to their armies: and the captain of the sons of Ephraim shall be Elishama the son of Ammihud. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty thousand and five hundred. 
And by him shall be the tribe of Manasseh: and the captain of the children of Manasseh shall be Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were thirty and two thousand and two hundred. 
Then the tribe of Benjamin: and the captain of the sons of Benjamin shall be Abidan the son of Gideoni. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were thirty and five thousand and four hundred. 
All that were numbered of the camp of Ephraim were an hundred thousand and eight thousand and
678,be witnesses unto yourselves, that ye are the children of them which killed the prophets. 
Fill ye up then the measure of your fathers. 
Ye serpents, ye generation of vipers, how can ye escape the damnation of hell? 
Wherefore, behold, I send unto you prophets, and wise men, and scribes: and some of them ye shall kill and crucify; and some of them shall ye scourge in your synagogues, and persecute them from city to city: 
That upon you may come all the righteous blood shed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the blood of Zacharias son of Barachias, whom ye slew between the temple and the altar. 
Verily I say unto you, All these things shall come upon t
718,shall I know that thou hast shewed kindness unto my master. 
And it came to pass, before he had done speaking, that, behold, Rebekah came out, who was born to Bethuel, son of Milcah, the wife of Nahor, Abraham's brother, with her pitcher upon her shoulder. 
And the damsel was very fair to look upon, a virgin, neither had any man known her: and she went down to the well, and filled her pitcher, and came up. 
And the servant ran to meet her, and said, Let me, I pray thee, drink a little water of thy pitcher. 
And she said, Drink, my lord: and she hasted, and let down her pitcher upon her hand, and gave him drink. 
And when she had done giving him drink, she said, I will draw water for thy camels also, until the
665,which didst not go out with our armies? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hear my cry, O God; attend unto my prayer. 
From the end of the earth will I cry unto thee, when my heart is overwhelmed: lead me to the rock that is higher than I. 
For thou hast been a shelter for me, and a strong tower from the enemy. 
I will abide in thy tabernacle for ever: I will trust in the covert of thy wings. Selah. 
For thou, O God, hast heard my vows: thou hast given me the heritage of those that fear thy name. 
Thou wilt prolong the king's life: and his years as man
659,e had set over them Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan; 
Even all the Jews returned out of all places whither they were driven, and came to the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, unto Mizpah, and gathered wine and summer fruits very much. 
Moreover Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were in the fields, came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, 
And said unto him, Dost thou certainly know that Baalis the king of the Ammonites hath sent Ishmael the son of Nethaniah to slay thee? But Gedaliah the son of Ahikam believed them not. 
Then Johanan the son of Kareah spake to Gedaliah in Mizpah secretly saying, Let me go, I pray thee, and 
882,ife, sold a possession, 
And kept back part of the price, his wife also being privy to it, and brought a certain part, and laid it at the apostles' feet. 
But Peter said, Ananias, why hath Satan filled thine heart to lie to the Holy Ghost, and to keep back part of the price of the land? 
Whiles it remained, was it not thine own? and after it was sold, was it not in thine own power? why hast thou conceived this thing in thine heart? thou hast not lied unto men, but unto God. 
And Ananias hearing these words fell down, and gave up the ghost: and great fear came on all them that heard these things. 
And the young men arose, wound him up, and carried him out, and buried him. 
And it was about the space of three hours after, when his wife, not knowing what was done, came in. 
And Peter answered unto her, Tell me whether ye sold the land for so much? And she said, Yea, for so
642,tion, and shall smite the waves in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD. 
Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour thy cedars. 
Howl, fir tree; for the cedar is fallen; because the mighty are spoiled: howl, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is come down. 
There is a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory is spoiled: a voice of the roaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoi
958,emies, who vexed them: and in the time of their trouble, when they cried unto thee, thou heardest them from heaven; and according to thy manifold mercies thou gavest them saviours, who saved them out of the hand of their enemies. 
But after they had rest, they did evil again before thee: therefore leftest thou them in the land of their enemies, so that they had the dominion over them: yet when they returned, and cried unto thee, thou heardest them from heaven; and many times didst thou deliver them according to thy mercies; 
And testifiedst against them, that thou mightest bring them again unto thy law: yet they dealt proudly, and hearkened not unto thy commandments, but sinned against thy judgments, (which if a man do, he shall live in them;) and withdrew the shoulder, and hardened their neck, and would not hear. 
Yet many years didst thou forbear them, and testifiedst against them by thy spirit in thy prophets: yet would they not give ear: th
874, 
And the children of Dan said unto him, Let not thy voice be heard among us, lest angry fellows run upon thee, and thou lose thy life, with the lives of thy household. 
And the children of Dan went their way: and when Micah saw that they were too strong for him, he turned and went back unto his house. 
And they took the things which Micah had made, and the priest which he had, and came unto Laish, unto a people that were at quiet and secure: and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and burnt the city with fire. 
And there was no deliverer, because it was far from Zidon, and they had no business with any man; and it was in the valley that lieth by Bethrehob. And they built a city, and dwelt therein. 
And they called the name of the city Dan, after the name of Dan their father, who was born unto Israel: howbeit the name of the city was Laish at the first. 
842,en of Judah, and they shall sell them to the Sabeans, to a people far off: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
Proclaim ye this among the Gentiles; Prepare war, wake up the mighty men, let all the men of war draw near; let them come up: 
Beat your plowshares into swords and your pruninghooks into spears: let the weak say, I am strong. 
Assemble yourselves, and come, all ye heathen, and gather yourselves together round about: thither cause thy mighty ones to come down, O LORD. 
Let the heathen be wakened, and come up to the valley of Jehoshaphat: for there will I sit to judge all the heathen round about. 
Put ye in the sickle, for the harvest is ripe: come, get you down; for the press is full, the fats overflow; for their wickedness is great. 
Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley
939, the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, the land, with the cities thereof in the coasts, even the cities of the country round about. 
And the children of Gad built Dibon, and Ataroth, and Aroer, 
And Atroth, Shophan, and Jaazer, and Jogbehah, 
And Bethnimrah, and Bethharan, fenced cities: and folds for sheep. 
And the children of Reuben built Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Kirjathaim, 
And Nebo, and Baalmeon, (their names being changed,) and Shibmah: and gave other names unto the cities which they builded. 
And the children of Machir the son of Manasseh went to Gilead, and took it, and dispossessed the Amorite which was in it. 
And Moses gave Gilead unto Machir the son of Manasseh; and he dwelt therein. 
And Jair the son of Manasseh went and took the small towns thereof, and called them Havothjair. 
And Nobah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name. 
These are the journeys of the children
700, power unto his people. Blessed be God. 
Save me, O God; for the waters are come in unto my soul. 
I sink in deep mire, where there is no standing: I am come into deep waters, where the floods overflow me. 
I am weary of my crying: my throat is dried: mine eyes fail while I wait for my God. 
They that hate me without a cause are more than the hairs of mine head: they that would destroy me, being mine enemies wrongfully, are mighty: then I restored that which I took not away. 
O God, thou knowest my foolishness; and my sins are not hid from thee. 
Let not them that wait on thee, O Lord GOD of hosts, be ashamed for my sake: let not those that seek thee be confounded for my sake, O God of Israe
764,e hands of the Philistines. And there was peace between Israel and the Amorites. 
And Samuel judged Israel all the days of his life. 
And he went from year to year in circuit to Bethel, and Gilgal, and Mizpeh, and judged Israel in all those places. 
And his return was to Ramah; for there was his house; and there he judged Israel; and there he built an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when Samuel was old, that he made his sons judges over Israel. 
Now the name of his firstborn was Joel; and the name of his second, Abiah: they were judges in Beersheba. 
And his sons walked not in his ways, but turned aside after lucre, and took bribes, and perverted judgment. 
Then all the elders of Israel gathered themselves together, and came to Samuel unto Ram
681,im: and in my name shall his horn be exalted. 
I will set his hand also in the sea, and his right hand in the rivers. 
He shall cry unto me, Thou art my father, my God, and the rock of my salvation. 
Also I will make him my firstborn, higher than the kings of the earth. 
My mercy will I keep for him for evermore, and my covenant shall stand fast with him. 
His seed also will I make to endure for ever, and his throne as the days of heaven. 
If his children forsake my law, and walk not in my judgments; 
If they break my statutes, and keep not my commandments; 
Then will I visit their transgression with the rod, and their iniquity with stripes. 
Nevertheless my lovingkindness
789,f Ahab, and also hast slain thy brethren of thy father's house, which were better than thyself: 
Behold, with a great plague will the LORD smite thy people, and thy children, and thy wives, and all thy goods: 
And thou shalt have great sickness by disease of thy bowels, until thy bowels fall out by reason of the sickness day by day. 
Moreover the LORD stirred up against Jehoram the spirit of the Philistines, and of the Arabians, that were near the Ethiopians: 
And they came up into Judah, and brake into it, and carried away all the substance that was found in the king's house, and his sons also, and his wives; so that there was never a son left him, save Jehoahaz, the youngest of his sons. 
And after all this the LORD smote him in his bowels with an incurable disease. 
And it ca
844,h hath established me, and set me on the throne of David my father, and who hath made me an house, as he promised, Adonijah shall be put to death this day. 
And king Solomon sent by the hand of Benaiah the son of Jehoiada; and he fell upon him that he died. 
And unto Abiathar the priest said the king, Get thee to Anathoth, unto thine own fields; for thou art worthy of death: but I will not at this time put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD God before David my father, and because thou hast been afflicted in all wherein my father was afflicted. 
So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest unto the LORD; that he might fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning the house of Eli in Shiloh. 
Then tidings came to Joab: for Joab had turned after Adonijah, though he turned not after Absalom. And Joab fle
746,d the bones of him that encampeth against thee: thou hast put them to shame, because God hath despised them. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! When God bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and Israel shall be glad. 
Save me, O God, by thy name, and judge me by thy strength. 
Hear my prayer, O God; give ear to the words of my mouth. 
For strangers are risen up against me, and oppressors seek after my soul: they have not set God before them. Selah. 
Behold, God is mine helper: the Lord is with them that uphold my soul. 
He shall reward evil unto mine enemies: cut them off in thy truth. 
I will freely sacrifice unto thee: I will praise thy name, O LORD; for it is good. 
For he hath delivered
741, 
He shall build an house for my name, and I will stablish the throne of his kingdom for ever. 
I will be his father, and he shall be my son. If he commit iniquity, I will chasten him with the rod of men, and with the stripes of the children of men: 
But my mercy shall not depart away from him, as I took it from Saul, whom I put away before thee. 
And thine house and thy kingdom shall be established for ever before thee: thy throne shall be established for ever. 
According to all these words, and according to all this vision, so did Nathan speak unto David. 
Then went king David in, and sat before the LORD, and he said, Who am I, O Lord GOD? and what is my house, that thou hast brought me hitherto? 
And this was yet a small thing i
655,with precious stones for beauty: and the gold was gold of Parvaim. 
He overlaid also the house, the beams, the posts, and the walls thereof, and the doors thereof, with gold; and graved cherubims on the walls. 
And he made the most holy house, the length whereof was according to the breadth of the house, twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits: and he overlaid it with fine gold, amounting to six hundred talents. 
And the weight of the nails was fifty shekels of gold. And he overlaid the upper chambers with gold. 
And in the most holy house he made two cherubims of image work, and overlaid them with gold. 
And the wings of the cherubim
678, decided it. 
And he hasted, and took the ashes away from his face; and the king of Israel discerned him that he was of the prophets. 
And he said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Because thou hast let go out of thy hand a man whom I appointed to utter destruction, therefore thy life shall go for his life, and thy people for his people. 
And the king of Israel went to his house heavy and displeased, and came to Samaria. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Naboth the Jezreelite had a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of Ahab king of Samaria. 
And Ahab spake unto Naboth, saying, Give me thy vineyard, that I may have it for a garden of herbs, becau
695,ael? But he answered him not that day. 
And Saul said, Draw ye near hither, all the chief of the people: and know and see wherein this sin hath been this day. 
For, as the LORD liveth, which saveth Israel, though it be in Jonathan my son, he shall surely die. But there was not a man among all the people that answered him. 
Then said he unto all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and Jonathan my son will be on the other side. And the people said unto Saul, Do what seemeth good unto thee. 
Therefore Saul said unto the LORD God of Israel, Give a perfect lot. And Saul and Jonathan were taken: but the people escaped. 
And Saul said, Cast lots between me and Jonathan my son. And Jonathan was ta
882,of his words: and when I heard the voice of his words, then was I in a deep sleep on my face, and my face toward the ground. 
And, behold, an hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and upon the palms of my hands. 
And he said unto me, O Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words. 
But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days: but, lo, Michael, one of the chief princes, came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia. 
Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in 
960, offering, which is at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall take all his fat from him, and burn it upon the altar. 
And he shall do with the bullock as he did with the bullock for a sin offering, so shall he do with this: and the priest shall make an atonement for them, and it shall be forgiven them. 
And he shall carry forth the bullock without the camp, and burn him as he burned the first bullock: it is a sin offering for the congregation. 
When a ruler hath sinned, and done somewhat through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD his God concerning things which should not be done, and is guilty; 
Or if his sin, wherein he hath sinned, come to his knowledge; he shall bring his offering, a kid of the goats, a male without blemish: 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the goat, and kill it in the place where they kill the burnt offering before the LORD: it is a sin offering. 
And the priest shall take
714,s shall call him blessed. 
Blessed be the LORD God, the God of Israel, who only doeth wondrous things. 
And blessed be his glorious name for ever: and let the whole earth be filled with his glory; Amen, and Amen. 
The prayers of David the son of Jesse are ended. 
Truly God is good to Israel, even to such as are of a clean heart. 
But as for me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well nigh slipped. 
For I was envious at the foolish, when I saw the prosperity of the wicked. 
For there are no bands in their death: but their strength is firm. 
They are not in trouble as other men; neither are they plagued like other men. 
Therefore pride compasseth them about as a chain; violence covereth them as a garmen
917, have. 
For it there be first a willing mind, it is accepted according to that a man hath, and not according to that he hath not. 
For I mean not that other men be eased, and ye burdened: 
But by an equality, that now at this time your abundance may be a supply for their want, that their abundance also may be a supply for your want: that there may be equality: 
As it is written, He that had gathered much had nothing over; and he that had gathered little had no lack. 
But thanks be to God, which put the same earnest care into the heart of Titus for you. 
For indeed he accepted the exhortation; but being more forward, of his own accord he went unto you. 
And we have sent with him the brother, whose praise is in the gospel throughout all the churches; 
And not that only, but who was also chosen of the churches to travel with us with this grace, which is administered by us to the glory of the same Lord, and 
883,de Saul king over Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Samuel, How long wilt thou mourn for Saul, seeing I have rejected him from reigning over Israel? fill thine horn with oil, and go, I will send thee to Jesse the Bethlehemite: for I have provided me a king among his sons. 
And Samuel said, How can I go? if Saul hear it, he will kill me. And the LORD said, Take an heifer with thee, and say, I am come to sacrifice to the LORD. 
And call Jesse to the sacrifice, and I will shew thee what thou shalt do: and thou shalt anoint unto me him whom I name unto thee. 
And Samuel did that which the LORD spake, and came to Bethlehem. And the elders of the town trembled at his coming, and said, Comest thou peaceably? 
And he said, Peaceably: I am come to sacrifice unto the LORD: sanctify yourselves, and come with me to the sacrifice. And he sanctified Jesse and his sons, and called them t
780,them was darkened, and the day shone not for a third part of it, and the night likewise. 
And I beheld, and heard an angel flying through the midst of heaven, saying with a loud voice, Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of the earth by reason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three angels, which are yet to sound! 
And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a star fall from heaven unto the earth: and to him was given the key of the bottomless pit. 
And he opened the bottomless pit; and there arose a smoke out of the pit, as the smoke of a great furnace; and the sun and the air were darkened by reason of the smoke of the pit. 
And there came out of the smoke locusts upon the earth: and unto them was given power, as the scorpions of the earth have power. 
And it was comm
649,my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand. 
Thus Edom refused to give Israel passage through his border: wherefore Israel turned away from him. 
And the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, journeyed from Kadesh, and came unto mount Hor. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron in mount Hor, by the coast of the land of Edom, saying, 
Aaron shall be gathered unto his people: for he shall not enter into the land which I have given unto the childr
885,is people draweth nigh unto me with their mouth, and honoureth me with their lips; but their heart is far from me. 
But in vain they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men. 
And he called the multitude, and said unto them, Hear, and understand: 
Not that which goeth into the mouth defileth a man; but that which cometh out of the mouth, this defileth a man. 
Then came his disciples, and said unto him, Knowest thou that the Pharisees were offended, after they heard this saying? 
But he answered and said, Every plant, which my heavenly Father hath not planted, shall be rooted up. 
Let them alone: they be blind leaders of the blind. And if the blind lead the blind, both shall fall into the ditch. 
Then answered Peter and said unto him, Declare unto us this parable. 
And Jesus said, Are ye also yet without understanding? 
Do not ye yet understand, that wh
646,se things have I spoken unto you, that ye should not be offended. 
They shall put you out of the synagogues: yea, the time cometh, that whosoever killeth you will think that he doeth God service. 
And these things will they do unto you, because they have not known the Father, nor me. 
But these things have I told you, that when the time shall come, ye may remember that I told you of them. And these things I said not unto you at the beginning, because I was with you. 
But now I go my way to him that sent me; and none of you asketh me, Whither goest thou? 
But because I have said these things unto you, sorrow hath filled your heart. 
Nevert
738, am God? but thou shalt be a man, and no God, in the hand of him that slayeth thee. 
Thou shalt die the deaths of the uncircumcised by the hand of strangers: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, take up a lamentation upon the king of Tyrus, and say unto him, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou sealest up the sum, full of wisdom, and perfect in beauty. 
Thou hast been in Eden the garden of God; every precious stone was thy covering, the sardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that thou wast created. 
Th
953,hem. 
And I have consumed them, and wounded them, that they could not arise: yea, they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength to battle: them that rose up against me hast thou subdued under me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies, that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They looked, but there was none to save; even unto the LORD, but he answered them not. 
Then did I beat them as small as the dust of the earth, I did stamp them as the mire of the street, and did spread them abroad. 
Thou also hast delivered me from the strivings of my people, thou hast kept me to be head of the heathen: a people which I knew not shall serve me. 
Strangers shall submit themselves unto me: as soon as they hear, they shall be obedient unto me. 
Strangers shall fade away, and they shall be afraid out of their close places. 
The LORD liveth; and blessed be my rock; and exalted be the God of the rock of my salvation. 
It
704,but the free gift is of many offences unto justification. 
For if by one man's offence death reigned by one; much more they which receive abundance of grace and of the gift of righteousness shall reign in life by one, Jesus Christ.) 
Therefore as by the offence of one judgment came upon all men to condemnation; even so by the righteousness of one the free gift came upon all men unto justification of life. 
For as by one man's disobedience many were made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But where sin abounded, grace did much more abound: 
That as sin hath reigned unto death, even so might grace reign throug
893,even cubits broad: for without in the wall of the house he made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 
And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building. 
The door for the middle chamber was in the right side of the house: and they went up with winding stairs into the middle chamber, and out of the middle into the third. 
So he built the house, and finished it; and covered the house with beams and boards of cedar. 
And then he built chambers against all the house, five cubits high: and they rested on the house with timber of cedar. 
And the word of the LORD came to Solomon, saying, 
Concerning this house which thou art in building, if thou wilt walk in my statutes, and ex
792,ving. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword: though their terror was caused in the land of the living, yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit: he is put in the midst of them that be slain. 
There is Meshech, Tubal, and all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword, though they caused their terror in the land
753, of their salvation perfect through sufferings. 
For both he that sanctifieth and they who are sanctified are all of one: for which cause he is not ashamed to call them brethren, 
Saying, I will declare thy name unto my brethren, in the midst of the church will I sing praise unto thee. 
And again, I will put my trust in him. And again, Behold I and the children which God hath given me. 
Forasmuch then as the children are partakers of flesh and blood, he also himself likewise took part of the same; that through death he might destroy him that had the power of death, that is, the devil; 
And deliver them who through fear of death were all their lifetime subject to bondage. 
For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took on him t
823,mmand thee this day. 
For the LORD thy God blesseth thee, as he promised thee: and thou shalt lend unto many nations, but thou shalt not borrow; and thou shalt reign over many nations, but they shall not reign over thee. 
If there be among you a poor man of one of thy brethren within any of thy gates in thy land which the LORD thy God giveth thee, thou shalt not harden thine heart, nor shut thine hand from thy poor brother: 
But thou shalt open thine hand wide unto him, and shalt surely lend him sufficient for his need, in that which he wanteth. 
Beware that there be not a thought in thy wicked heart, saying, The seventh year, the year of release, is at hand; and thine eye be evil against thy poor brother, and thou givest him nought; and he cry unto the LORD against thee, and it be sin unto thee. 
Thou shalt sur
700,ied away captive into Babylon the remnant of the people that remained in the city, and those that fell away, that fell to him, with the rest of the people that remained. 
But Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard left of the poor of the people, which had nothing, in the land of Judah, and gave them vineyards and fields at the same time. 
Now Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon gave charge concerning Jeremiah to Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard, saying, 
Take him, and look well to him, and do him no harm; but do unto him even as he shall say unto thee. 
So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard sent, and Nebushasban, Rabsaris, and Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, and all the king of Babylon's princes; 
Ev
710, of memorial, bringing iniquity to remembrance. 
And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before the LORD: 
And the priest shall take holy water in an earthen vessel; and of the dust that is in the floor of the tabernacle the priest shall take, and put it into the water: 
And the priest shall set the woman before the LORD, and uncover the woman's head, and put the offering of memorial in her hands, which is the jealousy offering: and the priest shall have in his hand the bitter water that causeth the curse: 
And the priest shall charge her by an oath, and say unto the woman, If no man have lain with thee, and if thou hast not gone aside to uncleanness with another instead of thy husband, be th
852,em unto the valley of Achor. 
And Joshua said, Why hast thou troubled us? the LORD shall trouble thee this day. And all Israel stoned him with stones, and burned them with fire, after they had stoned them with stones. 
And they raised over him a great heap of stones unto this day. So the LORD turned from the fierceness of his anger. Wherefore the name of that place was called, The valley of Achor, unto this day. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear not, neither be thou dismayed: take all the people of war with thee, and arise, go up to Ai: see, I have given into thy hand the king of Ai, and his people, and his city, and his land: 
And thou shalt do to Ai and her king as thou didst unto Jericho and her king: only the spoil thereof, and the cattle thereof, shall ye take for a prey unto yourselves: lay thee an ambush for the city behind it. 
S
663, that they should kill one another: and there was given unto him a great sword. 
And when he had opened the third seal, I heard the third beast say, Come and see. And I beheld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat on him had a pair of balances in his hand. 
And I heard a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell followed with him. And power was given unt
853,e, even this whole nation. 
Bring ye all the tithes into the storehouse, that there may be meat in mine house, and prove me now herewith, saith the LORD of hosts, if I will not open you the windows of heaven, and pour you out a blessing, that there shall not be room enough to receive it. 
And I will rebuke the devourer for your sakes, and he shall not destroy the fruits of your ground; neither shall your vine cast her fruit before the time in the field, saith the LORD of hosts. 
And all nations shall call you blessed: for ye shall be a delightsome land, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Your words have been stout against me, saith the LORD. Yet ye say, What have we spoken so much against thee? 
Ye have said, It is vain to serve God: and what profit is it that we have kept his ordinance, and that we have walked mournfully before the LORD of hosts? 
A
942,pened he thine eyes? 
He answered them, I have told you already, and ye did not hear: wherefore would ye hear it again? will ye also be his disciples? 
Then they reviled him, and said, Thou art his disciple; but we are Moses' disciples. 
We know that God spake unto Moses: as for this fellow, we know not from whence he is. 
The man answered and said unto them, Why herein is a marvellous thing, that ye know not from whence he is, and yet he hath opened mine eyes. 
Now we know that God heareth not sinners: but if any man be a worshipper of God, and doeth his will, him he heareth. 
Since the world began was it not heard that any man opened the eyes of one that was born blind. 
If this man were not of God, he could do nothing. 
They answered and said unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out. 
Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost tho
679,er are as wounds, and they go down into the innermost parts of the belly. 
Burning lips and a wicked heart are like a potsherd covered with silver dross. 
He that hateth dissembleth with his lips, and layeth up deceit within him; 
When he speaketh fair, believe him not: for there are seven abominations in his heart. 
Whose hatred is covered by deceit, his wickedness shall be shewed before the whole congregation. 
Whoso diggeth a pit shall fall therein: and he that rolleth a stone, it will return upon him. 
A lying tongue hateth those that are afflicted by it; and a flattering mouth worketh ruin. 
Boast not thyself of to morrow; for thou knowest not what a day may bring f
844,e hand of Moses. 
And they gave out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, these cities which are here mentioned by name. 
Which the children of Aaron, being of the families of the Kohathites, who were of the children of Levi, had: for theirs was the first lot. 
And they gave them the city of Arba the father of Anak, which city is Hebron, in the hill country of Judah, with the suburbs thereof round about it. 
But the fields of the city, and the villages thereof, gave they to Caleb the son of Jephunneh for his possession. 
Thus they gave to the children of Aaron the priest Hebron with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Libnah with her suburbs, 
And Jattir with her suburbs, and Eshtemoa with her suburbs, 
And Holon with her suburbs, and Debir with her suburbs, 
And A
940,our houses shall be made a dunghill. 
But if ye shew the dream, and the interpretation thereof, ye shall receive of me gifts and rewards and great honour: therefore shew me the dream, and the interpretation thereof. 
They answered again and said, Let the king tell his servants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation of it. 
The king answered and said, I know of certainty that ye would gain the time, because ye see the thing is gone from me. 
But if ye will not make known unto me the dream, there is but one decree for you: for ye have prepared lying and corrupt words to speak before me, till the time be changed: therefore tell me the dream, and I shall know that ye can shew me the interpretation thereof. 
The Chaldeans answered before the king, and said, There is not a man upon the earth that can shew the king's matter: therefore there is no king, lord, nor ruler, that asked such things at any magician, or astrologer, or
828,rs, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But where sin abounded, grace did much more abound: 
That as sin hath reigned unto death, even so might grace reign through righteousness unto eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For if we have been planted together in the likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness
691,ay, She is my wife; lest, said he, the men of the place should kill me for Rebekah; because she was fair to look upon. 
And it came to pass, when he had been there a long time, that Abimelech king of the Philistines looked out at a window, and saw, and, behold, Isaac was sporting with Rebekah his wife. 
And Abimelech called Isaac, and said, Behold, of a surety she is thy wife; and how saidst thou, She is my sister? And Isaac said unto him, Because I said, Lest I die for her. 
And Abimelech said, What is this thou hast done unto us? one of the people might lightly have lien with thy wife, and thou shouldest have brought guiltiness upon us. 
And Abimelech charged all his people, sayin
889,s commit fornication, as some of them committed, and fell in one day three and twenty thousand. 
Neither let us tempt Christ, as some of them also tempted, and were destroyed of serpents. 
Neither murmur ye, as some of them also murmured, and were destroyed of the destroyer. 
Now all these things happened unto them for ensamples: and they are written for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the world are come. 
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall. 
There hath no temptation taken you but such as is common to man: but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that ye are able; but will with the temptation also make a way to escape, that ye may be able to bear it. 
Wherefore, my dearly beloved, flee from idolatry. 
I speak as to wise men; judge ye what I say. 
The cup of blessing which we bless, is it not the communion of the blo
835,ongregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the chamber of the house of our God, was allied unto Tobiah: 
And he had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meat offerings, the frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of the corn, the new wine, and the oil, which was commanded to be given to the Levites, and the singers, and the porters; and the offerings of the priests. 
But in all this time was not I at Jerusalem: for in the two and thirtieth year of Artaxerxes ki
779, thus saith the LORD, If thou return, then will I bring thee again, and thou shalt stand before me: and if thou take forth the precious from the vile, thou shalt be as my mouth: let them return unto thee; but return not thou unto them. 
And I will make thee unto this people a fenced brasen wall: and they shall fight against thee, but they shall not prevail against thee: for I am with thee to save thee and to deliver thee, saith the LORD. 
And I will deliver thee out of the hand of the wicked, and I will redeem thee out of the hand of the terrible. 
The word of the LORD came also unto me, saying, 
Thou shalt not take thee a wife, neither shalt thou have sons or daughters in this place. 
For thus saith the LORD concerning the sons and concerning the daughters that are bo
724,nded the Jews which dwelt at Damascus, proving that this is very Christ. 
And after that many days were fulfilled, the Jews took counsel to kill him: 
But their laying await was known of Saul. And they watched the gates day and night to kill him. 
Then the disciples took him by night, and let him down by the wall in a basket. 
And when Saul was come to Jerusalem, he assayed to join himself to the disciples: but they were all afraid of him, and believed not that he was a disciple. 
But Barnabas took him, and brought him to the apostles, and declared unto them how he had seen the Lord in the way, and that he had spoken to him, and how he had preached boldly at Damascus in the name of Jesus. 
And he was with them comi
847,suring reed. 
He turned about to the west side, and measured five hundred reeds with the measuring reed. 
He measured it by the four sides: it had a wall round about, five hundred reeds long, and five hundred broad, to make a separation between the sanctuary and the profane place. 
Afterward he brought me to the gate, even the gate that looketh toward the east: 
And, behold, the glory of the God of Israel came from the way of the east: and his voice was like a noise of many waters: and the earth shined with his glory. 
And it was according to the appearance of the vision which I saw, even according to the vision that I saw when I came to destroy the city: and the visions were like the vision that I saw by the river Chebar; and I fell upon my face. 
And the glory of the LORD came into the house by the way of the gate whose prospect is t
940, the sword thy daughters in the field: and he shall make a fort against thee, and cast a mount against thee, and lift up the buckler against thee. 
And he shall set engines of war against thy walls, and with his axes he shall break down thy towers. 
By reason of the abundance of his horses their dust shall cover thee: thy walls shall shake at the noise of the horsemen, and of the wheels, and of the chariots, when he shall enter into thy gates, as men enter into a city wherein is made a breach. 
With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy streets: he shall slay thy people by the sword, and thy strong garrisons shall go down to the ground. 
And they shall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy pleasant houses: and they shall lay thy stones and thy timber and thy dust in the midst of the water. 
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to ce
852,he LORD liveth, the man that hath done this thing shall surely die: 
And he shall restore the lamb fourfold, because he did this thing, and because he had no pity. 
And Nathan said to David, Thou art the man. Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I anointed thee king over Israel, and I delivered thee out of the hand of Saul; 
And I gave thee thy master's house, and thy master's wives into thy bosom, and gave thee the house of Israel and of Judah; and if that had been too little, I would moreover have given unto thee such and such things. 
Wherefore hast thou despised the commandment of the LORD, to do evil in his sight? thou hast killed Uriah the Hittite with the sword, and hast taken his wife to be thy wife, and hast slain him with the sword of the children of Ammon. 
Now therefore the sword shall never depart from thine house; because thou h
807,ir wounds. 
He telleth the number of the stars; he calleth them all by their names. 
Great is our Lord, and of great power: his understanding is infinite. 
The LORD lifteth up the meek: he casteth the wicked down to the ground. 
Sing unto the LORD with thanksgiving; sing praise upon the harp unto our God: 
Who covereth the heaven with clouds, who prepareth rain for the earth, who maketh grass to grow upon the mountains. 
He giveth to the beast his food, and to the young ravens which cry. 
He delighteth not in the strength of the horse: he taketh not pleasure in the legs of a man. 
The LORD taketh pleasure in them that fear him, in those that hope in his mercy. 
Praise the LORD, O Jerusalem; praise thy God, O Zion. 
For he hath strengthened the bars of thy gates; he hath blessed thy children withi
898,ves to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake: whether it be to the king, as supreme; 
Or unto governors, as unto them that are sent by him for the punishment of evildoers, and for the praise of them that do well. 
For so is the will of God, that with well doing ye may put to silence the ignorance of foolish men: 
As free, and not using your liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God. 
Honour all men. Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king. 
Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 
For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscience toward God endure grief, suffering wrongfully. 
For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 
For even hereunto were
717,man: howbeit there is a kinsman nearer than I. 
Tarry this night, and it shall be in the morning, that if he will perform unto thee the part of a kinsman, well; let him do the kinsman's part: but if he will not do the part of a kinsman to thee, then will I do the part of a kinsman to thee, as the LORD liveth: lie down until the morning. 
And she lay at his feet until the morning: and she rose up before one could know another. And he said, Let it not be known that a woman came into the floor. 
Also he said, Bring the vail that thou hast upon thee, and hold it. And when she held it, he measured six measures of barley, and laid it on her: and she went into the city. 
And when she came to her mother in law, she 
853, of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he that rebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove not a scorner, lest he hate thee: rebuke a wise man, and he will love thee. 
Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: and the knowledge of the holy is understanding. 
For by me thy days shall be multiplied, and the years of thy life shall be increased. 
If thou be wise, thou shalt be wise for thyself: but if thou scornest, thou alone shalt bear it. 
A foolish woman is clamorous: she is simple, and knoweth nothing. 
For she sitteth at the door of her house, on a seat in the high places of the city, 
To call passengers who go right on their ways: 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: 
717, son of a valiant man of Kabzeel, who had done many acts; he slew two lionlike men of Moab: also he went down and slew a lion in a pit in a snowy day. 
And he slew an Egyptian, a man of great stature, five cubits high; and in the Egyptian's hand was a spear like a weaver's beam; and he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name among the three mighties. 
Behold, he was honourable among the thirty, but attained not to the first three: and David set him over his guard. 
Also the valiant men of the armies were, Asahel the brother of Joab, Elhanan the son of Dodo of Bethlehem, 
S
734,be killed. 
And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the passover, that we may eat. 
And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare? 
And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city, there shall a man meet you, bearing a pitcher of water; follow him into the house where he entereth in. 
And ye shall say unto the goodman of the house, The Master saith unto thee, Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples? 
And he shall shew you a large upper room furnished: there make ready. 
And they went, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the passover. 
And when the hour was come, he sat down, and the twelve apostles with him. 
And he said unto the
903,: for we come in a good day: give, I pray thee, whatsoever cometh to thine hand unto thy servants, and to thy son David. 
And when David's young men came, they spake to Nabal according to all those words in the name of David, and ceased. 
And Nabal answered David's servants, and said, Who is David? and who is the son of Jesse? there be many servants now a days that break away every man from his master. 
Shall I then take my bread, and my water, and my flesh that I have killed for my shearers, and give it unto men, whom I know not whence they be? 
So David's young men turned their way, and went again, and came and told him all those sayings. 
And David said unto his men, Gird ye on every man his sword. And they girded on every man his sword; and David also girded on his sword: and there went up after David about four hundred men; and two hundred abode by the stuff. 
But one of the young men 
784,e tabernacle, twenty boards on the south side southward. 
And thou shalt make forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards; two sockets under one board for his two tenons, and two sockets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side there shall be twenty boards: 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six boards. 
And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they shall be coupled together beneath, and they shall be coupled together above the head of it unto one ring: thus shall it be for them both; they shall be for the two corners. 
And they shall be 
785, was exceeding fair, and nourished up in his father's house three months: 
And when he was cast out, Pharaoh's daughter took him up, and nourished him for her own son. 
And Moses was learned in all the wisdom of the Egyptians, and was mighty in words and in deeds. 
And when he was full forty years old, it came into his heart to visit his brethren the children of Israel. 
And seeing one of them suffer wrong, he defended him, and avenged him that was oppressed, and smote the Egyptian: 
For he supposed his brethren would have understood how that God by his hand would deliver them: but they understood not. 
And the next day he shewed himself unto them as they strove, and would have set them at one again, saying, Sirs, ye are brethren; why do ye wrong one to another? 
But he that
802, the same things unto them, forbearing threatening: knowing that your Master also is in heaven; neither is there respect of persons with him. 
Finally, my brethren, be strong in the Lord, and in the power of his might. 
Put on the whole armour of God, that ye may be able to stand against the wiles of the devil. 
For we wrestle not against flesh and blood, but against principalities, against powers, against the rulers of the darkness of this world, against spiritual wickedness in high places. 
Wherefore take unto you the whole armour of God, that ye may be able to withstand in the evil day, and having done all, to stand. 
Stand therefore, having your loins girt about with truth, and having on the breastplate of righteousness; 
And your feet shod with the preparation of the gospel of peace; 
A
657,th an army, and rescued him, having understood that he was a Roman. 
And when I would have known the cause wherefore they accused him, I brought him forth into their council: 
Whom I perceived to be accused of questions of their law, but to have nothing laid to his charge worthy of death or of bonds. 
And when it was told me how that the Jews laid wait for the man, I sent straightway to thee, and gave commandment to his accusers also to say before thee what they had against him. Farewell. 
Then the soldiers, as it was commanded them, took Paul, and brought him by night to Antipatris. 
On the morrow they left the horsemen to go with him, and returned
831, and other, and said unto Baruch, We will surely tell the king of all these words. 
And they asked Baruch, saying, Tell us now, How didst thou write all these words at his mouth? 
Then Baruch answered them, He pronounced all these words unto me with his mouth, and I wrote them with ink in the book. 
Then said the princes unto Baruch, Go, hide thee, thou and Jeremiah; and let no man know where ye be. 
And they went in to the king into the court, but they laid up the roll in the chamber of Elishama the scribe, and told all the words in the ears of the king. 
So the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll: and he took it out of Elishama the scribe's chamber. And Jehudi read it in the ears of the king, and in the ears of all the princes which stood beside the king. 
Now the king sat in the winterhouse in the ninth month: and the
806,lished my fury in them. 
Moreover I will make thee waste, and a reproach among the nations that are round about thee, in the sight of all that pass by. 
So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an astonishment unto the nations that are round about thee, when I shall execute judgments in thee in anger and in fury and in furious rebukes. I the LORD have spoken it. 
When I shall send upon them the evil arrows of famine, which shall be for their destruction, and which I will send to destroy you: and I will increase the famine upon you, and will break your staff of bread: 
So will I send upon you famine and evil beasts, and they shall bereave thee: and pestilence and blood shall pass through thee; and I will bring the sword upon thee. I the LORD have spoken it. 
And the word of the L
819,ving damnation, because they have cast off their first faith. 
And withal they learn to be idle, wandering about from house to house; and not only idle, but tattlers also and busybodies, speaking things which they ought not. 
I will therefore that the younger women marry, bear children, guide the house, give none occasion to the adversary to speak reproachfully. 
For some are already turned aside after Satan. 
If any man or woman that believeth have widows, let them relieve them, and let not the church be charged; that it may relieve them that are widows indeed. 
Let the elders that rule well be counted worthy of double honour, especially they who labour in the word and doctrine. 
For the scripture saith, thou shalt not muzzle the ox that treadeth out the corn. And, The labourer is worthy of his reward. 
Aga
858,be slain all of you: as a bowing wall shall ye be, and as a tottering fence. 
They only consult to cast him down from his excellency: they delight in lies: they bless with their mouth, but they curse inwardly. Selah. 
My soul, wait thou only upon God; for my expectation is from him. 
He only is my rock and my salvation: he is my defence; I shall not be moved. 
In God is my salvation and my glory: the rock of my strength, and my refuge, is in God. 
Trust in him at all times; ye people, pour out your heart before him: God is a refuge for us. Selah. 
Surely men of low degree are vanity, and men of high degree are a lie: to be laid in the balance, they are altogether lighter than vanity. 
Trust not in oppression, and become not vain in robbery: if riches increase, set not your heart upon them. 
God hath spoken once; twice have I heard this; that powe
656,isees; but thine eat and drink? 
And he said unto them, Can ye make the children of the bridechamber fast, while the bridegroom is with them? 
But the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken away from them, and then shall they fast in those days. 
And he spake also a parable unto them; No man putteth a piece of a new garment upon an old; if otherwise, then both the new maketh a rent, and the piece that was taken out of the new agreeth not with the old. 
And no man putteth new wine into old bottles; else the new wine will burst the bottles, and be spilled, and the bottles shall perish. 
But new wine must be put into new bottles; and both 
877,Elias? And he saith, I am not. Art thou that prophet? And he answered, No. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou? that we may give an answer to them that sent us. What sayest thou of thyself? 
He said, I am the voice of one crying in the wilderness, Make straight the way of the Lord, as said the prophet Esaias. 
And they which were sent were of the Pharisees. 
And they asked him, and said unto him, Why baptizest thou then, if thou be not that Christ, nor Elias, neither that prophet? 
John answered them, saying, I baptize with water: but there standeth one among you, whom ye know not; 
He it is, who coming after me is preferred before me, whose shoe's latchet I am not worthy to unloose. 
These things were done in Bethabara beyond Jordan, where John was baptizing. 
The next day John seeth Jesus coming unto him, and saith, Behold the Lamb of God, which taketh away th
695,er from the hand of the messengers, and read it: and Hezekiah went up unto the house of the LORD, and spread it before the LORD. 
And Hezekiah prayed unto the LORD, saying, 
O LORD of hosts, God of Israel, that dwellest between the cherubims, thou art the God, even thou alone, of all the kingdoms of the earth: thou hast made heaven and earth. 
Incline thine ear, O LORD, and hear; open thine eyes, O LORD, and see: and hear all the words of Sennacherib, which hath sent to reproach the living God. 
Of a truth, LORD, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the nations, and their countries, 
And have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and
696,lah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren. Therefore according to the commandment of the LORD he gave them an inheritance among the brethren of their father. 
And there fell ten portions to Manasseh, beside the land of Gilead and Bashan, which were on the other side Jordan; 
Because the daughters of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons: and the rest of Manasseh's sons had the land of Gilead. 
And the coast of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethah, that lieth before Shechem; and the border went along on the right hand u
682,ith the fruit of his mouth; and with the increase of his lips shall he be filled. 
Death and life are in the power of the tongue: and they that love it shall eat the fruit thereof. 
Whoso findeth a wife findeth a good thing, and obtaineth favour of the LORD. 
The poor useth intreaties; but the rich answereth roughly. 
A man that hath friends must shew himself friendly: and there is a friend that sticketh closer than a brother. 
Better is the poor that walketh in his integrity, than he that is perverse in his lips, and is a fool. 
Also, that the soul be without knowledge, it is not good; and he that hasteth with his feet sinneth. 
The foolishness of man perverteth his way: a
869,re many; and they hate me with cruel hatred. 
O keep my soul, and deliver me: let me not be ashamed; for I put my trust in thee. 
Let integrity and uprightness preserve me; for I wait on thee. 
Redeem Israel, O God, out of all his troubles. 
Judge me, O LORD; for I have walked in mine integrity: I have trusted also in the LORD; therefore I shall not slide. 
Examine me, O LORD, and prove me; try my reins and my heart. 
For thy lovingkindness is before mine eyes: and I have walked in thy truth. 
I have not sat with vain persons, neither will I go in with dissemblers. 
I have hated the congregation of evil doers; and will not sit with the wicked. 
I will wash mine hands in innocency: so will I compass thine altar, O LORD: 
That I may publish with the voice of thanksgiving, and tell of all thy wondrous works. 
LORD, I have loved the habitation of thy house, and
693,gnorant, and on them that are out of the way; for that he himself also is compassed with infirmity. 
And by reason hereof he ought, as for the people, so also for himself, to offer for sins. 
And no man taketh this honour unto himself, but he that is called of God, as was Aaron. 
So also Christ glorified not himself to be made an high priest; but he that said unto him, Thou art my Son, to day have I begotten thee. 
As he saith also in another place, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec. 
Who in the days of his flesh, when he had offered up prayers and supplications with strong crying and tears unto him that was able to save him from death, and was heard in that he
669,f him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with mine eyes. 
Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of Jerusalem: behold, thy King cometh unto thee: he is just, and having salvation; lowly, and riding upon an ass, and upon a colt the foal of an ass. 
And I will cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from Jerusalem, and the battle bow shall be cut off: and he shall speak peace unto the heathen: and his dominion shall be from sea even to sea, and from the river even to the ends of the earth. 
As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent fort
805,w, they were whiter than milk, they were more ruddy in body than rubies, their polishing was of sapphire: 
Their visage is blacker than a coal; they are not known in the streets: their skin cleaveth to their bones; it is withered, it is become like a stick. 
They that be slain with the sword are better than they that be slain with hunger: for these pine away, stricken through for want of the fruits of the field. 
The hands of the pitiful women have sodden their own children: they were their meat in the destruction of the daughter of my people. 
The LORD hath accomplished his fury; he hath poured out his fierce anger, and hath kindled a fire in Zion, and it hath devoured the foundations thereof. 
The kings of the earth, and all the inhabitants of the world, would not have believed that the adver
842,their fathers. 
And they transgressed against the God of their fathers, and went a whoring after the gods of the people of the land, whom God destroyed before them. 
And the God of Israel stirred up the spirit of Pul king of Assyria, and the spirit of Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria, and he carried them away, even the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, and brought them unto Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river Gozan, unto this day. 
The sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the children of Amram; Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam. The sons also of Aaron; Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
Eleazar begat Phinehas, Phinehas begat Abishua, 
And Abishua begat Bukki, and Bukki begat Uzzi, 
And Uzzi begat Zerahiah, and Zerahiah beg
697,s done thrice: and the vessel was received up again into heaven. 
Now while Peter doubted in himself what this vision which he had seen should mean, behold, the men which were sent from Cornelius had made enquiry for Simon's house, and stood before the gate, 
And called, and asked whether Simon, which was surnamed Peter, were lodged there. 
While Peter thought on the vision, the Spirit said unto him, Behold, three men seek thee. 
Arise therefore, and get thee down, and go with them, doubting nothing: for I have sent them. 
Then Peter went down to the men which were sent unto him from Cornelius; and said, Behold, I am he whom ye seek: what is the cause wherefore ye are come? 
And they said
879,h unto them, Moses because of the hardness of your hearts suffered you to put away your wives: but from the beginning it was not so. 
And I say unto you, Whosoever shall put away his wife, except it be for fornication, and shall marry another, committeth adultery: and whoso marrieth her which is put away doth commit adultery. 
His disciples say unto him, If the case of the man be so with his wife, it is not good to marry. 
But he said unto them, All men cannot receive this saying, save they to whom it is given. 
For there are some eunuchs, which were so born from their mother's womb: and there are some eunuchs, which were made eunuchs of men: and there be eunuchs, which have made themselves eunuchs for the kingdom of heaven's sake. He that is able to receive it, let him receive it. 
Then were there brought unto him little children, that he should put his hands on the
825, the chariots, when he shall enter into thy gates, as men enter into a city wherein is made a breach. 
With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy streets: he shall slay thy people by the sword, and thy strong garrisons shall go down to the ground. 
And they shall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy pleasant houses: and they shall lay thy stones and thy timber and thy dust in the midst of the water. 
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to cease; and the sound of thy harps shall be no more heard. 
And I will make thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a place to spread nets upon; thou shalt be built no more: for I the LORD have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD to Tyrus; Shall not the isles sh
898,he ascent of Akrabbim, and pass on to Zin: and the going forth thereof shall be from the south to Kadeshbarnea, and shall go on to Hazaraddar, and pass on to Azmon: 
And the border shall fetch a compass from Azmon unto the river of Egypt, and the goings out of it shall be at the sea. 
And as for the western border, ye shall even have the great sea for a border: this shall be your west border. 
And this shall be your north border: from the great sea ye shall point out for you mount Hor: 
From mount Hor ye shall point out your border unto the entrance of Hamath; and the goings forth of the border shall be to Zedad: 
And the border shall go on to Ziphron, and the goings out of it shall be at Hazarenan: this shall be your north border. 
And ye shall point out your east border from Hazarenan to Shepham: 
And the coast shall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on the east side of Ain; and the bo
801,m altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Ahaz slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city, even in Jerusalem: but they brought him not into the sepulchres of the kings of Israel: and Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead. 
Hezekiah began to reign when he was five and twenty years old, and he reigned nine and twenty years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Abijah, the daughter of Zechariah. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that David his father had done. 
He in
938,ho smote the firstborn of Egypt, both of man and beast. 
Who sent tokens and wonders into the midst of thee, O Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his servants. 
Who smote great nations, and slew mighty kings; 
Sihon king of the Amorites, and Og king of Bashan, and all the kingdoms of Canaan: 
And gave their land for an heritage, an heritage unto Israel his people. 
Thy name, O LORD, endureth for ever; and thy memorial, O LORD, throughout all generations. 
For the LORD will judge his people, and he will repent himself concerning his servants. 
The idols of the heathen are silver and gold, the work of men's hands. 
They have mouths, but they speak not; eyes have they, but they see not; 
They have ears, but they hear not; neither is there any breath in their mouths. 
They that make them are like unto them: so is every one that trusteth in them. 
Bless the LORD, O house of Israel: bless the LORD, O house of Aaron: 
Bless the LORD
792, the child be weaned, and then I will bring him, that he may appear before the LORD, and there abide for ever. 
And Elkanah her husband said unto her, Do what seemeth thee good; tarry until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So the woman abode, and gave her son suck until she weaned him. 
And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought him unto the house of the LORD in Shiloh: and the child was young. 
And they slew a bullock, and brought the child to Eli. 
And she said, Oh my lord, as thy soul liveth, my lord, I am the woman that stood by thee here, praying unto the LORD. 
For this child I prayed; and the LORD hath given me my petition which I asked of him: 
Therefore also I 
955,d yet thou wast not satisfied therewith. 
How weak is thine heart, saith the LORD GOD, seeing thou doest all these things, the work of an imperious whorish woman; 
In that thou buildest thine eminent place in the head of every way, and makest thine high place in every street; and hast not been as an harlot, in that thou scornest hire; 
But as a wife that committeth adultery, which taketh strangers instead of her husband! 
They give gifts to all whores: but thou givest thy gifts to all thy lovers, and hirest them, that they may come unto thee on every side for thy whoredom. 
And the contrary is in thee from other women in thy whoredoms, whereas none followeth thee to commit whoredoms: and in that thou givest a reward, and no reward is given unto thee, therefore thou art contrary. 
Wherefore, O harlot, hear the word of the LORD: 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thy filthiness was poured out, and thy nakedness discovered through thy whoredoms 
780,n kings' houses. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? yea, I say unto you, and more than a prophet. 
For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
Verily I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there hath not risen a greater than John the Baptist: notwithstanding he that is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he. 
And from the days of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent take it by force. 
For all the prophets and the law prophesied until John. 
And if ye will receive it, this is Elias, which was for to come. 
He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
But whereunto shall I liken this generation? It is like unto chil
727,rsemen. And he answered and said, Babylon is fallen, is fallen; and all the graven images of her gods he hath broken unto the ground. 
O my threshing, and the corn of my floor: that which I have heard of the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared unto you. 
The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Watchman, what of the night? Watchman, what of the night? 
The watchman said, The morning cometh, and also the night: if ye will enquire, enquire ye: return, come. 
The burden upon Arabia. In the forest in Arabia shall ye lodge, O ye travelling companies of Dedanim. 
The inhabitants of the land of Tema brought water to him that was thirsty, they prevented with their bread him that fled. 
For they fled fr
756,er it of the herd; whether it be a male or female, he shall offer it without blemish before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his offering, and kill it at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons the priests shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt sacrifice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offer
890,kings away, every man out of his place, and put captains in their rooms: 
And number thee an army, like the army that thou hast lost, horse for horse, and chariot for chariot: and we will fight against them in the plain, and surely we shall be stronger than they. And he hearkened unto their voice, and did so. 
And it came to pass at the return of the year, that Benhadad numbered the Syrians, and went up to Aphek, to fight against Israel. 
And the children of Israel were numbered, and were all present, and went against them: and the children of Israel pitched before them like two little flocks of kids; but the Syrians filled the country. 
And there came a man of God, and spake unto the king of Israel, and said, Thus saith the LORD, Because the Syrians have said, The LORD is God of the hills, but he is not God of the valleys, therefore will I deliver all this great multitude into
806,they should be the LORD's people. 
Then all the people went to the house of Baal, and brake it down, and brake his altars and his images in pieces, and slew Mattan the priest of Baal before the altars. 
Also Jehoiada appointed the offices of the house of the LORD by the hand of the priests the Levites, whom David had distributed in the house of the LORD, to offer the burnt offerings of the LORD, as it is written in the law of Moses, with rejoicing and with singing, as it was ordained by David. 
And he set the porters at the gates of the house of the LORD, that none which was unclean in any thing should enter in. 
And he took the captains of hundreds, and the nobles, and the governors of the people, and all the people of the land, and brought down the king from the house of the LORD: and they cam
939,o that they went through the midst of the sea on the dry land; and their persecutors thou threwest into the deeps, as a stone into the mighty waters. 
Moreover thou leddest them in the day by a cloudy pillar; and in the night by a pillar of fire, to give them light in the way wherein they should go. 
Thou camest down also upon mount Sinai, and spakest with them from heaven, and gavest them right judgments, and true laws, good statutes and commandments: 
And madest known unto them thy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes, and laws, by the hand of Moses thy servant: 
And gavest them bread from heaven for their hunger, and broughtest forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and promisedst them that they should go in to possess the land which thou hadst sworn to give them. 
But they and our fathers dealt proudly, and hardened their necks, and hearkened not to thy commandments, 
And refused to obey, 
704,ah, Jashub, and Shimrom, four. 
And the sons of Tola; Uzzi, and Rephaiah, and Jeriel, and Jahmai, and Jibsam, and Shemuel, heads of their father's house, to wit, of Tola: they were valiant men of might in their generations; whose number was in the days of David two and twenty thousand and six hundred. 
And the sons of Uzzi; Izrahiah: and the sons of Izrahiah; Michael, and Obadiah, and Joel, Ishiah, five: all of them chief men. 
And with them, by their generations, after the house of their fathers, were bands of soldiers for war, six and thirty thousand men: for they had many wives and sons. 
And their brethren among all the families of Issachar were valiant men of might, reckoned in all by their
841,ess life. 
For he testifieth, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec. 
For there is verily a disannulling of the commandment going before for the weakness and unprofitableness thereof. 
For the law made nothing perfect, but the bringing in of a better hope did; by the which we draw nigh unto God. 
And inasmuch as not without an oath he was made priest: 
(For those priests were made without an oath; but this with an oath by him that said unto him, The Lord sware and will not repent, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec:) 
By so much was Jesus made a surety of a better testament. 
And they truly were many priests, because they were not suffered to continue by reason of death: 
But this man, because he continueth ever, hath an unchangeable priesthood. 
Wherefore he is able also to save them to
651, to will and to do of his good pleasure. 
Do all things without murmurings and disputings: 
That ye may be blameless and harmless, the sons of God, without rebuke, in the midst of a crooked and perverse nation, among whom ye shine as lights in the world; 
Holding forth the word of life; that I may rejoice in the day of Christ, that I have not run in vain, neither laboured in vain. 
Yea, and if I be offered upon the sacrifice and service of your faith, I joy, and rejoice with you all. 
For the same cause also do ye joy, and rejoice with me. 
But I trust in the Lord Jesus to send Timotheus shortly unto you, that I also may be of good comfort, wh
688, the tabernacle, and the pattern of all the instruments thereof, even so shall ye make it. 
And they shall make an ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, within and without shalt thou overlay it, and shalt make upon it a crown of gold round about. 
And thou shalt cast four rings of gold for it, and put them in the four corners thereof; and two rings shall be in the one side of it, and two rings in the other side of it. 
And thou shalt make staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with gold. 
And thou shalt put the stave
707,hen hands? 
He answered and said unto them, Well hath Esaias prophesied of you hypocrites, as it is written, This people honoureth me with their lips, but their heart is far from me. 
Howbeit in vain do they worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men. 
For laying aside the commandment of God, ye hold the tradition of men, as the washing of pots and cups: and many other such like things ye do. 
And he said unto them, Full well ye reject the commandment of God, that ye may keep your own tradition. 
For Moses said, Honour thy father and thy mother; and, Whoso curseth father or mother, let him die the death: 
But ye say, If a man shall say to his father or mother, It is Corban, that is 
744,either did eat nor drink. 
And there was a certain disciple at Damascus, named Ananias; and to him said the Lord in a vision, Ananias. And he said, Behold, I am here, Lord. 
And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the street which is called Straight, and enquire in the house of Judas for one called Saul, of Tarsus: for, behold, he prayeth, 
And hath seen in a vision a man named Ananias coming in, and putting his hand on him, that he might receive his sight. 
Then Ananias answered, Lord, I have heard by many of this man, how much evil he hath done to thy saints at Jerusalem: 
And here he hath authority from the chief priests to bind all that call on thy name. 
But the Lord said unto him, Go thy way: for he is a chosen vessel unt
713,, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are among you, in the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to place his name there. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and thou shalt observe and do these statutes. 
Thou shalt observe the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that thou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 
And thou shalt rejoice in thy feast, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite, the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within thy gates. 
Seven days shalt thou keep a solemn feast unto the LORD
657,And he shall be thy spokesman unto the people: and he shall be, even he shall be to thee instead of a mouth, and thou shalt be to him instead of God. 
And thou shalt take this rod in thine hand, wherewith thou shalt do signs. 
And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father in law, and said unto him, Let me go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which are in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive. And Jethro said to Moses, Go in peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt: for all the men are dead which sought thy life. 
And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon an ass, and he returned to the land of 
936, unto the people, and sanctify them to day and to morrow, and let them wash their clothes, 
And be ready against the third day: for the third day the LORD will come down in the sight of all the people upon mount Sinai. 
And thou shalt set bounds unto the people round about, saying, Take heed to yourselves, that ye go not up into the mount, or touch the border of it: whosoever toucheth the mount shall be surely put to death: 
There shall not an hand touch it, but he shall surely be stoned, or shot through; whether it be beast or man, it shall not live: when the trumpet soundeth long, they shall come up to the mount. 
And Moses went down from the mount unto the people, and sanctified the people; and they washed their clothes. 
And he said unto the people, Be ready against the third day: come not at your wives. 
And it came to pass on the third day in the morning, that there were thunders and lightnings, and a thick cloud upo
683,ride doeth. 
For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy destruction, shall even now be too narrow by reason of the inhabitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these, seeing I have lost my children, and am desolate, a captive, and removing to and fro? and who hath brought up these? Behold, I was left alone; these, where had they been? 
Thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, I will lift up mine hand to the Gentiles, and set up
888,se nations because of you; for the LORD your God is he that hath fought for you. 
Behold, I have divided unto you by lot these nations that remain, to be an inheritance for your tribes, from Jordan, with all the nations that I have cut off, even unto the great sea westward. 
And the LORD your God, he shall expel them from before you, and drive them from out of your sight; and ye shall possess their land, as the LORD your God hath promised unto you. 
Be ye therefore very courageous to keep and to do all that is written in the book of the law of Moses, that ye turn not aside therefrom to the right hand or to the left; 
That ye come not among these nations, these that remain among you; neither make mention of the name of their gods, nor cause to swear by them, neither serve them, nor bow yourselves unto them: 
But cleave unto the LORD your God, as ye have done unto this day. 
Fo
869,ye shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever ye shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven. 
Again I say unto you, That if two of you shall agree on earth as touching any thing that they shall ask, it shall be done for them of my Father which is in heaven. 
For where two or three are gathered together in my name, there am I in the midst of them. 
Then came Peter to him, and said, Lord, how oft shall my brother sin against me, and I forgive him? till seven times? 
Jesus saith unto him, I say not unto thee, Until seven times: but, Until seventy times seven. 
Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king, which would take account of his servants. 
And when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents. 
But forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be sold, and his 
950,ometh to pass. 
Ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky and of the earth; but how is it that ye do not discern this time? 
Yea, and why even of yourselves judge ye not what is right? 
When thou goest with thine adversary to the magistrate, as thou art in the way, give diligence that thou mayest be delivered from him; lest he hale thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee to the officer, and the officer cast thee into prison. 
I tell thee, thou shalt not depart thence, till thou hast paid the very last mite. 
There were present at that season some that told him of the Galilaeans, whose blood Pilate had mingled with their sacrifices. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Suppose ye that these Galilaeans were sinners above all the Galilaeans, because they suffered such things? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
Or those eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and slew them, think ye t
785, of the earth shall weep and mourn over her; for no man buyeth their merchandise any more: 
The merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, and fine linen, and purple, and silk, and scarlet, and all thyine wood, and all manner vessels of ivory, and all manner vessels of most precious wood, and of brass, and iron, and marble, 
And cinnamon, and odours, and ointments, and frankincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and wheat, and beasts, and sheep, and horses, and chariots, and slaves, and souls of men. 
And the fruits that thy soul lusted after are departed from thee, and all things which were dainty and goodly are departed from thee, and thou shalt find them no more at all. 
The merchants of these things, which were made rich by her, shall stand
688,of the standard of the camp of Judah pitch throughout their armies: and Nahshon the son of Amminadab shall be captain of the children of Judah. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred. 
And those that do pitch next unto him shall be the tribe of Issachar: and Nethaneel the son of Zuar shall be captain of the children of Issachar. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred. 
Then the tribe of Zebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be captain of the children of Zebulun. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and fo
923,ock for them: he clave the rock also, and the waters gushed out. 
There is no peace, saith the LORD, unto the wicked. 
Listen, O isles, unto me; and hearken, ye people, from far; The LORD hath called me from the womb; from the bowels of my mother hath he made mention of my name. 
And he hath made my mouth like a sharp sword; in the shadow of his hand hath he hid me, and made me a polished shaft; in his quiver hath he hid me; 
And said unto me, Thou art my servant, O Israel, in whom I will be glorified. 
Then I said, I have laboured in vain, I have spent my strength for nought, and in vain: yet surely my judgment is with the LORD, and my work with my God. 
And now, saith the LORD that formed me from the womb to be his servant, to bring Jacob again to him, Though Israel be not gathered, yet shall I be glorious in the eyes of the LORD, and my God shall be my strength. 
And he said, It is a light thing that thou s
808,overnor answered and said unto them, Whether of the twain will ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas. 
Pilate saith unto them, What shall I do then with Jesus which is called Christ? They all say unto him, Let him be crucified. 
And the governor said, Why, what evil hath he done? But they cried out the more, saying, Let him be crucified. 
When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, but that rather a tumult was made, he took water, and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see ye to it. 
Then answered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and on our children. 
Then released he Barabbas unto them: and when he had scourged Jesus, he delivered him to be crucified. 
Then the soldiers of the governor took Jesus into the common
805,in the name of the LORD. 
And he dealt to every one of Israel, both man and woman, to every one a loaf of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. 
And he appointed certain of the Levites to minister before the ark of the LORD, and to record, and to thank and praise the LORD God of Israel: 
Asaph the chief, and next to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and Obededom: and Jeiel with psalteries and with harps; but Asaph made a sound with cymbals; 
Benaiah also and Jahaziel the priests with trumpets continually before the ark of the covenant of God. 
Then on that day David delivered first this psalm to thank the LORD into the hand of Asaph and his brethren. 
Give thanks unto the LORD, call upon his name, make known his deeds am
855,pa, I am accused of the Jews. 
Why should it be thought a thing incredible with you, that God should raise the dead? 
I verily thought with myself, that I ought to do many things contrary to the name of Jesus of Nazareth. 
Which thing I also did in Jerusalem: and many of the saints did I shut up in prison, having received authority from the chief priests; and when they were put to death, I gave my voice against them. 
And I punished them oft in every synagogue, and compelled them to blaspheme; and being exceedingly mad against them, I persecuted them even unto strange cities. 
Whereupon as I went to Damascus with authority and commission from the chief priests, 
At midday, O king, I saw in the way a light from heaven, above the brightness of the sun, shining round about me and them which journeyed with me. 
And when we were all fallen to the e
880,the day that he sinneth. 
When I shall say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his own righteousness, and commit iniquity, all his righteousnesses shall not be remembered; but for his iniquity that he hath committed, he shall die for it. 
Again, when I say unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; if he turn from his sin, and do that which is lawful and right; 
If the wicked restore the pledge, give again that he had robbed, walk in the statutes of life, without committing iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
None of his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto him: he hath done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live. 
Yet the children of thy people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal. 
When the righteous turneth from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, he s
703,ou into the hands of strangers, and will execute judgments among you. 
Ye shall fall by the sword; I will judge you in the border of Israel; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
This city shall not be your caldron, neither shall ye be the flesh in the midst thereof; but I will judge you in the border of Israel: 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD: for ye have not walked in my statutes, neither executed my judgments, but have done after the manners of the heathen that are round about you. 
And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the son of Benaiah died. Then fell I down upon my face, and cried with a loud voice, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou make a full end of the remnant of
763,the LORD thy God commanded his servant Moses to give you all the land, and to destroy all the inhabitants of the land from before you, therefore we were sore afraid of our lives because of you, and have done this thing. 
And now, behold, we are in thine hand: as it seemeth good and right unto thee to do unto us, do. 
And so did he unto them, and delivered them out of the hand of the children of Israel, that they slew them not. 
And Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water for the congregation, and for the altar of the LORD, even unto this day, in the place which he should choose. 
Now it came to pass, when Adonizedec king of Jerusalem had heard how Joshua had taken Ai, and had utterly destroyed it; as he had done to Jericho and her 
676,rn; 
Until I come and take you away to a land like your own land, a land of corn and wine, a land of bread and vineyards. 
Beware lest Hezekiah persuade you, saying, the LORD will deliver us. Hath any of the gods of the nations delivered his land out of the hand of the king of Assyria? 
Where are the gods of Hamath and Arphad? where are the gods of Sepharvaim? and have they delivered Samaria out of my hand? 
Who are they among all the gods of these lands, that have delivered their land out of my hand, that the LORD should deliver Jerusalem out of my hand? 
But they held their peace, and answered him not a word: for the king's commandment was, saying, Answer him not. 

865,that they walked not uprightly according to the truth of the gospel, I said unto Peter before them all, If thou, being a Jew, livest after the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews, why compellest thou the Gentiles to live as do the Jews? 
We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles, 
Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law, but by the faith of Jesus Christ, even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for by the works of the law shall no flesh be justified. 
But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves also are found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God forbid. 
For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor. 
For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live u
656,njamites; will the son of Jesse give every one of you fields and vineyards, and make you all captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds; 
That all of you have conspired against me, and there is none that sheweth me that my son hath made a league with the son of Jesse, and there is none of you that is sorry for me, or sheweth unto me that my son hath stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then answered Doeg the Edomite, which was set over the servants of Saul, and said, I saw the son of Jesse coming to Nob, to Ahimelech the son of Ahitub. 
And he enquired of the LORD for him, and gave him victuals, and gave him the s
951,n the fat, and upon the right shoulder: 
And he put all upon Aaron's hands, and upon his sons' hands, and waved them for a wave offering before the LORD. 
And Moses took them from off their hands, and burnt them on the altar upon the burnt offering: they were consecrations for a sweet savour: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And Moses took the breast, and waved it for a wave offering before the LORD: for of the ram of consecration it was Moses' part; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses took of the anointing oil, and of the blood which was upon the altar, and sprinkled it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon his sons' garments with him; and sanctified Aaron, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him. 
And Moses said unto Aaron and to his sons, Boil the flesh at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and there eat it with the bread that is in the basket of consecrat
835,nd twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty thousand sheep. So the king and all the children of Israel dedicated the house of the LORD. 
The same day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was before the house of the LORD: for there he offered burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings: because the brasen altar that was before the LORD was too little to receive the burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings. 
And at that time Solomon held a feast, and all Israel with him, a great congregation, from the entering in of Hamath unto the river of Egypt, before the LORD our God, seven days and seven days, even fourteen days. 
On the eighth day he sent the people away: and they blessed the king, and went unto their tents joyful and glad of heart for all the
812,e it that curse the day, who are ready to raise up their mourning. 
Let the stars of the twilight thereof be dark; let it look for light, but have none; neither let it see the dawning of the day: 
Because it shut not up the doors of my mother's womb, nor hid sorrow from mine eyes. 
Why died I not from the womb? why did I not give up the ghost when I came out of the belly? 
Why did the knees prevent me? or why the breasts that I should suck? 
For now should I have lain still and been quiet, I should have slept: then had I been at rest, 
With kings and counsellors of the earth, which build desolate places for themselves; 
Or with princes that had gold, who filled their houses with silver: 
Or as an hidden untimely birth I had not been; as infants which never saw light. 
There the wicked cease from troub
949,ntered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux. 
And landing at Syracuse, we tarried there three days. 
And from thence we fetched a compass, and came to Rhegium: and after one day the south wind blew, and we came the next day to Puteoli: 
Where we found brethren, and were desired to tarry with them seven days: and so we went toward Rome. 
And from thence, when the brethren heard of us, they came to meet us as far as Appii forum, and The three taverns: whom when Paul saw, he thanked God, and took courage. 
And when we came to Rome, the centurion delivered the prisoners to the captain of the guard: but Paul was suffered to dwell by himself with a soldier that kept him. 
And it came to pass, that after three days Paul called the chief of the Jews together: and when they were come together, he said unto them, Men and brethren, though I have committed nothing against the people, or customs of our fathers, yet was I delivered prisoner
844,s of God which he hath testified of his Son. 
He that believeth on the Son of God hath the witness in himself: he that believeth not God hath made him a liar; because he believeth not the record that God gave of his Son. 
And this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son. 
He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life. 
These things have I written unto you that believe on the name of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God. 
And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing according to his will, he heareth us: 
And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired of him. 
If any man see his brother sin a sin wh
945, are we killed all the day long; we are counted as sheep for the slaughter. 
Awake, why sleepest thou, O Lord? arise, cast us not off for ever. 
Wherefore hidest thou thy face, and forgettest our affliction and our oppression? 
For our soul is bowed down to the dust: our belly cleaveth unto the earth. 
Arise for our help, and redeem us for thy mercies' sake. 
My heart is inditing a good matter: I speak of the things which I have made touching the king: my tongue is the pen of a ready writer. 
Thou art fairer than the children of men: grace is poured into thy lips: therefore God hath blessed thee for ever. 
Gird thy sword upon thy thigh, O most mighty, with thy glory and thy majesty. 
And in thy majesty ride prosperously because of truth and meekness and righteousness; and thy right hand shall teach thee terrible things. 
Thine arrows are sharp in the heart of the king's enemies; whereby the people fall under thee. 
Thy throne, O Go
788,ifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him? 
And he was casting out a devil, and it was dumb. And it came to pass, when the devil was gone out, the dumb spake; and the people wondered. 
But some of them said, He casteth out devils through Beelzebub the chief of the devils. 
And others, tempting him, sought of him a sign from heaven. 
But he, knowing their thoughts, said unto them, Every kingdom divided against itself is brought to desolation; and a house divided against a house falleth. 
If Satan also be divided against himself, how shall his kingdom stand? because ye say that I cast out devils through Beelzebub. 
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your sons cast them out? therefore shall they be yo
903,king spake and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant of the living God, is thy God, whom thou servest continually, able to deliver thee from the lions? 
Then said Daniel unto the king, O king, live for ever. 
My God hath sent his angel, and hath shut the lions' mouths, that they have not hurt me: forasmuch as before him innocency was found in me; and also before thee, O king, have I done no hurt. 
Then was the king exceedingly glad for him, and commanded that they should take Daniel up out of the den. So Daniel was taken up out of the den, and no manner of hurt was found upon him, because he believed in his God. 
And the king commanded, and they brought those men which had accused Daniel, and they cast them into the den of lions, them, their children, and their wives; and the lions had the mastery of them, and brake all their bones in pieces or ever they came at the bottom of the den. 
Then kin
904,esy a lie in my name; that I might drive you out, and that ye might perish, ye, and the prophets that prophesy unto you. 
Also I spake to the priests and to all this people, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Hearken not to the words of your prophets that prophesy unto you, saying, Behold, the vessels of the LORD's house shall now shortly be brought again from Babylon: for they prophesy a lie unto you. 
Hearken not unto them; serve the king of Babylon, and live: wherefore should this city be laid waste? 
But if they be prophets, and if the word of the LORD be with them, let them now make intercession to the LORD of hosts, that the vessels which are left in the house of the LORD, and in the house of the king of Judah, and at Jerusalem, go not to Babylon. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts concerning the pillars, and concerning the sea, and concerning the bases, and concerning the residue of the vess
710, the things which I write unto you, behold, before God, I lie not. 
Afterwards I came into the regions of Syria and Cilicia; 
And was unknown by face unto the churches of Judaea which were in Christ: 
But they had heard only, That he which persecuted us in times past now preacheth the faith which once he destroyed. 
And they glorified God in me. 
Then fourteen years after I went up again to Jerusalem with Barnabas, and took Titus with me also. 
And I went up by revelation, and communicated unto them that gospel which I preach among the Gentiles, but privately to them which were of reputation, lest by any means I should run, or had run, in vain. 
But neither Titus, who was with me, being a Greek, was c
691,t of the womb to see labour and sorrow, that my days should be consumed with shame? 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur the son of Melchiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, saying, 
Enquire, I pray thee, of the LORD for us; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon maketh war against us; if so be that the LORD will deal with us according to all his wondrous works, that he may go up from us. 
Then said Jeremiah unto them, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah: 
Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Behold, I will turn back the weapons of war that are in your hands, wherewith ye fight against the king of Babylon, and against the Chalde
710,commandment to save me; for thou art my rock and my fortress. 
Deliver me, O my God, out of the hand of the wicked, out of the hand of the unrighteous and cruel man. 
For thou art my hope, O Lord GOD: thou art my trust from my youth. 
By thee have I been holden up from the womb: thou art he that took me out of my mother's bowels: my praise shall be continually of thee. 
I am as a wonder unto many; but thou art my strong refuge. 
Let my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all the day. 
Cast me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my strength faileth. 
For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my soul take counsel together, 
Saying, God hath forsaken hi
773, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop: 
And the priest shall command that one of the birds be killed in an earthen vessel over running water: 
As for the living bird, he shall take it, and the cedar wood, and the scarlet, and the hyssop, and shall dip them and the living bird in the blood of the bird that was killed over the running water: 
And he shall sprinkle upon him that is to be cleansed from the leprosy seven times, and shall pronounce him clean, and shall let the living bird loose into the open field. 
And he that is to be cleansed shall wash his clothes, and shave off all his hair, and wash himself in water, that he may be clean: and after that he shall come into the camp, and shall tarry abroad out of his tent seven days. 
But it shall be on the seve
819,not forsaken us in our bondage, but hath extended mercy unto us in the sight of the kings of Persia, to give us a reviving, to set up the house of our God, and to repair the desolations thereof, and to give us a wall in Judah and in Jerusalem. 
And now, O our God, what shall we say after this? for we have forsaken thy commandments, 
Which thou hast commanded by thy servants the prophets, saying, The land, unto which ye go to possess it, is an unclean land with the filthiness of the people of the lands, with their abominations, which have filled it from one end to another with their uncleanness. 
Now therefore give not your daughters unto their sons, neither take their daughters unto your sons, nor seek their peace or their wealth for ever: that ye may be strong, and eat the good of the land, and leave it for
690,id unto Abraham, Wherefore did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I of a surety bear a child, which am old? 
Is any thing too hard for the LORD? At the time appointed I will return unto thee, according to the time of life, and Sarah shall have a son. 
Then Sarah denied, saying, I laughed not; for she was afraid. And he said, Nay; but thou didst laugh. 
And the men rose up from thence, and looked toward Sodom: and Abraham went with them to bring them on the way. 
And the LORD said, Shall I hide from Abraham that thing which I do; 
Seeing that Abraham shall surely become a great and mighty nation, and all the nations of the earth shall be blessed in him? 
For I know him, that he will command
